Authors
Michael J. Legeros
Number of Reviews
347

Title
Review for Casper (1995)
     Skip it.  The computer-generated FX are cute, but the story is all
over the place. The simple, sweet premise of a very lonely ghost has
been expanded to include a variety of vulgar subplots, ranging from
hidden treasure to a kitchen-sink explanation of the afterlife.
Groan.  The result is too broad to be believable.
     If the jokes were stronger (say, a la THE FLINTSTONES), we might
have something here.  But with the exception of a few good lines, there
isn't enough to sustain adult interest. Even a half-dozen well-placed
cameos don't generate the guffaws that they should.  Kids won't mind,
though.  They'll love the eye-popping production design that looks
quite ookey on the inside (and quite phony on the outside).
     We all could do without the wish-fulfillment ending.  The final
reel is the worst, with enough ghosts, angels, and misplaced spirits to
send even the lowest-level paranormal screaming from the theater.  And,
yes, that *is* Little Richard singing "Casper the Friendly Ghost" over
the closing credits. Good golly!
BOTTOM LINE:  Strictly for kids, even if the language isn't the best in
places.

Title
Review for Mulholland Falls (1996)
     CHINATOWN it ain't.  Nick Nolte, Melanie Griffith, and Chazz
Palminteri are some of the big names in this terrible, top-heavy
train-wreck of a thriller from New Zealand director Lee Tamahori (ONCE
WE WERE WARRIORS).  Nick, Chazz, Michael Madsen, and Chris Penn play an
elite team of LAPD detectives (based on the real-life "Hat Squad")
investigating the murder of a beautiful young woman (Jennifer Connelly).
The often-gruesome trail-- she was found with all of her bones broken,
as if dropped from a great height-- leads into the desert, into a
conspiracy involving the Atomic Energy Commission.  Yawn.
     The period detail is a pleasant distraction-- enough hats, suits,
and old cars to keep one's mind off the contrived and often confounding 
plot.  MULHOLLAND FALLS also features an impressive array of prominent
players, none of whom, though, makes much of a dent.  Ms. Griffith-- as
Nolte's character's wife-- registers no better than Madsen, Penn,
William Petersen, Bruce Dern, or Treat Williams.  Even a cameo by Rob
Lowe is wasted.
     Stick with it, though, and you'll have plenty of time to ponder
such imponderabilities as:  how does the exceptionally endowed Ms.
Connelly keep from falling forward?  Does she wear a special brace?  If
Sean Penn in DEAD MAN WALKING is the current incarnation of Elvis, then
is his heavier-set brother a representation of the King's, uh, "later
years?" And, of course, will the unfortunate Chazz Palminteri still have
a career after the four consecutive howlers JADE, DIABOLIQUE, FAITHFUL,
and, now, MULHOLLAND FALLS?
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Ghosts of Mississippi (1996)
    The second stinker and potential career-sinker for Rob Reiner
(remember NORTH?) is an odd one.  Here's an earnest, star-studded
docudrama about slain Sixties civil rights activist Medgar Evers that
all but ignores him!  Well, to be fair, GHOSTS OF MISSISSIPPI is really
about the decades-later retrial of Evers' assassin, white supremacist
Byron De La Beckwith, played here by a cackling James Woods in old-age
make-up.  (Calm down.  Though a scene-stealer-- and arguably the only
character who comes to life in this dreadful feature-- Beckwith is
on-screen for all of twenty minutes.  Maybe thirty.) At the center of
the story, instead, is Alec Baldwin's character, an Assistant D.A. who
spends years rebuilding the case against Beckwith and at the cost of his
marriage, reputation, and personal safety.  Yawn.  While it's always a
treat to see the one- time Jack Ryan front *any* film, his liberal-
white-legal-guy-with-guilt has been done before, and better, and most
recently by Mr. McConaughey in A TIME TO KILL.  You've already seen this
movie, so why bother?
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC, USA, Earth
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
I'm also on the Web!  http://www.pagesz.net/~legeros/

Title
Review for One Fine Day (1996)
     The formula is a familiar one:  two people meet, fall in love, and
spend the rest of the picture pretending they don't feel that way.  In
the bustling, big-city romantic comedy ONE FINE DAY, those two are
Michelle Pfieffer and George Clooney.  They play a pair of single,
working parents who are thrown together after their kids miss a field
trip.  The Cat and the Bat are an okay match, though neither actor
appears at a distinct advantage.  Mr. Clooney is not yet the Big Leading
Man that the hype would have him be, while Ms.  Pfieffer is stuck
struggling in a oddly unsympathetic role.  The latter point is
particularly problematic.  Pfieffer is portrayed as, well, a grouch who
can't control her son.  So when Clooney's character breezes in and
effortlessly takes charge of the situation, you can't help but wonder
what message is being sent.  Of course, these points are probably moot
as the movie itself is so exhausting that I'm tempted to label it
unwatchable.  Director Michael Hoffman (RESTORATION) overdoes it on
every possible front-- plot, music, repartee, etc.-- that the end result
is too much movie.  I just wanted to shut down and be done with it.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC, USA, Earth
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
I'm also on the Web!  http://www.pagesz.net/~legeros/

Title
Review for Cop Land (1997)
A movie review by Michael J. Legeros
Copyright 1997 by Michael J. Legeros
     COP LAND is surprisingly underwhelming.  Neither a meaty cast nor a
meaty plot can do much for writer-director James Mangold (HEAVY).  His
epic-flavored movie-- about big-city police corruption that spills over
into the small town where most of the cops live-- is missing *some-
thing*.  Maybe it's the pacing, which is as sluggish and slow-moving as
Sylvester Stallone's dimmer-witted hero.  Maybe it's the abundance of
characters, which renders the first hour more than a little difficult to
follow.  (I still don't know who the victim of the fire was.) Maybe it's
the plot, which veers toward implausibility when the bad guys throw a
party for someone who is supposed to be dead.  (The party as a symbol
for the cop's ever-increasing arrogance?  Maybe.) Whatever the reasons,
COP LAND amuses but never entirely entertains.  Even the big finale,
admittedly a kicker with its nifty use of sound and silence, lacks
enough emotional punch.  With Robert De Niro, Ray Liotta, Harvey Keitel,
Michael Rapaport, Janeane Garofalo, Robert Patrick, Cathy Moriarty,
Annabella Sciorra, and Peter Berg.

Title
Review for Boxer, The (1997)
(Uni)
Directed by     Jim Sheridan
Written by      Jim Sheridan and Terry George
Cast            Daniel Day-Lewis, Emily Watson, Brian Cox, Ken Stott,
                Gerard McSorley, Ciaran Fitzgerald
MPAA Rating     "R" (presumably for violence and profanity)
Running Time    108 minutes
Reviewed at     The Cary Imperial, Raleigh, NC (10JAN98)
     Though not particularly engaging as either a sports film or an IRA
drama, THE BOXER *does* boast a great love story.  Daniel Day-Lewis and
Emily Watson (BREAKING THE WAVES) play Danny and Maggie, former teen
lovers rekindling their romance almost a decade-and-a-half after Danny
was sent up the river for IRA activities.  He's out of prison, but not
out of hot water.  Seems Maggie's now a prisoner's wife, having married
another IRA lad in the interim.  And she's not supposed to date-- no
prisoner's wife is.  (They risk broken kneecaps, among other forms of
societal scorn.) Now, for Maggie, the situation is even *more* dicey,
'cause her dad (Brian Cox) is an IRA bigwig.  He's trying to negotiate a
cease-fire that not everyone in his Belfast group is supporting, so he
can't afford even the *appearance* of impropriety.  He's also observed
that Danny has gone the way of the pacifist, forgoing his IRA ties in
favor of a more localized goal:  renovating the community center into a
sports gym.  Got it?  Yeah, there's lots going on here-- arguably too
much for this third collaboration between Daniel Day-Lewis and director
Jim Sheridan (IN THE NAME OF THE FATHER, MY LEFT FOOT).  Neither the
sports stuff nor the IRA in-fighting ends up particularly affecting, but
it does keep your brain busy.  (Do *all* Brits watch fights as if in a
dinner-theater, with no shouting or yelling?  Or just the upper-crust?)
The romance is right there, though, thanks to two well-paired actors and
enough obstacles in their characters' paths to ensure that tears will
flow, no matter which way the story goes.  Bring a hankie.

Title
Review for Restoration (1995)
     Epic historical dramas are so rare, these days, that even the
emotionally-empty RESTORATION may find itself an audience.  There's very
little weight behind this 17th Century story of an English physician
(Robert Downey Jr.) who finds his faith tested by the King (Sam Neill),
a fellow practitioner (David Thewlis), and a mentally-ill commoner (Meg
Ryan).  The running time is a wig's hair under two hours, and yet it
feels like four.  Nobody in Michael Hoffman's film commands any presence,
least of all Downey, who appears in nearly every single scene.  (The Big
Cast also includes Hugh Grant, who, apparently, is now required to 
appear in at least three period pieces per year.  Maybe it's part of his
sentence.) The opulent set design and detailed costumes are about as
exciting as it gets.  Though there's never a shortage of story-- the
plot churns away merrily from the very first scene-- the absence of even
a *single* interesting character turns the title into an apt description
of what most viewers will be attempting with regard to the blood flow to
their buttocks.  Boring. 
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
MOVIE HELL is on the Web!  http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Carpool (1996)
     Pam Grier as a transsexual in ESCAPE FROM L.A.?  Ellen Barkin as a
Sports Babe sportscaster in THE FAN??  Marlon Brando impersonating a
Polynesian circus tent in THE ISLAND OF DR. MOREAU???  We've had no
shortage of strange sights this summer and, yet, none may be as weird as
what ends CARPOOL, an excruciatingly dumb kiddie flick that puts five
brats and two adults (Tom Arnold and David Paymer) in a minivan and
chases them by the police under the guise of a hostage situation.  Tom
Arnold plays the crazed carnival owner with a gun, while Paymer attempts
an exasperated advertising executive.  Together, they provide the
running commentary during such silly set-pieces as a mosey through the
middle of an indoor shopping mall.  Groan, he says, remembering that THE
BLUES BROTHERS did it first and better.
     Only in the final reel does CARPOOL warrant a walk-out.  A runaway
Ferris wheel signals the beginning of the end-- an atrocious two-part
finale where the story tries to get serious.  Paymer playing Spiderman
and climbing a carnival ride is a sight to behold, but none is more
strange, more weird, and more utterly unexpected than that of Rod
Steiger's grumpy grocery store owner expounding upon the delights of a
chocolate donut.  Don't ask.  The movie is bad, the endings are
terrible, and, after a mere ten minutes of screen time, Mr. Steiger has
managed to sink even lower than his Cuban- accented turn in the stinky
SPECIALIST.  Directed by Academy of Motion Picture Arts and Sciences
President Arthur Hiller, who proves what Paymer's character says on the
subject of carpools:  "They're not supposed to be fun." (Rated "PG"/93
min.)
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Lost World: Jurassic Park, The (1997)
     THE LOST WORLD made me sweat, which may be the highest compliment
that I can pay to what's really just a jokey, at-times-intentionally
hokey monster movie.  For better or worse, the Master (again along with
writer David Koepp, loosely adapting from Michael Crichton's best-
selling screenplay, er, novel) has simply cut and pasted the same scare-
tactics from the first film:  thud scream chomp run repeat.  Only, this
time, there's more.  More mechanical dinos.  More high-tech toys to
smash.  More humans getting gobbled, from the four-person research team
sent to Site B (a *second* island, where the creatures have been running
amok for four years) to the band of big-game hunters, who are also on
hand.  Same-o same-o, really, but with a handful of changes and one up-
roarious final sequence, set on the streets of... well, now, that would
be telling!
     The most noticeable change in Steven Spielberg's sequel is that
it's darker than the original, both literally (photography) and
figuratively (tone).  There's more death, though most of the munching
occurs off-screen.  (What you *do* see, you won't forget.  Such as, heh,
two Tyrannosaurii playing "wishbone.") And there's more humor.  Jeff
Goldblum, still wearing black leather in the tropics, gets off a good
number of sarcastic quips and exasperated asides.  ("She can't not
touch," he exclaims when his paleontologist girlfriend pets a baby
stegosaurus.) The other human actors (Julian Moore as said girlfriend,
Pete Postlethwaite as the Great White Hunter, etc.) are less funny and
largely less interesting.  Those stars with the *least* personality,
however, are the dinos.  Rex Galore exhibits nothing in the way of wit,
intelligence, or good manners, and, frankly, if they didn't keep killing
people and smashing stuff, this would be one boring amusing ride.  Which
it isn't, unless you're expecting something other than a give-them-what-
they-say-they-want sequel.
     My dinosaur bones of contention are few and far between.  The over-
lighting at the beginning is a bit distracting.  As are most of Spiel-
berg's trademark reaction shots.  (I would submit that *any* shot that
gets in-between the good stuff and more good stuff is counter-productive
to a creature-feature's best intentions.) So, no, the sequel to the
highest grossing film of all time isn't exactly the leanest thing on
either two or four legs.  Nor is it entirely mean.  Despite the darker,
harder edge-- for a pleasant change, a Disaster Movie Dog *doesn't* make
it out alive-- THE LOST WORLD is very much a corporate-sponsored family
film.  And while it does push the "PG-13" rating to new limits, this
WORLD is still *way* too nice.  No mass death.  No chunks of gore.  No
ordnance-induced animal control.  By, hey, it may make you sweat!

Title
Review for Brady Bunch Movie, The (1995)
     THE BRADY BUNCH MOVIE is less a motion picture than a minor pop
event.  Forget your reruns and forget your Nick at Nite; this dead-on
recreation of the fabled seventies sitcom is both so exhilarating *and*
so disturbing that you half-expect to see the ghost of Rod Serling
appear in the narrative.
     Did we really act this way twenty years ago?  Of course not.  The
genius of THE BRADY BUNCH MOVIE is how it heightens the surreality of
the Family Unit From Hell by fast-forwarding them into the future.
It's 1995 and Greg still calls the chicks "groovy," and Marsha still
considers hair-brushing the high point of her day.  Bell bottoms are
in, and Alice has yet to move out.
     Nothing has changed within the garish walls of Brady Manor and,
so, the plot has the family stepping out into the real world, where
they are confronted by everything from carjackers to lesbians.
Granted, nothing *too* serious happens here.  With the exception of
some heavy sexual innuendo, THE BRADY BUNCH MOVIE is about as sanitary
as the source material.  And that's too bad.
     Director Betty Thomas (of TV's "Hill Street Blues" fame) doesn't
cut between real-life and Brady-life enough to make the contrast as
glaring as it should be.  The edge isn't sharp enough.  *We* know that
what we're watching is funky, though, so it's not that much of a
problem.
     Nor are the glaring low production standards.
     The cast is uniformly appealing.  Shelly Long seems to have found
her niche under awful hair, while Gary Cole is right on the mark with
Dad's sing-song truisms.  Christine Taylor is the best of the Brady
kids.  She's a cheery delight as Marsha *and* is a dead ringer for
Maureen McCormick.  Her foil is Jennifer Elise Cox, who is a howl as
the brooding Jan.

Title
Review for Spitfire Grill, The (1996)
     When faced with watching a movie that is so utterly uninteresting
and entirely uninvolving, what is the sane person to do?  Well, you can
yawn and stretch and scratch your parts and read your watch and, if
you're lucky enough to be armed with a notepad, translate your miseries
into hand-written musings.  The torture doesn't end, though, until you
leave the theater, which is exactly what I wish I'd done during THE
SPITFIRE GRILL.  This butt-numbing tear-jerker stars newcomer Alison
Elliott (THE UNDERNEATH) as a stranger in a small Maine town, recently
released from prison and now working at a local diner.  Her alien
presence-- or is it her seeming aversion to shampoo?-- sets the entire
town on its ear, which then gives the Crusty Diner Owner Widow Mother
with the Bad Back (Ellen Burstyn) a chance to start sticking up for her.
Yawn.  This one won an award at the Sundance Film Festival and, frankly,
I'd like to know what they were smoking.  The hazy lighting, suffocating
score, dueling accents, eye-rolling monologues, and story surprises that
you can see coming from a mile off were all too much for me.  But what
do I know?  The audience that I saw this with cried, clapped, and, in
later scenes, cheerfully talked back to the screen.  You go girls.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Twelve Monkeys (1995)
(Uni)
Directed by    Terry Gilliam
Written by     David Webb Peoples and Janet Peoples, inspired by the
               film LA JETEE by Chris Marker
Cast           Bruce Willis, Madeleine Stowe, Brad Pitt, Christopher
               Plummer, Frank Gorshin, David Morse
MPAA Rating    "R" (presumably for language and violence)
Running Time   130 minutes
Reviewed at    General Cinemas at Pleasant Valley, Raleigh, NC (3JAN96)
     This wild, weird time-travel tale is equal parts fantasy and 
figment.  Once again, director Terry Gilliam (BRAZIL, THE FISHER 
KING) is charting the waters of madness.  Both in his vision of a 
decimated future-- where 99% of the human race has perished in a 
plague, forcing the survivors to live underground-- and in his 
portrayal of a man sent from that future to save what's left of the 
human race.  The man in question is Cole (Bruce Willis), a convict 
from 2035 who is sent to present-day and, upon arrival, is promptly 
placed in a mental institution.  Sound familiar?
     Writers David and Janet Peoples-- working from Chris Marker's 
1962 short LA JETEE-- have written a strapping sci-fi saga that 
wouldn't be out of a place as a TERMINATOR sequel.  Terry Gilliam, 
of course, isn't interested in simple, slick story mechanics.  He has 
something else in mind.  Literally.  Gilliam takes us *inside* of 
Cole's head, to watch as he becomes increasingly disoriented by his 
continued trips between "realities."  What is real?  The question 
is a recurring theme in 12 MONKEYS, and one that is ultimately left 
to the discretion of the viewer.  Even after the dust of a dynamite 
finale has cleared, all the answers do *not* stand revealed.
     The challenges of this movie are numerous.  In addition to the 
paradoxes of the plot, there's the shock and disorientation from 
stepping into Gilliam's "distorted reality."  Skewered camera 
angles and exaggerated close-ups are the norm, here.  With the 
exception of Bruce Willis, the actors all play human cartoons.  
Madelene Stowe transforms from a short-skirted psychiatrist to 
Cole's raving accomplice.  Brad Pitt is a marvel of twitches and 
tics as a cross-eyed mental patient.  Even old pro Christopher 
Plummer, as a virologist, gets to play with a preposterous Old 
South southern accent.
     The barrage continues with an array of film clips, pop songs, 
Hitchcock allusions, and other symbolism.  Blink and you'll miss 
something spectacular-- such as the shot of a department-store 
angel rising behind Stowe.  Gorgeous.  With a superb production 
design and stunning art direction-- based, apparently, on the color 
of mucus-- it all adds up to a welcome assault on the senses.  In 
an era when motion picture have become too safe for their own good, 
it's nice (and downright exciting) to see a movie that goes in so 
many directions at once, and still lands on its feet.  Thank God 
for Terry Gilliam. 
--
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit the MOVIE HELL site http://www-nvision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Volcano (1997)
     You know, I used to think that firefighting, a former occupation of
mine, was the perfect job for a problem solver.  That was before meeting
Mike Roark, director of Los Angeles' Office of Emergency Management.  As
played by Tommy Lee Jones, this guy has one *heck* of a problem on the
city's hands:  orange stuff is spewing from the La Brea Tar Pits and
oozing it's way down Wilshire.  Palm trees are aflame, fire trucks are
melting, and these nasty little things called lava bombs (what, you
didn't see DANTE'S PEAK?) are ruining everybody else's day.  Oh, what to
do, what to do?
     Now, since Mr. R. is a Hollywood construct, he's also a single dad,
who's supposedly on vacation with his surly daughter, and both of whom
just happen to be riding by The Pits when they erupt.  (You can decide
if the story has more fuzzy logic or convenient coincidences.) His part-
ner in grime is a plucky geologist ("get me a scientist!" he hilariously
barks and is handed Anne Heche), who tried to warn him, yesterday, that
something in the rock might be ready to roll.  (Had he heeded her warn-
ing, we wouldn't have a movie.  Or, for that matter, the once-in-a-
lifetime chance to see Ms. Heche wearing a silver, heat-reflecting
suit.)
     In a perfect world of guy movies, VOLCANO would be all about how to
divert the lava, extinguish the fires, triage the casualties, and save
the city.  Director Mick Jackson (L.A. STORY), obviously bored by such
linear thinking, has more on his mind.  He's included a hokey moral
message (black and white is gray, when covered with ash), some classic
camp (how else to explain yet another dog barking at lava?), and plenty
of homage to the city that, admit it, you're happy to see burn.  (My
favorite bit:  a Metro employee reading a book on writing screenplays 
that sell.)  All of this-- in-jokes, action sequences, cornball drama, 
and spectacular special effects-- is compressed into an exhilaratingly
exhausting 105 minutes.  If you don't shut down from sensory overload,
you should be entertained.

Title
Review for Feiying gaiwak (1990)
     The "new" Jackie Chan film has one ingenious, arguably brilliant
sequence.  It happens at the end of the movie, in an old WWII wind
tunnel, built by the Nazis and buried somewhere in the Sahara, along
with a fortune in stolen gold.  (240 tons worth, if you can stand it!)
Chan's character, a super-spy adventurer with the code name Condor, is
squaring off against a pair of mercenaries, two of several villains who
want the gold for themselves.  The three combatants get tossed and
turned and slammed against walls and sucked toward giant propellers and,
at times, appear to hover in midair.  It's a great bit that's better
lit, better paced, and more meticulously edited than any other action
sequence in the film.  Alas, the rest of OPERATION CONDOR is strictly
lower-grade J.C.  Wacky dubbing and frantic editing are the chief
culprits, both of which may be attributable to the repackaging process.
(Chan, who also directed, trimmed some 13 minutes from the original,
which was released as ARMOR OF GOD II in 1991.) His sense of humor is
still a strong selling point and, with a "story" that takes place on
three continents, the accompanying scenery is quite nice.  I just wish
he'd staged that motorcycle sequence better.  I couldn't tell if that
was him in every shot or not.

Title
Review for Mr. Holland's Opus (1995)
     Any motion picture that promotes music appreciation is well-deserv-
ing of a look, arguably even one as excruciatingly slow and predictably
dopey as MR. HOLLAND'S OPUS.  Agony is the best word to describe sitting
through Stephen Herek's 144-minute epic of a minor scale.  The story
charts 30 years in the life of high-school music teacher Glenn Holland
(Richard Dreyfuss), from the inevitable first-year frustrations right on
up to the only-in-the-movies appreciation-at-retirement rally.  Though
credible as a honest-- if rather tidy-- portrait of the educational
process, the movie goes flat when scoring the weepy melodrama of Hol-
land's family life.  (The ads reveal a son who's born deaf and you can
take it from there.)
     Ignoring the deeper issues in Patrick Sheane Duncan's script, Herek
opts for an OPUS that's part fantasy.  Such as a school orchestra that
sounds like seasoned studio players, or the magical acceptance of a
teenaged son who has been terribly ignored through his life by his
father.  (Or even the small fact that we never see much evidence of
*Holland's* impact on his student's lives.  We only see how they affect
*him*.  How selfish.) And it only gets worse, quickly proving that more
than just fairy dust is missing here.
     The integration of the music is particularly horrid.  Instead of a
*real* review of the classics, we get a bit of Bach, a handful of old-
ies, and an overdose of overblown orchestrations from composer Michael
Kamen.  Ugh.  The lack of snap is equally abominable.  Even the most
patient for a good cry will likely find their bottoms growing sore long
before their tear ducts do.  Thank goodness for the solid work of
Richard Dreyfuss.  Wearing a great make-up job that successfully spans
three decades, Dreyfuss gives a workmanlike performance that even
survives him having to sing "Beautiful Boy." Who knows, he may just win
a nomination.
     Slow, sappy, and shameless, MR. HOLLAND'S OPUS is Hollywood happily-
ever-after as only Hollywood can make it.  The masses will probably eat
this stuff up and, judging from the weekend grosses, they already have.
Take Grandma; take the kids, and then run like hell for the door. 
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit the MOVIE HELL site http://www-nvision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Mouse Hunt (1997)
     Though closer to consistently amusing than non-stop, fall-down fun-
ny, the first family film from Dreamworks is a slight delight.  Nathan
Lane and British comic Lee Evans play a pair of bickering, bumbling
brothers, trying to rid a prized old mansion of a mouse.  A very *smart*
mouse.  Slapstick ensues (vacuum versus sewage line, lit match versus
natural gas, etc.), but not nearly as much as the ads suggest.  (Nor as
hilarious as expected, either.  Have such shenanigans become too common-
place, after three HOME ALONE movies?)  Significant screen time is also
devoted to the rodent's POV, in several FX-intensive sequences set in-
side the walls of this old house.  Younger kids *may* grow restless dur-
ing the film's talkier bits, such as the brothers' ongoing efforts to
sell the ancient (but fully functioning) string factory that they also
inherited from their recently deceased father (William Hickey, looking
delightfully decrepit in his final screen role).  That said, whatever
the wee ones miss in dialogue, the exceptional visuals should still keep
them spellbound.  (My favorite, next to the sight of Lane's exaggerated
eyebrows, is the one-two punch of Phedon Papamichael's dark photography
and Linda DeScenna's goofy-Gothic production design.  We're talkin' Tim
Burton territory, here.)  And, parents, be forewarned about the City
Pound scenes, where Laurel and Hardy look to snatch "one mean pussy."
After the kids see *those* conditions, you'll never be able to get rid
of another pet again.  Get me my Gouda.

Title
Review for Escape from L.A. (1996)
(Paramount)
Directed by    John Carpenter
Written by     John Carpenter, Debra Hill, and Kurt Russell
Cast           Kurt Russell, A.J. Langer, Steve Buscemi, Georges
               Corraface, Stacy Keach, Michelle Forbes, Pam Grier, Jeff
               Imada, Cliff Robertson, Valeria Golino, Peter Fonda
MPAA Rating    "R" (presumably for language and violence)
Running Time   100 minutes
Reviewed at    General Cinemas at Pleasant Valley, Raleigh, NC (9AUG96)
     In this better-late-than-never sequel to his 1981 cult classic
ESCAPE FROM NEW YORK, director John Carpenter has envisioned the future
of Los Angeles as an island penal colony for America's least wanted.  In
the year 2013, any citizen caught engaging in acts illegal, immoral, or
fattening is expelled from the country.  That is, unless they choose
electrocution over deportation.  Zap.  Into this picture steps "Snake"
Plissken (Kurt Russell), that one-eyed, whispering wonder who, again, is
in the custody of the United States Police Force.  Like last time, the
deal goes something like this:  Snake has ten hours to land on Los
Angeles Island, recover a mysterious "black box" that was stolen by the
President's radical daughter, and return with the goods in hand.  If
he's a good boy, he'll be given both a pardon and an antidote to the
deadly virus that he's been intentionally infected with.  Sound
familiar?
     In addition to the ripe right-wing references and about a thousand
brutal barbs aimed at Southern California-- how well will jokes about
aftershocks, immigrants, and plastic surgery play in Peoria, anyway?--
we're also treated to such schlocky sights as a collapsed Capital
Records building, a sunken Santa Monica Freeway, and an underwater
Universal Studios.  Just ask for Babs.  The tone is expectedly tongue-
in-cheek and a spirit of anarchy pervades nearly every scene.  And, yet,
even with a super-cool supporting cast (Peter Fonda, Steve Buscemi, Pam
Grier, to name a few), the movie just doesn't *move*.  Call it what you
will-- flat, under-powered, a long sit, slower than a slow-moving white
Bronco-- but ESCAPE FROM L.A. is a risky recommendation at best.  Unless
you're a fan of the original, you might want to skip this one.
--
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Jade (1995)
(Par)
Directed by    William Friedkin
Written by     Joe Eszterhas
Cast           David Caruso, Linda Fiorentino, Chazz Palminteri, Michael
               Biehn, Richard Crenna
Running Time   Too Long
MPAA Rating    "R" (Presumably for sex, violence, and profanity)
Reviewed at    Mission Valley Cinemas, Raleigh, NC (14OCT95)
     It takes talent to write a movie that's even less impressive than
SHOWGIRLS.  Heaven help us, but original scribe Joe Eszterhas has done
just that.  Hollywood's [choose one: horniest/hairiest/highest-paid]
writer has concocted a "psychological thriller" that's even more absurd
than his last month's appearance on "Larry King Live."  The plot--a
District Attorney caught in a love triangle with a murder suspect--is
so convoluted that even director William Friedkin (THE FRENCH
CONNECTION) is reduced to copying car chases from better movies.  And
you thought killer lesbians were bad?  Try Linda Fiorentino as a
clinical psychologist moonlighting as a high-class hooker!  ["But he
won't take the medicine, Doctor."]
     JADE is a loss and barely worth the breath to balk at.  Like that
other guy, Eszterhas will be acquitted soon enough.  He'll work in this
town again.  (Though maybe no longer without a rewrite!) If there's
*any* fun to be had, it's imagining how the Hirsute One would've
adapted THE SCARLET LETTER.  Let's see ... a blonde Hester Prynne
brutally murders the Reverend Dimmesdale after he discovers her lesbian
love affair with Harriet Hibbins.  For her punishment, she's sold to
the Indians and forced to perform nightly at the New World's newest
nightspot, the Totem Pole.
Who's to say what's a sin in Joe's eyes? 

Title
Review for Booty Call (1997)
     BOOTY CALL is a hilarious primer on safe sex, with Jamie Foxx and
Tommy Davidson as best buds told "no glove, no love" by their equally
eager counterparts (Vivica Fox and Tamala Jones).  The boys' quest to
acquire that which must be worn-- and which must be found in the middle
of the morning and in Chinatown, no less-- leads to a predictable, but
roll-on-the-floor funny comedy of errors.  (Davidson's tug-of-war with a
dog is a classic.  And don't miss an unbilled Art Malik as one of two
punning Punjabi grocers.) Though slow in spots, only the last half-hour
is tedious.  That's when the movie moves into a hospital.  Groan.
Still, *some* medical attention may be necessary, as there's a strong
likelihood that you'll laugh your ass off.  
     BOOTY CALL was screened at General Cinemas at Pleasant Valley in
Raleigh on 3/8.  Understaffed, as us- ual.  And screen #7 stinks of
mold, from four rows of water-damaged chairs.  Ugh.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC, USA, Earth
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
I'm also on the Web!  http://www.pagesz.net/~legeros/

Title
Review for Chain Reaction (1996)
     Director Andrew Davis reworks his FUGITIVE formula and the results
are about as exciting as his last film-- the dreadful comedy STEAL BIG,
STEAL LITTLE-- was funny.  Keanu "I'd rather play music than play
another action hero" Reeves is the grad student on the run, who, along
with his superfluous sidekick (Rachel Weisz), has been framed for a
sabotaged science experiment that vaporized eight Chicago city blocks.
(The mushroom-cloud explosion is a knock-out and easily the best part of
the movie.  Or, as one audience member succinctly summed it up: "whoa.")
False information implicates their involvement and boy and girl are soon
on the run, fleeing over open drawbridges, across icy lakes, and through
the corridors of power at a top-secret, underground energy facility.
Aiding and abetting is the team's shady mentor, played in an
excellent-but-so- what performance by Morgan Freeman.  (Brit Brian Cox
is also about, as the behind-the-scenes bad guy.  He has some fun
fiddling with a Southern accent.) Unfunny, overscored, and without a
single shred of suspense, CHAIN REACTION is *the* summer movie to walk
out on.  If you make it to the end, a mess of cross-cutting involving
another imminent explosion, you'll hear somebody say "I guess it's time
to go." Heed that warning.  
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Corrina, Corrina (1994)
Written and directed by Jessie Nelson
Cast Whoopi Goldberg, Ray Liotta, Tina Majorino, Joan Cusack, Don Ameche (!)
MPAA Rating     "PG"
Running Time    Approx. 120 minutes
     Naming a movie after a song is dangerous business, but CORRINA,
CORRINA swings almost as well as its namesake.  This enjoyable comedy
from the fifties stars Ray Liotta as a just-lost-mom dad with an
8-year-old daughter (Tina Majorino) who has stayed mute (or, ahem, mum)
ever since since the funeral.  Only after he hires maid Corrina (Whoopi
Goldberg), does life return to both his daughter and his home.
     CORRINA, CORRINA is clunky as all get-out, with some glaring
anachronisms and way-too-broad humor, such as Joan Cusack arriving in
padding (!) as Nanny Number One.  Director Jessie Nelson shoots every
other shot like a home movie and that's doesn't help much, either.  The
story picks up in the second hour, though, when the characters suddenly
"click."
     Liotta is good as the vulnerable father--the actor has a subtle
range that's worth watching here.  Goldberg is also good, though her
uncharacteristic (for that era) combination of "smarts 'n' sass" take a
little longer to get used to.  Majorino, as the daughter, is precious.

Title
Review for She's So Lovely (1997)
(Mirimax)
Directed by     Nick Cassavetes
Written by      John Cassavetes
Cast            Sean Penn, Robin Wright Penn, John Travolta, Harry Dean 
                Stanton, Debi Mazar, James Gandolfini, Gena Rowlands
MPAA Rating     "R" (presumably for language)
Running Time    100 minutes
Reviewed at     The Garner Towne Square 10, Garner, NC (31AUG97)
     Sean and Robin Wright Penn star as Mr. and Mrs.  Soused, a pair of
substance-abusing, a-few-shots-short-of-a-full-bottle barflies who are
so very much in love that neither an extended stay in a mental hospital
(for him) or divorce, remarriage, and kids (for her) can keep them apart
for long.  They're the most memorable characters in this engrossing (and
ultimately absurd) actors showcase, the centerpiece of which is Mr.
Penn's riveting, Cannes award-winning performance.  Forrest Gump's
girlfriend is quite good, as well, anchoring the film-- or the first
hour, at least-- with a compelling study in skank.  (And you thought the
cast of CAREER GIRLS were strangers to shampoo!) Also on hand is John
Travolta, who cusses and fusses through a late appearance as the
exasperated second husband.  (He's quite funny and gets off the best
line in the film, telling his character's pre-teen daughter to "shut up
and drink your beer.") As for the story, well, seeing is disbelieving.
Sure, the film's first half is easy-going enough, but after ten years
pass and loverboy returns to reclaim his wife, we're told nothing about
her, or how she's doing, or what she's thinking, or why she's be-bopping
out the door five seconds after attempting to slit her wrists.  It's a
baffling turn of events that rivals CONSPIRACY THEORY for sheer second-
hour suckiness.  Directed by Nick Cassavettes (UNHOOK THE STARS), from
his late father's unproduced screenplay.

Title
Review for Naked Gun 33 1/3: The Final Insult (1994)
     NAKED GUN 33-1/3: THE FINAL INSULT is hilarious.  Period.  Fans of
the series are advised to wear protective undergarments as these
further exploits of Lt. Frank Drebin *may* inspire fits of uncontrolled
urination.
     But seriously folks, the film is just as funny as the first GUN
sequel in which Babs Bush got hers.  This time it's Oscar-bashing and
not a moment too soon!  Leave it to former Police Squad detective Lt.
Frank Drebin (Nielsen) to come out of retirement to help stop a
terrorist (Ward) bent on bombing the Academy Awards.
     Once again, the gags are non-stop and NAKED GUN 33-1/3 spoofs
everything from "Beavis and Butthead" to "The Brady Bunch."  Blink and
you'll miss a mention to STAR WARS or STALAG 17.  More obvious are the
references to recent films like THELMA AND LOUISE and JURASSIC PARK.
     There's also an obligatory 70s flashback, a great sperm-sample
bit, and an untouchable UNTOUCHABLES send-up that Sergei Einstein
should've lived to see.
     Joke for joke, it's the best stupid laugh-fest since HOT SHOTS!
PART DEUX.
     The downside is that the series is showing signs of strain.
Technical credits are weak, from editing to production design.  The
cast is a loss--neither Presley nor Simpson nor Kennedy is very funny.
As the villain, Fred Ward is hardly a worthy successor to Ricardo
Montalban or Robert Goulet.  And the line between Nielsen's dandy
deadpan and boffo buffoonery is wearing mighty thin these days.
     The irony, of course, is that the NAKED GUN films have *never*
been as funny as the TV series that inspired them. "Police Squad!" ran
for exactly six episodes in 1980 and was promptly cancelled.  The
original adventures of Lt. Frank Drebin were just as funny as the
creator's hit film AIRPLANE!, but viewers couldn't handle the lack of a
laugh track.
     On the Zucker/Abrahams/Zucker hierarchal scale of hilarity, NAKED
GUN 33-1/3 ranks about the same as NAKED GUN 2 1/2 and both HOT SHOTS!
films.  But they all pale in comparison to AIRPLANE!, "Police Squad!,"
and, even, TOP SECRET!

Title
Review for Bad Boys (1995)
(Columbia)
Directed by     Michael Bay
Written by      Michael Barrie, Jim Mulholland, Doug Richardson
Cast            Martin Lawrence, Will Smith, Tea Leoni, Tchkeky Karyo,
                Joe Pantoliano
MPAA Rating     "R" (presumably for violence and language)
Running Time    118 minutes
Reviewed at     General Cinemas at Pleasant Valley, Raleigh (8APR95)
     In the exaggerated universe of big-budget action, comic timing is
everything.  Well-timed jokes between "buddy cops," for example,
provide the buffer against a subject matter that's, frankly, quite
brutal.
     Good comic chemistry also overrides structural flaws.  Formula not
working?  Who cares?  If the audience laughs, it's a hit.  The best
entries in the "buddy cop" genre have practiced this by teaming actors
who can be tough *and* funny.  Nolte and Murphy in 48 HRS.  Gibson and
Glover in LETHAL WEAPON.  Even Schwarzenegger and Belushi in the
underappreciated RED HEAT (1988).
     In BAD BOYS, comic Martin Lawrence and rapper Will Smith team-up
to act tough.  They play wise-cracking Miami narcotic cops who have 72
hours to catch the creeps that burgled their headquarters.  The
high-tech robbers stole a stash of heroin--from the boy's recent
"career bust"- and the force has three days to save face before the
feds move in.
     The formula isn't tweaked *too* far:  Lawrence is the hard-working
family man, while Smith is the single, rich kid with the $100K
Porsche.  The two are best-buddies, though, and their rapport is
*easily* the best thing about this film.  Just watch them breeze
through a sitcom subplot that has each one impersonating the other.
     BAD BOYS marks the return of producers Don Simpson and Jerry
Bruckheimer (BEVERLY HILLS COP).  To direct their super-slick product,
they hired newcomer Michael Bay.  He's from the world of music-video
and it shows.  BAD BOYS has more style than READY TO WEAR, but there's
no punch to the plot.  The director overpowers the narrative with so
much splash and flash that nothing has any impact.  How can you feel a
rush from so much slow-motion?
     The story doesn't make much sense, either.  Though vaguely
believable at first, BAD BOYS spirals toward absurdity until it reaches
a kitchen-sink finale that only a fan of John Woo could love.  When
everyone converges on a airplane hanger--hey, it was shown in the
previews!--it's every stunt double for themselves.

Title
Review for Kingpin (1996)
     If you don't mind the sickly sentimental streak, an obviously
bloated running time, and an exceptional lack of comic timing, then this
Amish bowling comedy is, uh, right up your alley.  Directors Peter and
Bobby Farrelly, who made DUMB AND DUMBER, could have retitled this one
GROSS AND GROSSER.  No joke is too low for these guys.  With its endless
references to semen, urine, vomit, and bowel movements, KINGPIN plays
like a potty-mouthed update of THE COLOR OF MONEY.  Woody Harrelson is
the pro, a one-time, one-handed bowling legend who spies an Amish lad
(Randy Quaid) with the Gift.  The plot puts them on the road to Reno,
where they have to hustle to pay for gas, beer, and other necessities.
Despite the numerous laugh-out-loud moments, as well as a couple of
classic sight gags, KINGPIN suffers from an absolute lack of momentum.
(You might even fall asleep in the slower second half.) The timing is
off in most places and the movie has an annoying habit of calling
attention to it's own jokes.  No subtlety here, but, then again, how
many other summer movies would dare put Randy Quaid in drag, on stage at
a strip club, impersonating Elizabeth Berkley?  
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Girl 6 (1996)
     Spike Lee's new comedy is a disjointed disaster that starts bad and
stays there.  Theresa Randle (BAD BOYS) plays an aspiring New York
actress who takes a phone-sex job as a way to make ends meet.  Soon, the
job becomes an adventure that, I think, is supposed to go something like
this:  girl excels at job, girl gets addicted to job, girl goes cold
turkey from job, and girl grows from having job.  Lee, who continues to
beat to a very different drummer, never makes this progression very
clear.  He's too busy inserting extraneous dream sequences and grainy
footage of the various male callers.  (One of the few funny bits has
Randle imagining herself as blaxploitation heroine Foxy Brown.  Shut
your mouth!) A steady stream of Prince plays on the soundtrack, while a
steady stream of cameos (Quentin, Madonna, Naomi, etc.) play before the
camera, and it all adds up to nothing.  Forget the Oscars; boycott this
movie!
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
MOVIE HELL is on the Web!  http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Things to Do in Denver When You're Dead (1995)
     If Albert Einstein watched this movie while traveling at the speed
of light, would he still think that three hours had passed instead of
two?  No, THINGS TO DO IN DENVER WHEN YOU'RE DEAD is not about time-
travel, but it *is* one of those unfortunate movies that makes you
feel like you've lived sixty more minutes than you actually have.  And
that's too bad, given the many interesting ingredients in this film that
never quite come together.
     Director Gary Fleder makes a mash of Scott Rosenberg's script about
a gang of usual suspects who botch a reunion job with disastrous
results.  Both his pacing and his framing of the story are way off.  The
cast is a pleasant distraction, sure, but only Treat Williams-- as the
resident psycho-- registers completely.  (He delivers a great monologue
while pissing into a milk jug!)  To be fair, Fleder does a good job of
keeping everything reeking of death.  The reaper is everywhere in DENVER
and it makes for a great, grim subtext.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
MOVIE HELL is on the Web!  http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Heaven's Prisoners (1996)
     This talky, terribly-plotted thriller stars Alec Baldwin as Dave
Robicheaux, an ex-New Orleans cop who gets ensnared in a murder- mystery
after a light-plane crashes into the bayou beside his fishing boat.  He
and his wife Annie (Kelly Lynch) rescue a little Salvadorian girl
(Samantha Lagpacan) from the wreckage and that's when the trouble
begins.  The other major players include a local drug lord (Eric
Roberts), his scheming wife (Teri Hatcher), a soused stripper (Mary
Stuart Masterson), and a shady DEA agent (Vondie Curtis Hall).  Everyone
knows everyone else and it makes for a collective that's curious but
never compelling.
     Based on the book by James Lee Burke, HEAVEN'S PRISONERS is so
badly plotted that entire *scenes* seem to be missing.  Early on, we
have no idea of why Dave and Annie keep the child to themselves.  Nor
how they eluded both the Coast Guard and the FAA.  Later, Dave is
reunited with a drug-abuser who appears seemingly clean and sober and
without any explanation.  Huh?  The whole movie is like this, perhaps
the result of some unkind cuts that happened during the eighteen months
that the film sat on the shelf.  Whatever the reason, somebody should
tell director Phil Joanou (FINAL ANALYSIS) to recut this mess.  In its
present form, HEAVEN'S PRISONERS runs only two hours plus change, but it
feels like four. 
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Angie (1994)
Directed by Martha Coolidge  
Written by Todd Graff, based on the novel "Angie, I Says" by Avra Wing
Starring Geena Davis
MPAA Rating "R" (presumably for adult-themed humor)
Running Time    Approx. 110 minutes
     ANGIE doesn't make a bit of sense.  Which is shame, considering how
likeable this Geena Davis vehicle really *is*.
     ANGIE is Angie Scacciapensieri (Davis), a Catholic/Italian/Brooklyn
gal with an okay boyfriend and a better job.  By day, she works for a
magazine.  By night, she dates a plumber.  (Named, what else?, Vinnie.)
The twist comes when the supposedly free-spirited Scacciapensieri gets
pregnant and doesn't want to get married.  Because, as she states,
"having a baby changes everything."  No duh.
     Which pits Angie against her family, her friends, and, ultimately,
herself.
     There's a *lot* to like about ANGIE.  There's good acting across
the board, from Mrs. Renny Harlin on down.  The
less-than-ethnic-looking Davis effortlessly carries the film.  She's a
striking actress *and*, as proven here, a dependable talent.  Some of
the better supporting players include James Gandolfini, Aida Tuturro,
and THE CRYING GAME's Stephen Rea as a love-interest.
     More importantly, the characters *feel* real.  As do (most of) the
situations.  The production values are good.  The timing is good.  All
in all, a very good effort.
     ANGIE never explains Angie.  Or, if you prefer, the film never
clearly explains who Angie *is.*  We know more of what *happens* to her
anything else.  In fact, Angie goes through enough dramatic situations
to fill *three* films.  Her monologue to an incubator, alone, should
send collective estrogen levels soaring.
     The story skimps in a couple other places.  Angie's reason for
leaving Vinnie is never made clear.  And her truck-stop transformation
late in the film, where she cuts all her hair herself, is barely
believable.
     Over-playing and unintentional omissions aside, there's enough
honest humor in ANGIE to amuse anyone.  Better bits include Angie
registering into the hospital as "Angie Scotchandsoda" and a
delivery-room scene complete with A CHORUS LINE.
     Ultimately, ANGIE feels like a "greatest hits" compilation from a
longer, stronger movie.  The early scenes work well, but the film goes
downhill, a bit, as the drama is played increasingly hard.  Like any
compilation, it's a pleasant experience even if none of the scenes,
good or not-so-good, ever tell us who Angie really is.  Which may leave
some viewers feeling hollow.
NOTE:   I don't know what is a funnier example of "intended audience."
        The "stay in school" PSA shown before SUGAR HILL?  Or the weepy
        Miramax trailers shown before ANGIE? :)

Title
Review for Toy Story (1995)
     Before the Ninja Turtles, the Transformers, and the Masters of the
Universe; before the Micronauts, the five-inch G.I. Joe's, and the STAR
WARS-action figures; before Sega, Nintendo, and Atari, there existed a
world of stranger, simpler things such as Slinky, Mr.  Potato Head, and
Etch-a-Sketch.  Mostly plastic, sometimes with a battery or two, these
were the *real* toys, the toys of our youth, and the toys "brought to
life" by Pixar Animation (in conjunction with Disney) in the
appropriately titled TOY STORY.  Both jaw- dropping and heart-warming,
the first fully computer-animated feature film is *the* holiday movie
to see.
     The animation is nothing short of stunning.  Plastic has never
looked so good, nor seemed as real.  *More* surprising are the story
dynamics, which raise the film above the level of a novelty piece, or
just another children's picture.  You know, for kids.  The charming
premise is that, when nobody's around, toys have lives all their own.
They fight, they frolic, and even suffer the occasional identity
crisis, especially when they think they *are* the action-figure that
they've been molded in the likeness of.  Like Buzz Lightyear (voiced by
Tim Allen), the gleaming spaceman with an impressive wingspan and a
chin to rival Jay Leno's.
     He's the new arrival in Andy's bedroom; a birthday gift that has
cloth-cowboy Woody (voiced by Tom Hanks) worried about losing the
much-coveted position of Andy's Favorite Toy.  So they bicker and feud,
and through a very amusing set of circumstances, end up *outside* and
lost in the "real world."  I won't say much more, except that a portion
of the plot involves a vicious next-door neighbor who tortures toys.
Deceptively simple and straight- forward, yet as adult as any of the
issues in CASINO or THE AMERICAN PRESIDENT.  There's also plenty of
activity on the fringe.  Small jokes pepper the film, such as a box of
"Binford Tools" that falls on Woody.  Just pay attention.
     Given the dubious moral messages that season the season's seasonal
releases, many may find themselves disarmed by the purity of essence
(POE?) in TOY STORY.  The tale is told from the viewpoint of someone
who loves toys.  Before the tie-in's were discussed; before the
marketing could be mustered; even before the ace casting was completed,
the gang at Pixar were creating the code that built the art that
brought their favorite toys to life.  The result is a such an
overwhelmingly fun movie, both so bold and so harmless, that it
deserves praise in any circles.  Even Bob Dole (and Baby Newt) could
enjoy this one.
--
Michael J. Legeros - Raleigh, NC        
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Check triangle.movies for weekly reviews from MOVIE HELL

Title
Review for Desperado (1995)
     Let's face it: since WATERWORLD floated by, the summer movie
season has grown *very* stale. With no new eye-candy for four weeks
straight, we've had to sustain ourselves on the quasi-nutritional value
of cheatin' husbands, traveling chocolate salesmen, and computer-
generated serial killers.  Sigh.  Thank God for DESPERADO.
     The freewheeling sequel to EL MARIACHI--director Robert
Rodriguez's notorious $7000 debut--stars a cool Antonio Banderas as the
returning Guitarist with No Name.  He's a man in black with revenge on
his mind, and an arsenal in his case.  (The woman he loved was killed
in the first film.) So, he spends the entire story shooting drug
dealers; sort of a Tex-Mex version of the Punisher, if you will.
     There isn't much of an emotional core to DESPERADO.  Rodriguez is
having too much fun finding new and innovative ways to pay homage to
John Woo.  (And Sergio Leone... and Sam Peckinpah...)  Some may wince at
the body count--at least 100 graphic killings is a fair estimate--but
it's all played for laughs.  Big, broad, Hispanic laughs that, for me,
recall the physical comedy of Blake Edwards and his PINK PANTHER
films.  Sick, slick fun.

Title
Review for Happy Gilmore (1996)
     Has it really been 16 years since CADDYSHACK?  In the better days of 
comedy-- yes, even the eighties-- the course was played a mix of seasoned 
pros and young upstarts, like Chevy Chase, Bill Murray, and Rodney 
Dangerfield.  Directors such as Harold Ramis (CADDYSHACK), Ivan Reitman 
(STRIPES), and John Landis (THE BLUES BROTHERS) were making very funny 
movies about very silly people, and *everybody* was having a good laugh.  
Now, too many years later, in what might be called the Chris Farley/Jim 
Carrey decade, the funniest person on the block is Adam Sandler.  Has it 
really come to this?
     Mr. Sandler, a player on TV's "Saturday Night Live," is actually 
pretty good here.  He stars as a hockey player wannabe whose supersonic 
slap shot lands him on the pro-golfing circuit.  His putts are a putz, but 
he can cross the green in a single stroke and his juvenile antics are 
bringing the highest ratings to the game in years.  There's also a 
grandmother involved-- and her tax money-- but HAPPY GILMORE is less a 
mission from God than just an excuse for Sandler to hit things.  Such as 
pucks, balls, and fellow golfers.
     Director Dennis Dugan (PROBLEM CHILD) does a great job of sustaining
momentum.  Though his timing is often off, the seemingly one-dimensional
story doesn't grow tiresome until the last twenty minutes.  Several
familiar faces also give a boost, including Christopher McDonald, Carl
Weathers, and Richard "Jaws" Kiel.  And don't miss Bob Barker in a
priceless bit that starts as a round of golf and ends up as a fist fight
with Mr. Sandler.  Come on down! 
     As co-written by Tim Herlihy (BILLY MADISON), HAPPY GILMORE has a
rather mean-spirited streak that most of my fellow audience members didn't
seem to mind.  They laughed at any occasion for Sandler to punch, slug,
hit, or curse somebody.  Only when I turned around in my seat, did I
realize the source of such support:  rows and rows of young males, all
wearing baseball caps.  There must have been a hundred of them. 
--
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
MOVIE HELL is on the Web!  http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Beverly Hills Cop III (1994)
Directed by John Landis 
Written by Steven E. de Souza, based on characters created by
        Danilo Bach and Daniel Petrie Jr.
Cast: Eddie Murphy, Judge Reinhold Hector Elizondo, Theresa Randle,
      Bronson Pinchot, Timothy Carhart, John Saxon, and Alan Young (!)
MPAA Rating     "R" (presumably for language and violence)
Running Time    103 minutes
     Second sequels suck.  No, not always, but they sure do
disappoint.  SUPERMAN III, GODFATHER III, ALIEN 3, LETHAL WEAPON 3,
and, now, proudly, shamelessly, BEVERLY HILLS COP III.
     Eddie Murphy is back as Axel Foley, that street-smart show-off who
can't seem to shy from Bevery Hills.  His target is the LA amusement
park Wonder World and Foley is hot on the heels of a murderer he met in
Detroit.  Giving him grief are the FBI and the BHPD, neither of whom
want Axel grease in their affairs.
     Seven years have passed since our last visit to the COP shop;
seven years of civil suits and bad press and all those things that have
officially nixed the notion of the Maverick Cop.  Can we *really*
believe that enforcement agencies would even *dream* of condoning
Axel's actions.  Of course not.
     As implausible as the premise plots, COP III works for a while.  The
pace is fast and the jokes are okay.  Murphy breezes through scenes
that are tame enough and lame enough to suggest that, maybe, hopefully,
bigger and better things are yet to come.
     Axel digs deeper into the ways and whys of Wonder World--courtesy
of a few too many unlocked doors--and the plot holes grow and grow and
grow until they swallow the film whole.
     Are we to believe, courtesy of a counterfeit subplot, that Axel
Foley can pull a digitized photo of himself out of thin air?  Or that
the "largest private police force in the country" doesn't have a soul
on their staff who can shoot straight?  Or that Axel and associates can
kill person after person without even batting an 'brow?
     The humor is sparse, but not absent.  A cute bit bags four
off-duty cartoon-characters playing poker under Wonder World.  And
there's a great scene where Murphy, dressed as an elephant (don't ask),
pushes a mouthy moppet into a fountain.
     For film fans, the director's trademark touches are few and
far-between.  If you *must* see the film, watch for a SWAT-team
send-up, a soul-music shoot-out, and, as usual, cameos from a drove of
directors including George Lucas, Joe Dante, John Singleton, and Barbet
Schroeder.
     Beyond Murphy's contractually efficient performance, Bronson
Pinchot has two scenes as Serge, now selling arms instead of art.
Judge Reinhold, back as Billy Rosewood, does a cute imitation of Jack
Webb.  And Hector Elizondo is agreeable as John Ashton's replacement
Jon Flint, the obligatory
family-man-character-with-nothing-else-to-do.
     The surprise find is former "Mr. Ed" second-banana Alan Young,
who plays Uncle Dave, designer and proprietor of Wonder World.  Leave
it Landis to inspire inspired casting.
LOOK:  Watch for a minor reference to George Pal's THE TIME MACHINE,
       which also starred Young.

Title
Review for Hudsucker Proxy, The (1994)
     THE HUDSUCKER PROXY is the most technically accomplished film that
you're likely to see this year.  And it's also the coldest.
     Courtesy of a believe-it-or-not partnership with producer Joel
Silver--whose films typically have high body-counts and low Roman
numerals--Minnesota twins Joel and Ethan Coen have gift-wrapped and
delivered their biggest tinkertoy-set film yet.  HUDSUCKER is just as
calculated as BLOOD SIMPLE, just as manic as RAISING ARIZONA, just as
showy as MILLER'S CROSSING, and just as stylish as BARTON FINK.
     It looks good and moves good and sounds good, but, for the first
time in five films, it feels awful.
     HUDSUCKER opens with a desperate young man stepping onto the ledge
of a skyscraper on a snowy New York New Year's Eve, 1958.  His name is
Norville Burnes (Robbins) and the story recounts how he came onto that
ledge of Hudsucker Industries.
     Fresh off the bus from Muncie, Indiana, Norville gets his start in
the mail room on the very same day that president Waring Hudsucker
(Durning) takes a flying leap from the 44th floor.  Or 45th, if you
include the mezzanine.  The executive board--headed by schemer Sidney
J. Mussberger (Newman)--wants to forestall a public takeover and
installs Norville as a puppet president to lower investor confidence.
The theory, of course, is that Norville is an idiot without an idea in
his head.  Said theory holds right up until the new head of Hudsucker
invents the hula hoop....
     The first half of HUDSUCKER moves just as quick as anything in the
Coen comedy RAISING ARIZONA.  Eye-popping gags and breathtaking
set-pieces whiz by at a breakneck speed that's good for a solid hour of
goofy giggles.
     (Not to mention the uncomfortable realization that the Winterland
Wunderkinds *throwaway* more tricks in one film than many directors use
in a lifetime.)
     Complimenting the visual wizardry is page after page of tart, ripe
dialogue that moves as fast as the film.  The Coens love old movies, no
duh, and everyone in HUDSUCKER hurries through their harangues.  Best
Blabbers are Jennifer Jason Leigh, as a reporter-in-disguise with a
Katheryn Hepburn accent, and John Mahoney as her editor.
     The characters in HUDSUCKER look sharp and talk smart--but, with
few exceptions, they never radiate much warmth or humanity.  Which is a
problem when the film slows and the characters stand revealed and the
story strives for a moral message.  Even *with* the Capraesque ending,
THE HUDSUCKER PROXY nevers really warms up.
     The last fifteen minutes of HUDSUCKER are a sheer delight as they
mark the return of a supporting character who beams with more life than
any of the prominent players.  Without spoiling the surprise, this
person is the *real* flesh and blood in a towering set of tinkertoys
and he makes you smile because he shows that there's at least a little
heart buried under all the ice.

Title
Review for Conspiracy Theory (1997)
     Phew, what a mess!  For his fifth collaboration with director Rich-
ard Donner (LETHAL WEAPON I-III, MAVERICK), Mel Gibson plays a
motormouth, maybe mentally ill New York City cabbie, Jerry, whose wild
conspiracy theories are all but ignored by Alice (Julia Roberts, acting
all serious), the Justice Department employee that he has a crush on.
She not interested, but another person is:  a CIA psychiatrist (Patrick
Stewart) who promptly kidnaps him.  Is one of Jerry's conjectures
correct?  *Is* the metal strip in the new $100 bill being used to track
your movements?  Is Oliver Stone still alive, because he cut a deal with
George Bush to spread *dis*information?  Is this movie really about
*any* of the crazed cabbie's theories?  No, no, and no.  As it turns
out, there's some other nonsense going on here, involving and revolving
around Jerry's background.  (Hint:  pay attention to an early scene
where Jerry blacks out and flashes back, in quick succession, to images
of an interrogation room, hypodermic needles, and Ms. Roberts herself.)
     The *initial* premise is pretty good and is played, for a while, at
a delightfully dizzying clip.  Mel is wider-open that we've ever seen
him and, if his character's relationship with Roberts' initially strains
credibility, their combined star power is blissfully intoxicating.  (The
highest wattage of the summer, perhaps?) Even when the plot contrivances
begin to intrude, the two remain a randy dandy screen pair.  There's a
great scene in Jerry's fortress, er, apartment, with Alice trying to act
casual as her hyperactive host tries to remember the combination to a
locked coffee bean container.  (Which he stores in another locked con-
tainer, his fridge.) Other hilarious moments, of which there are many,
include a trio of memorable convention-breakers, where Alice ditches a
tail, Jerry cold-cocks someone, and, later, eludes a foot pursuit, each
in a uproariously unexpected fashion.  (That's Donner's own LADYHAWKE
playing in the theater, BTW.)
     Let's see, other pleasures include... a brilliant title sequence, a
jazzy score from Carter Burwell, and the worth-paying-to-see sight of
Roberts pumping lead into one bad guy and slamming another's head into a
wall.  Oh, pretty woman!  Getting to the latter, however, requires
slogging through an increasingly overburdened and ultimately unappealing
story.  The last hour of CONSPIRACY THEORY devolves from tolerable to
torturous to almost unwatchable.  More stuff happens of the stupid shit
variety than is worth mentioning here, except, perhaps, for a late
sequence that has Alice locating Jerry in an abandoned wing of a mental
hospital by hearing his voice carrying through the air ducts.  And here
I thought it was wabbit season.  Good God, who rewrites these movies?
And do they arrive in nondescript black vehicles?

Title
Review for GoldenEye (1995)
     James Bond is back, thought not exactly as we remember him.  Sure,
the girls and gadgets are all there.  As are the pithy one-liners and
the over-the-top stunts.  Check.  What's missing is the level of
technical polish that has best-characterized the 31-year-old series.
Thrilling, but tiring; Bonded, but bloated, GOLDENEYE is only a
half-success.  (Half shaken, not stirred?) Director Martin Campbell
(CRIMINAL LAW, NO ESCAPE) has loaded the post-Cold War story with
*plenty* of delightful bits, ranging from Bond's sexy showdown in a
St.  Petersburg steambath, to a tank/car chase through those same
Soviet streets.  (The plot involves quite a bit of vehicular traffic,
actually.  Even the old Aston Martin makes an appearance!)
     The problem is that these scenes, the best scenes, never gel into
a cohesive whole.  GOLDENEYE is an exciting, episodic film that lacks a
singular vision.  For that reason, it's difficult to properly gauge
Pierce Brosnan's performance as Ian Fleming's master spy.  He seems to
have more verve than his most-recent predecessor, Timothy Dalton, but
the overstuffed story never gives the actor any room to breathe.  It's
fight, dash, scowl, kiss, repeat.  Over and over and over again.
     Too much action is only one of the problems in GOLDENEYE.  The
absurd opening--involving, among other things, the bungee jump shown
in the trailer--sets the precedent that nothing in the story shall be
taken seriously.  Nothing new there.  The trouble comes when Campbell
tries to insert real drama into this classy, cartoon reality.  It
doesn't work.  Equally uncomfortable is the amount of graphic violence
that we're shown.  Bond is quite the indiscriminate killer in this one,
and that harder edge isn't effectively balanced by the bigger, sillier
stunts.
     Other problems include Derek Meddings' too-obvious miniatures, a
boring score from Eric Serra, and a wandering POV that strays too far
away from our favorite secret agent.  The laughs are there, though,
thank God, and the supporting cast is impeccable.  Some of the surprise
scene-stealers include Jon Don Baker, as Bond's cranky American
contact, Robbie Coltrane (!), as an ex-KGB heavy, and Famke Janssen, as
the Russian villianess with killer thighs.  Literally.  Peter Lamont's
production design is also very good.  The best visual metaphor of the
year may just be Bond's nighttime meeting in eerie junkyard
(graveyard?) of fallen Russian monuments.  Startling.
BOTTOM LINE:  For the Bond franchise, and for Brosnan, it's a start.  

Title
Review for Speed (1994)
     Can you really take "too far" too far?  The producers of SPEED
don't think so.
     Audacious action doesn't get any better than SPEED, a non-stop
nail-biter about a SWAT-team specialist (Reeves), a brilliant bomber
(Hopper), and a bus rigged to blow when it slows below 50.  Cross DIE
HARD with AIRPORT and you're got the idea.
     SPEED stars Keanu Reeves, trying to look tough after his recent
upgrade from Most Excellent to Most Enlightened.  The dude can't do
drama, no duh, but he's nimble enough for the job. (From BUDDHA to
Bruce and he even does his own stunts!)  Bullock is a better bet as the
poor passenger with driving duties.  She showed her strength in
DEMOLITION MAN and, here, she's the best bargain on board.
     Dennis Hopper plays Dennis Hopper, chewing on scenery while
spitting out sentences like "Do not attempt to grow a brain." (Good
advice if there ever *was* any.)  Bill Pullman-lookalike Jeff Daniels
has a modestly meaty role as The Partner, while TERMINATOR 2 alumni Joe
Morton plays the commanding officer.
     The script, by Graham Yost, has enough humor to keep you smiling
while you're sweating.  Even better: the story never turns Reeves into
a wisecracking hero.  Thank you for small favors.
     Of course, the best bursts of SPEED are those without words.
     First-time director Jan DeBont--a former cinematographer who
handled such heavies as LETHAL WEAPON 3--gets everything right, from
the credits to the close.  And those details! Watch for the reflection
of a burning bus on a pay phone.  Or a banner beside Reeves that reads
"To avoid personal injury, do not stand in stepwell."
     As the stunts get bigger, the film only gets better.  Collisions,
explosions, and big-things-sent-flying.  Even the throwaway stunts are
spectacular.  Blink and someone's stepping from a speeding vehicle.
Blink and someone's dangling from an elevator car.
     Credit a pace that keeps you from thinking; credit some stunts
that just can't be faked.  Let ILM just *try* to duplicate the
simplicity of Reeves really jumping from car onto a moving bus.
     (If nothing else, SPEED is a *great* exercise in wish
fulfillment.  Who *hasn't* wished that they could barrel a bus around
slow drivers and through busy intersections?)
     SPEED could be reduced.  Earlier scenes run a bit too long and the
ending is clearly too much.  But, that's the joke.  The producers know
that *everything* in the film is too much and so they damn the torpedos
and take over-the-top right over-the-top.
     Nitpickers can enjoy the plot-holes, while the more, ahem,
"retentive" viewers will have a field day finding the continuity errors
that occur in nearly every scene.
     Except for the ending, all technical credits are tops.  Obvious
minatures and mangy mattes undercut the film's next-to-last scene.
But, by that point, who cares?  SPEED is a full-scale tinkertoy set
that makes the beginning of THE FUGITIVE look like a little Lionel
train.
     Twenty years ago, SPEED would've starred Charleton Heston, and
Karen Black, and George Kennedy.  No guns would've been needed--but a
plane would crash, and a nun would sing, and the girl would get kissed
at the end.
     But this is the Nineties and, with DIE HARD dollars still fresh on
the brain, set-piece *is* plot.  Add some fireworks, and blow a few
bombs, and it's Jennings Lang all over again.

Title
Review for Mr. Wrong (1996)
Very wrong.  Comedienne Ellen DeGeneres makes her feature-film debut in 
this astonishingly unfunny romantic comedy about a girl who can't get rid 
of a guy.  The male in question is Bill Pullman-- or is it Jeff 
Daniels?-- a well-to-do smoothy who initially sweeps DeGeneres off her 
feet, until his increasingly bizarre behavior labels him as a 
card-carrying member of the Psycho Squad.  Director Nick Castle (DENNIS 
THE MENACE) and writers Chris Matheson, Kerry Ehrin, and Craig Munson 
botch it big-time.  The script isn't tight enough; the tone isn't right 
enough; and the comedy isn't black enough.  (Most disappointing to me: no 
references to that other stalker movie, CAPE FEAR.)  Ms. DeGeneres makes 
a bright impres-sion, sure, but the rest of the cast barely registers.  
Joan Cusack is a loss as Pullman's crazed ex-girlfriend; Dean Stockwell 
makes no impression as the P.I. that Ellen investigates.  And so on.  
Skip it. 
--
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
MOVIE HELL is on the Web!  http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for City Hall (1996)
     This straight-forward corruption tale is wholly unremarkable, save
for a few good scenes and the occasional insight into the arena of
municipal politics.  Four writers-- including Nicholas Pileggi (CASINO)
and Paul Schrader (TAXI DRIVER)-- are credited with this Big Apple fable
of how a New York City Deputy Mayor (John Cusack) and his boss (Al
Pacino) deal the with the ever-expanding problems caused by the acci-
dental shooting of a young black boy in Brooklyn.
     The casting of Pacino is dead-on, but John Cusack is a loss.  He's
a lightweight and doesn't belong at the center of such a serious story.
The supporting cast-- which includes Danny Aiello and Martin Landau--
fares a little better, when the script isn't ignoring them.  (Aiello, in
particular, has a dandy confrontation with a mob boss played by Tony
Franciosa.) Director Harold Becker (MALICE) keeps everybody busy and
that adds to the illusion of dramatic tension, of which there is none.
Most disappointing is the missing sense of grandeur.  For such a big
town, CITY HALL sure feels small.
--
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
MOVIE HELL is on the Web!  http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Ace Ventura: When Nature Calls (1995)
     Warner Brothers has scored another marketing coup.  The one-two
punch was started in the summer, with the release of BATMAN FOREVER.
Trailers for ACE VENTURA 2 were bundled with the Bat, ensuring that
every Jim Carrey fan in the free world would know about the impending
sequel.  Carrey went on to win raves as the Riddler and the ever-wise
Warner chose Halloween as the release date for the video ($11.99 at
Wal-Mart); a mere two weeks before Carrey's return in this marketwise,
but misfired comedy.
     ACE VENTURA: WHEN NATURE CALLS is a painful reminder of just how
grating the rubber-faced comic can be when allowed to perform within an
uncontrolled environment.  He may have been brilliant under the
direction of Joel Schumacher, in BATMAN FOREVER, but, here, left to his
own devices, Carrey quickly wears out his welcome.  The opening
sequence is by far the best--an amusing spoof of CLIFFHANGER, with Ace
performing a mountain rescue of a stranded raccoon.  (You can guess
what happens to Mr. Paws.  Hint: it sounds like splat.)  The plot
quickly shifts to a temple in the Himalayas, and then to not-so-darkest
Africa, where Ace is on the case of a missing white bat.
     With his hair and limbs both wildly askew, Carrey flies through
his routine in about thirty minutes.  The rest of the film is just more
of the same.  Sure, the plot's linear, and the production values solid,
but where is the scripted humor to support Carrey's sloppy slathering?
Writer and director Steve Oderkerk provides precious few set-ups.
Instead, Carrey just mugs away, playing for the camera even when most
of it isn't funny.  The better gags have been shown in the ads, though
a bit with Ace emerging buck-naked from the backside of a mechanical
rhino is something to see.
     Though an arguable improvement over the original, ACE VENTURA:
WHEN NATURE CALLS is still a snooze for anyone over the age of ten.
The script is virtually devoid of wit.  Tribal MASK jokes?  Jerry Lewis
cameos?  Forget it.  If anything, the inexplicable presence of Simon
Callow (FOUR WEDDINGS AND A FUNERAL) and Bob Gunton (THE SHAWSHANK
REDEMPTION) suggests that working with Carrey is the classical actor's
ultimate challenge.  Just how long *can* they keep a straight face?
Michael J. Legeros - Raleigh, NC
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)

Title
Review for Fifth Element, The (1997)
     Here's a topic that will be debated on the newsgroups for the rest
of the summer:  is Luc Besson's spectacular sci-fi action/comedy/ love
story the most visually arresting film of the decade?  Could be.  Think
BLADE RUNNER meets BRAZIL in this magnificently multi-colored, multi-
cultural vision of the 23rd century.  Every image is an eye-popper and
not just the flying taxies or futuristic cityscapes.  Costumes, make-up,
even the smallest set decorations are stunning.  And yet, the special
effects-- the most seamless blend of mattes, models, and computer
animation that I can recall-- never once threaten to overpower the
narrative.
     Yeah, there's a plot.  Former fighter pilot-turned-New York cabbie
Korben Dallas (Bruce Willis) saves the life of an orange-haired beauty
(actress/model/recording artist Milla Jovovich), who is actually an
alien super-weapon, once stored on Earth, then removed from Earth, then
*returned* to Earth, to save the Earth from an approaching, planet-
sized, super-duper-evil-and-with-a-cherry-on-top menace.  So far?  Now,
to be activated, she (it?) requires the presence of four sacred stones,
which she doesn't have, and which a villainous industrialist (Gary
Oldman, bucktoothed and brandishing an outlandish Southern accent) is
also trying to get.  Got it?
     Based on a story that Besson started when he was sixteen, THE FIFTH
ELEMENT is likely to be the most cryptic of the summer blockbuster
wannabes.  (Actually, it's a French film that's been several years in
the making.  Does that qualify as standard summer fare?) Only the
slightest explanation is offered for the movie's major events, though,
admittedly, anyone with even a *modest* sense of sci-fi can extrapolate
what's what and which end is up.  The smaller story details, however,
are another matter.  Besson and Robert Mark Kamen's screenplay relies
heavily upon coincidence and that's all fine and dandy until you try to
think about it.  (I tried to make detailed sense of the plot and track
who was where and how they got there and almost had a brain hemorrhage
in the process.)
     Okay, so you may not understand even *half* of the story.  That's
fine.  THE FIFTH ELEMENT entertains in so many, many other ways.  Nearly
every character, for example, gets their turn at playing comic relief.
(So much comic relief that some scenes border on slapstick.) Ian Holm,
the ass-biter from BIG NIGHT, is very funny as a high priest who's also
the alien's contact person on Earth.  Later scenes with Gary Oldman are
often a howl, while latecomer Chris Tucker is a hyperactive scene-
stealer as the flamboyant radio personality Ruby Rhod.  (Imagine, if you
can, a cross between Dennis Rodman and the Artist Formerly Known as
Prince.  And then try not to scream.)
     At the end, Besson attempts to get serious with statements about
war and violence and man's bottom-line need for love.  The resulting
shift in tone, however, is too abrupt and turns the finale into a
fizzle.  (The sequence also feels rushed and the accompanying special
effects are hardly special.  This is a movie that needs a *big* finish,
which we don't get, and which may be on purpose.) I suspect that Besson
intended to end on a different note.  Maybe something more sentimental
than visceral.  Maybe a tug at the heart instead of a kick in the 'nads.
Had he paid more attention to plot comprehensibility, and not required
the viewer to work *quite* so hard to play along, we might've even felt
it.  

Title
Review for Shadow, The (1994)
     Mildly diverting Mexican horror film about an antique dealer who
stumbles upon the Cronos Device--a 400-year-old device capable of
bestowing immortality, among other nasty things.  Said dealer is
subsequently pursued by the nefarious nephew (Ron Perlman) of a
terminally ill industrialist.
     This very stylish film from director Guillermo del Toro won both
the Critic's Week Grand Prize at Cannes and the Mexican Academy Award
for Best Picture.  The occasional nods to David Cronenberg are fun, but
the story is both too slow and too simple to keep your butt from
joining the legions of the dead.
     Intriguing psychological drama about a super-successful young
architect (James Spader) on the rebound who meets, marries, and
     ultimately misjudges his so-called "dream lover" (Madchen Amick
from TV's "Twin Peaks").  Plot twists give plenty of pause, but the BF
(believability factor) is undercut by an awful make-up job that leaves
the leads looking way-too glamorous for this film.
     Third-rate SPINAL TAP spoof of ficitious rap group N.W.H.  The
jokes are okay, but writer/director/star Rusty Cundieff (HOUSE PARTY 2)
paints a terribly unflattering portrait of rappers by embracing the
very values that he's heckling.
     FEAR OF A BLACK HAT has a couple great gags--including the
hilarious explanation of why "the butt" is like society--but the
characters spend too much time pulling guns on each other to be truly
funny.
     Dreadfully dull romantic comedy about a Big Apple beat cop
(Nicholas Cage) who tips a waitress (Bridget Fonda) two million dollars
(from a lottery ticket that he split with her).  The atmosphere (New
York as New York) is great and Fonda is uniformly appealing, but Cage's
role is so ill-defined that he's neither a decent foil to Fonda nor a
solid center to the story.  Costar Rosey Perez is annoying as Cage's
annoying wife.
     Director Andrew Bergman once airlifted a planeload of flying
Elvises (Elvii?) in HONEYMOON AND VEGAS.  And wrote THE IN-LAWS.  Rent
those instead.
NOTE:  Film is third-tier on the Imitation Romantic Comedy scale, way
       behind SLEEPLESS IN SEATTLE (second-tier) and not even close to
       WHEN HARRY MET SALLY (top tier).
     Woof!  Rob Reiner's first dog of his directing career stars Elijah
Wood as a well-to-do eleven-year-old who decides that he's tired of his
unappreciative parents.  The inexplicably named North finds a lawyer,
declares himself a "free agent," and begins traveling the world for a
pair of "perfect" parents.
     The super-huge cast is a super-waste.  NORTH stars Jason
Alexander, Julia Louis-Dreyfus, Bruce Willis, Jon Lovitz, Alan Arkin,
Dan Aykroyd, Reba McEntire, Faith Ford, John Ritter, and, get this,
Kathy Bates, Graham Greene, and Abe Vigoda (!) as a trio of Eskimos.
Yow!  Believe it or not, only Willis emerges unscathed and that's no
small feat from a man who has buried more than one movie himself!
     Frankly, nearly everything that can go wrong in this film, does.
Period.  NORTH is not funny; NORTH is not charming; NORTH isn't even
interesting.
     Low-key, low-budget thriller about an out-of-work oilworker
(Nicholas Cage) mistaken for a hit man while drifting through a small
Wyoming town.  The quadruple-cross plot has Cage agreeing to kill a
man's wife (Lara Flynn Boyle), agreeing with *her* to kill her husband
(J. T. Walsh), and running into the *real* hitman (Dennis Hopper) on
the way out of town.
     The story is good and the pacing is right, but the film is
hampered by a half-effective cast.  Both Hopper and Walsh are worth
watching, but Cage is too intense.  He never lightens up enough to
infuse the story with the irony it rightly deserves.  Lara Flynn Boyle
is a loss.  Neither her character nor her chemistry with Cage are even
*remotely* believable.  Phew!
NOTE:  Film is also available on videocassette.
     Cross DICK TRACY with BATMAN, subtract $20-30 million, and you're
standing in THE SHADOW--the long-awaited update of the famous '30's
radio show.  The script is good--explaining both the character's origin
and his network of agents--and the cast is appealing.  The film could
use some richer characterizations, but only Penelope Ann Miller (as
Margo Lane) sticks out like a sore thumb.  She's awful.
     Other demerits include cheap FX, clumsy editing, and spotty
direction.  THE SHADOW *does* a great sense of humor, though.  After
all, how can film that costars Jonathan Winters, Peter Boyle, and Tim
Curry be all *that* bad?

Title
Review for Romeo + Juliet (1996)
     WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE'S ROMEO & JULIET is a version for the nineties,
with abbreviations in more places than just the title.  Fair Verona is
now Verona Beach, a sun-baked battlezone where all the young dudes carry
pistols, cruise the streets in low-riders, and pledge allegiance to one
of two rival gangs, er, households.  (An aerial shot says it all,
showing the names Montague and Capulet in giant letters across the tops
of their respective skyscrapers.) Early scenes are played at the pace of
a music video, with character introductions cunningly conducted through
the use of freeze-frames and title cards.  Down Under director Baz
Luhrmann (STRICTLY BALLROOM) sends his camera spinning in every
conceivable direction, sometimes sped-up, sometimes in slow-motion.  His
hyperkinetic style is intoxicating, but there's a catch:  the characters
speak in iambic pentameter and not always that well.
     The language that you learned to hate in high school spills from
many an untrained mouth.  Bill's banter is spoken, shouted, mumbled,
fumbled, and ultimately drowned out by the many sounds of the street.
No problem at first, in those explosive early scenes, such as a gas-
station shoot-out shot like a Hong Kong spaghetti western.  When the
director calms down-- and he does, regrettably-- the movie also slows
down and the badly delivered dialogue starts to sink the story, instead
of anchoring it.  (Of the young actors, only Claire Danes seems to know
what she's doing.  The best thesps over thirty are Vondie Curtis-Hall's
local police captain and Pete Postlethwaite's Father Laurence.) Another
problematic point is the plot, which isn't entirely believable by
contemporary standards.  (Romeo is sentenced to "banishment?" Huh?  And
why doesn't Juliet just run away from home?) A grand failure, yes, but
at least one that's great fun to watch.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC, USA, Earth
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Forrest Gump (1994)
Directed by     Robert Zemeckis
Written by Eric Roth, based on the novel by Winston Groom
Cast Tom Hanks, Sally Field, Gary Sinese, Mykelti Williamson, and
     Robin Wright
MPAA Rating     "PG-13" (but *filled* with adult references, including
                         drug use, sexual references, and profanity)
Running Time    140 minutes
     FORREST GUMP is a supremely entertaining triptych of American
history, circa 1950 through 1980, as seen through the eyes of the
slow-witted title character.  From racial integration to Watergate,
there stands Gump (Hanks).  He never knows exactly what's going on, but
his big heart and good intentions eventually make him a millionaire.
He even meets three presidents, courtesy of ILM's gee-whiz special
effects that place Tom Hanks in the middle of historical footage.
     Think BEING THERE meets ZELIG as THE WORLD ACCORDING TO GUMP.
     Forrest Gump, IQ of 75, resident of rural Alabama, was born into
braces.  Leg braces, that is.  As the story opens, Forrest is being
fitted to fix a back that's "as crooked as a politician." But Gump runs
right out of those braces and once he starts running, he never stops.
He runs through college on a football scholarship. He runs through
Vietnam and is wounded in action.  He even runs across country to
become a folk hero.
     The script, by Eric Roth from the Winston Groom novel, places Gump
at the center of nearly every major event of the "baby boomer" era.  He
meets everyone, from Elvis Presley to Richard Nixon (The King to The
Crook?), travels everywhere, and even invents the phrase best
translated as "ka-ka occurs."
     Where the fun comes is from hearing what Gump to has to say about
all these things. His reactions are priceless--in Vietnam, he recalls
"we were always looking for this guy, Charlie"--and add a wealth of
honest humor to a rather humorless period of American history.
     The anchor, the center, the thing-that-holds-this-film-together is
Tom Hanks, giving a command performance in the title role.  He draws
upon that deadpan innocence from BIG and creates a character not too
far-removed from the good-natured hayseeds that Andy Griffith played so
well.
     The small supporting cast includes Robin Wright and Sally Field,
both perfunctory as Forrest's girlfriend and mother, respectively.
Gary Sinese is quite good as Gump's war-buddy and later business
partner.  Best of the rest is Mykelti Williamson, playing a
scene-stealing slow-mover who becomes Forrest's best friend.
     FORREST GUMP *should* be as powerful as all get-out, but, instead,
feels both vaguely empty and slightly sterile.  The lack of emotional
punch is probably due to the title character--who can feel a
rollercoaster of emotions about a character who cannot?
     Nor is FORREST GUMP as gritty as the story suggests. The Vietnam
sequence is harrowing, no duh, but never *quite* crosses the line into
complete believability.  Still, what do you expect from the director of
WHO FRAMED ROGER RABBIT and BACK TO THE FUTURE?  Coppola he ain't, but
who *other* than Zemeckis could choreograph so many diverse effects in
one film?
     For some, FORREST GUMP shall be the season's most effective (and
only?) tear-jerker.  Others may find themselves less affected,
observing the events the same way as Forrest Gump does: without feeling
much of anything.  But watch out at Oscar time!
NOTE:  Gripes to Paramount Pictures, for including too many key plot
       points in their trailer.  What a shame.

Title
Review for Ghost and the Darkness, The (1996)
     I've heard it called "JAWS with claws" and that's a fair summation
of the plot, though that tag line does little to quantify quality.
Director Stephen Hopkins (BLOWN AWAY, PREDATOR 2) and screenwriter
William Goldman (MAVERICK, MISERY) would have you believe that this is
an epic historical drama about man against nature, based on what really
happened in Africa to the railroad workers trying to build a bridge to
the 20th Century.  They've stacked the deck with two big stars (Val
Kilmer, Michael Douglas), a bigger production design, beautiful
photography (by Academy Award winner Vilmos Zsigmond), and a score so
overblown that it makes THE LION KING soundtrack sound like chamber
music.  The movie doesn't make a lick of sense, though, either as an
epic or as your basic boo-fest.  In fact, some of the bits are so
laughably ludicrous that you may think you've stumbled into the sequel
to MYSTERY SCIENCE THEATER 3000: THE MOVIE.  How about the three guys
with rifles, who trap a lion and then can't even hit the damned thing?
Or the ham-on-wry acting of Michael Douglas, who chews more scenery than
the animals ever do??  Or, my favorite, lions so agile that they can
even climb onto rooftops?!?  
Mike Legeros
Raleigh, NC, USA, Earth
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@pagesz.net (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>"Orange whip?  Orange whip?  Three orange whips." [and do gesture]

Title
Review for Batman & Robin (1997)
     A colorfully clunky costumed romp, BATMAN AND ROBIN is the most
lighthearted of the Batflicks.  Though not nearly the camp classic that
director Joel Schumacher (A TIME TO KILL, BATMAN FOREVER) obviously
intended, the movie that Frank Miller fans love to hate delivers many a
hearty Batlaugh, from the first scene's fetishistic close-ups (butt,
codpiece, etc.) to Uma Thurman's wonderfully punny innuendo.  (Address-
ing Arnold Schwarzenegger's diamond-stealing Mr. Freeze, her Poison Ivy
purrs "I'll help you grab your rocks.") Subtle in ain't, but at least
the tone (or lack thereof) is consistent from the beginning.  (If, say,
Schwarz's chilling puns don't warm your blood, you'll know to make
tracks.) And, while said villains once again steal the show, we actually
get to spend a little quiet time around Stately Wayne Manor.  (Subplots
include a bratty Boy Wonder, an illness for Alfred, and the arrival of
Barbara Wilson, Mr. Pennyworth's niece, a student at Oxbridge By The
Beach.)
     Of the primary players, Chris O'Donnell is, again, the most
engaging.  George Clooney certainly *looks* good as Bruce Wayne, but,
well, he smiles too much.  (Even during death scenes!) And he keeps
nodding, for some reason.  (All that rooftop-induced vertigo, I guess.)
Alicia Silverstone doesn't add much to the movie as Batgirl, but, hey,
she looks good in a costume!  (No nipples on the Batboobs, though.
Sigh.) Uma's Ivy is absolutely fabulous, despite a weak origin sequence.
Arnie is also in on the joke, though his huge costume seems to stiffen
his line-readings.  (He's much more fun at home, at his ice lair, wear-
ing his fuzzy polar bear slippers.) On the supporting front, both
Michael Gough and Pat Hingle have returned for a fourth go-around, as
Alfred and Commissioner "Don't Ask Why I'm Dressed Like Chief O'Hara"
Gordon.  Also packaged among the action figures:  a wildly coifed John
Glover (as Dr.  Jason Woodrue, evil scientist), a masked and body-
painted Jeep Swanson (as Bane, bane of all Batfans), and a trio of
supermodels, Elle Macpherson, Vivica Fox, and Vendela K. Thommesen, as
assorted dolls, molls, and frozen wives.
     The big surprise-- well, other than the distressing realization
that yet a *third* actor can wear the rubber suit and not make much of a
difference-- is the surplus of action, surely a first for the franchise.
Neither of the title characters does much detective work in this movie,
but they do have a high time playing hockey and racing their vehicles
down the arms of giant statues and escaping airborne rocket ships
without the use of parachutes.  Or oxygen masks.  (And you thought the
Batmobile driving up the side of a building was a stretch!) Other
treats:  O'Donnell and Clooney's casual chemistry, a playful assortment
of in-jokes and self-references, and the most accomplished art direction
of the Batseries.  Finally, we experience Gotham City from enough
angles, heights, and perspectives to appreciate the visions inspired by
Anton Furst (BATMAN) and Bo Welch (BATMAN RETURNS), and, now, fully
realized by production designer Barbara Ling.
     Like all the Batfeatures before it, the film's great failing is in
the editing.  The pacing is horrid.  The action sequences are often
confusing.  Character introductions are abrupt.  Prickly plot points are
ignored.  (For the nit-picker, though, it's pure gold.  How did they
know to bring ice skates?  Where does Batman have his credit card bill
sent?  Why is a computer-science major reduced to guessing passwords,
and on a computer that actually displays the characters as she types
them?  Holy Hollywood!) BATMAN AND ROBIN badly needs another trip (or
two) through the editing booth.  And, given that Schumacher has re-
portedly recut BATMAN FOREVER, for an as-of-yet unreleased DVD release,
there may be hope for the camped crusaders yet.  There's a decent movie
in here, arguably the most audience-friendly of the franchise.  It just
needs a few more passes with the Batscissors.

Title
Review for 101 Dalmatians (1996)
     Tragic, perhaps, the fate that befalls the Disney 'toon.  In
recent years, our most-beloved family features have been transformed
into Saturday morning cartoons (THE LION KING), sequelized in made-
for-video movies (ALADDIN), and, even, staged on Broadway as fully-
functioning musical productions (BEAUTY AND THE BEAST).  Is anyone
really surprised, then, by a live-action remake of ONE HUNDRED AND ONE
DALMATIANS?  Talk about future marketing strategy!  Just pick any ol'
classic in Walt's vaults, re-release it into theaters, then re-release
it on video, and then remake it as a big-budget "event picture." Throw
in a boatload of licensed products, a video re- lease for the remake,
and a subsequent airing on ABC/Disney, and you've made millions.  If
not billions.  Repeat every five years-- duh, to cash in on the
current crop of toddlers-- and another four-way stock split before
the end of the decade is guaranteed.  Just like that.
    Happily, the sound of ringing registers is but a soft echo in this
exceptionally warm and fuzzy (furry?) remake.  Jeff Daniels and Joely
Richardson have a wonderful chemistry as the London dog owners who
fall in love after their Dalmatians do.  (Though I had to think twice
if I was watching the guy who played the President in INDEPENDENCE
DAY.  No, that was Bill Pullman.) They're also a world more interest-
ing than Glenn Close, whose narrow performance as Cruella De Vil is
the year's most overrated.  (Blame the script.  As written, she's less
a cruel villain than a campy eccentric.) Most impressive are the
technical credits, from art direction to animal handling to location
photography.  Some of the best production work of the year is on
display.
     Too bad that the script, by John Hughes, doesn't let the dogs
talk.  Several later sequences of inter-breed interaction are
particularly tiresome.  (Woof.  Cut to dog barking.  Woof.  Cut to
other dog listening.  Woof.  Cut to first dog running in direction of
second dog.  Repeat several times.) Another major problem of the
script is Hughes' overabundance of violent physical humor.  Okay, I
laughed at the bumbling bad guys (Hugh Laurie and Mark Williams, both
nicely underplaying) getting their 'nads fried on an electric fence,
but this movie really deserves something more than the unintended
alternate title of HOME ALONE 3: SEEING SPOTS.  I don't even know if I
can recommend this to young kids, as they'd probably fall asleep
somewhere in the middle.  
--
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC, USA, Earth
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
I'm also on the Web!  http://www.pagesz.net/~legeros/

Title
Review for Net, The (1995)
(Columbia)
Directed by    Irwin Winkler
Written by     Irwin Winkler, John Brancato and Michael Ferris
Cast           Sandra Bullock, Dennis Miller, Jeremy Northam, Diane Baker
MPAA Rating    "PG-13"
Reviewed at    General Cinemas at Pleasant Valley, Raleigh (25JUL95)
     Calling all technophobes!  Though slower than a 486 with only 4K
of RAM, Irwin Winkler's well-titled thriller benefits from a honest
performance by Sandra Bullock (WHILE YOU WERE SLEEPING). Her plucky
charms recall Julia Roberts, especially in a scene were evades a killer
by dressing up as a fireman.  Bless her heart.  She's so busy trying to
act like a computer geek (yeah right) that she doesn't even think to
change her appearance after being listed as a fugitive in a police
computer system.  Sigh.
     There really isn't much of a reason to recommend connecting to THE
NET.  Though the absence of any Windows 95 references is a definite
plus, the plot is Swiss cheese, the techie stuff is far-fetched, and
there's precious little screen time actually devoted to the art of
hacking.  (There is a car chase, though!)
     As recent Washington legislation can attest, the time is ripe for
a movie to further fuel the fears of a computer-based culture.  Too bad
that this classic "wrong man" premise flubs on the logic.  How can we
be afraid of hackers who act as dumb as Sandra Bullock's character??
     Beverly Hills remains an easy target as writer/director Amy
Heckerling (FAST TIMES AT RIDGEMONT HIGH) takes aim at their high
school sect.  There's really only one joke here--that, duh, these kids
are too spoiled to have a single clue between them--but it's a good
joke that's both casually and confidently milked for a solid ninety
minutes.  Nothing hilarious, just *very* amusing.
     Alicia Silverstone (THE CRUSH) leads an appealing cast of teens
that includes Stacey Dash, Brittany Murphy, and Jeremy Sisto.  The
adult actors could have more to do, though.  The usually tart Wallace
Shawn, for example, is awfully wishy washy here.  Inconceivable!  Then
again, where else this summer can you find jokes about SPARTACUS and
2001: A SPACE ODESSEY butting heads with Beavis and Ren & Stimpy??
     Caught this one on video.  Writer/director/producer/star Ezio
Gregio's 1994 spoof is actually worth a rent (with fast-forwarding) to
catch Dom DeLuise's brief-but-delicious performance as Dr. Animal
Cannibal Pizza.  The veteran comic actor is in top form.  The rest of
the movie is a patchwork rework of PSYCHO and SILENCE OF THE LAMBS,
with more than a little sifting through the files of POLICE SQUAD!
Billy Zane stars as, ahem, FBI Agent Jo Dee Fostar.  (And that's one of
the better jokes!)
     With Larry Storch, Phyllis Diller, Rip Taylor, Bubba Smith, Martin
Balsam, John Landis, Mel Brooks, John Astin, and Shelley Winters.

Title
Review for Surviving the Game (1994)
Directed by Ernest Dickerson 
Written by Eric Bernt
Cast Ice-T, Rutger Hauer, Gary Busey, Charles S. Dutton, F. Murray Abraham,
     and John C. McGinley
MPAA Rating "R" (presumably for graphic violence and graphic language)
Running Time 100 minutes
     SURVIVING THE GAME stars Ice-T as a homeless man, hand-picked to
play yet another variation on THE MOST DANGEROUS GAME.  They hunt, he
runs, and it was all done better last summer in HARD TARGET.  Honestly,
the most exciting thing about this "action" film is its level of
political incorrectness.
     The notion of wealthy hunters hunting homeless people is in
questionable taste to begin with and SURVIVING THE GAME is clearly
intended for action-fans only.  But even the appeal of teaming of
hulking heavies Rutger Hauer and Gary Busey (who play two of the
hunters) with violate rapper/actor Ice-T fades fast in the
less-than-capable hands of director Dickerson.
     Ernest Dickerson (known, among other things, for his impressive
work with Spike Lee) is *not* an action director.  Every fight scene is
a blur and every chase has zero zest.  He's fine with scenery and
set-ups, but he can't choreograph worth a damn.
     As scripted by Eric Bernt, SURVIVING THE GAME is less testosterone
than talk.  Gab gab gab go the character who spend the first
action-less hour speaking only in cliches.  Ice-T to Rutger Hauer:
"Never underestimate a man who has nothing to lose."  Sure, legs get
blown off and crotches get kicked, but, again, the action is so muddy
that every fight looks like the last one.
     Also, the script never explains just *how* the hunters hunt.  One
character makes a comment about a trail that "Stevie Wonder could
follow." Unfortunately, neither the script nor the visuals relate what
an "obvious" trail looks like.
     The only cast member with charisma is Rutger Hauer. (No surprise
there.) He plays an outdoors outfitter who is responsible for hiring
the hunted.
     F. Murray Abraham is, inexplicably, still working after starring
in both LAST ACTION HERO and BONFIRE OF THE VANITIES and his
presence--as a father taking his son "hunting"--amounts to even less
than what he added to those turkeys.  Gary Busey plays Chief Scenery
Chewer and his best bit is a monologue that sounds like warmed
leftovers from John Milius.
     Ice-T wears a wig with dreadlocks and acts like himself.

Title
Review for Ref, The (1994)
Directed by Ted Demme
Written by Richard LaGravenese and Maria Weiss
Starring Denis Leary, Judy Davis, and Kevin Spacey
MPAA Rating "R" (presumably for F-O-U-L language)
Running Time Approx. 110 minutes
     Just in time to fill the void left by GRUMPY OLD MEN comes THE
REF, a gleeful celebration of cynicism and "bad will toward men" that,
for my money, is a bona fide Christmas classic.  THE REF *works* and, as
a Spring seasoner, it's the classiest current comedy out.
     Dennis Leary is "Gus," a burglar whose Christmas in Connecticut is
heisting for the holidays.  But Gus gets a lump of coal after botching
a burglary on Christmas Eve.  Alarms go off, his partner gets scared,
and Gus is left fleeing on foot.  To better his escape, Gus hijacks a
married couple (Davis and Spacey) and directs them to their home.
     One problem: the couple is returning from their marriage counselor
and they *cannot* stop fighting.  Even after being tied-up and held at
gunpoint.
     Things quickly go from worst to awful with the arrival of the
police, the teenage son, and the in-laws.  The film climaxes in a
hilarious dinner/present-opening scene with Leary posing as marriage
counselor "Dr. Wong".
     Everyone in THE REF is madder than hell and they spend the entire
film venting it at each other.  Normally, this would make for a very
oppressive occasion--holiday film or otherwise.  But director Ted
Demme, nephew of Jonathan, keeps the tone carefully balanced between
hateful and humorous.  Even the most caustic comments are amazingly
amusing.  Anyone who's ever held their tongue for the holidays will
delight in this fiercely frank farce.
     With only a couple sight gags and a minimalist plot, THE REF
succeeds on the virtues a great script and a great cast.
     Denis Leary is an exasperated marvel, cursing in bewilderment and
punctuating every double-take with a variation of the f-word.  Judy
Davis is a gem, playing her "wicked wife" very close to her character
from HUSBANDS AND WIVES.  And Kevin Spacey is a surprise standout as
the henpecked husband who gets to speak his mind *and* whack a
Christmas tree with a fireplace poker.
     The three wise leads--who share equal screen time--are backed by
a super supporting cast that includes Richard Bright, Robert
J. Steinmiller Jr., and Glynis Johns.  The latter once played the mother
in MARY POPPINS.  Here, she's the "Mom from Hell."
     The screenplay, by Richard LaGravenese and Maria Weiss, is black
comedy at its best and has enough great lines to warrant a second
viewing.  Or third.  Or fourth.

Title
Review for Kids (1995)
Once you get past the novelty of their uncensored (and unrated) 
behavior, the remarkable first film from celebrated photographer Larry 
Clark becomes a bit of a bore.  Though realistic enough to qualify as 
a documentary, the *extremely* explicit story skirts dangerously close 
to the one-note repetition of pornography.  (Which some will label 
this film as.)  
KIDS is compelling, but cold.  There's very little joy in the lives of 
these promiscuous, drug-abusing Manhattan teens.  I'd like to see a 
greater contrast between the "adult" abusive behaviors and the 
"children" performing them.  Alas, this is Clark's vision of hell, and 
his sermon has no place for poignancy.  
A single hour of this was plenty for me.  Too much talk; too little  
action.  (And poorly filmed at that.)  Far more interesting were the  
male patrons who began grunting as the MORTAL KOMBAT theme played over  
the opening credits.  Perhaps experiencing some sort of post-video  
combat stress syndrome?  Great theme music, tho.
Screenwriter Gregory Widen (BACKDRAFT, HIGHLANDER) makes his directing 
debut with a modestly engaging religious thriller that wouldn't have 
been out of place 20 years ago as a follow-up to THE EXORCIST.  Now, 
in the nineties, where standards are *much* higher, plot problems and 
cheap FX nearly sink the fascinating premise of renegade angels waging 
a millennia-old war on Earth.  (The situation isn't helped by that 
awful, ambiguous title.  The original-- GOD'S ARMY-- was much better.)
Christopher Walken stars as Gabriel, horn player extraordinare and 
leader of the rogue seraphs.  He's delightfully wicked in his cross-
country search for the "blackest" of human souls.  Also watch Viggo 
Mortensen, sinister fun as the late-arriving Lucifier.  Less appealing 
is the opposition.  The good guys include Simon (Eric Stoltz) and his 
human helper Thomas Dagget (Elias Koteas), a former priest-turned-
police investigator.  Both are a bore.
I don't know if you'll find a better film in local theaters this 
week than Bryan Singer's THE USUAL SUSPECTS.  His tale of a "heist 
gone bad" is told in detailed flashback, as part of an interrogation 
between the sole surviving participant (Kevin Spacey) and a very-
interested investigator (Chazz Palminteri).  These two are the anchors 
of a top-notch ensemble cast that includes Stephen Baldwin, Gabriel 
Byrne, Kevin Pollack, Pete Postlethwaite, Benicio Del Toro, and Dan 
Hedaya.
The convoluted plot requires a second viewing to fully appreciate the 
intricacies of Christopher McQuarrie's ingenious screenplay.  Hint: 
take notes.  However confusing to the uninitiated, THE USUAL SUSPECTS 
rewards on more levels than I choose to describe here.  My favorite is 
the lush score by John Ottman, who, oddly enough, also edited the 
picture.  Recommended.
The first mainstream American "drag comedy"-- call it our answer to 
PRISCILLA, QUEEN OF THE DESERT-- is neither sassy nor subtle enough to 
be *really* funny.  (Think "drag light.")  What you *do* get is the 
remarkably amusing sight of macho macho men Wesley Snipes and Patrick 
Swayze in high heels and make-up.  They're good for more than a few 
laughs; maybe more than Middle America is completely comfortable with.
The elongated title (TO WONG FOO, THANKS FOR EVERYTHING, JULIE NEWMAR) 
refers to the inscription on a celebrity photo that the "girls" take 
with them on a cross-country car trip that lands them broken-down and 
detoured in a tiny midwestern town.  Sound familiar?  Of course, no 
one there has a lick of fashion sense, much less the ability to 
recognize a man dressed as a woman.  [ Insert "Wonder Woman" theme. ]
What ensues is mild hilarity-with-a-message, such as a local yokel 
with a crush on John Leguizamo.  (He plays the third wheel, Chi Chi 
Rodriguez, a whiny Hispanic queen who is already putting Rosie Perez 
out of work.)  Also pay attention to Chris Penn, a scene-stealer as 
the hilariously homophobic Sheriff Dollard.

Title
Review for Walk in the Clouds, A (1995)
There's actually a pretty good plot device at the center of this
overblown, undercooked vineyard romance.  Keanu Reeves stars as the
phony husband of an unwed, pregnant stranger (Aitana Sanchez-Gijon).
They meet on a train, and, later, a bus, where he learns that she's a
college student in need of an explanation for her Mexican-American
family.  He's a returned WWII GI who's already hitched, so he agrees to
play the "gringo" for just one night.  The plan, for him, is to leave
the next morning, but, ah, well, the rest is history.
The comic potential in this set-up is great, as producers Jerry and
David Zucker surely must have noticed, but director Alfonso Arau (LIKE
WATER FOR CHOCOLATE) has been saddled with two burdens:  a weak script,
and a stiff lead.  The dialogue is extra-bad, especially when overdoing
it on the life lessons.  (Most of which come from the mouth of Anthony
Quinn, also overdoing it as the lusty grandfather.) Then there's Keanu.
Well.. he tries.  He's just too stiff to be taken seriously.  And don't
call him Shirley.
Both of these demerits do wonders to cancel out the more appealing
aspects of the movie.  Sure, it's overdone-- the music, the drama, even
the golden-hued photography of Emmanuel Lubezki-- but the more playful
parts of this story suggest that, with a stronger core, A WALK IN THE
CLOUDS could've been heavenly.
Twain keeps a-rollin' with this CONNECTICUT YANKEE update that sends a
14-year-olde little-leaguer (the charmless Thomas Ian Nicolas) back to
the 12th Century, via an earthquake.  He's there at the request of
Merlin (Ron Moody!), who has sent for a "great warrior" to aid King
Arthur and Camelot.  The King (Joss Ackland) needs help because he has
two royal daughters who need wooing-- as well as a scheming aide who
isn't (Art Malik, in the Frank Langella role).  Imagine the sorcerer's
surprise when somebody *other* than Richard Gere shows up.
This is dumb, inoffensive kid's stuff with hardly a whiff of innovation
about it.  The plot is the worst-- come on, how many teens carry a
flashlight (and a cd player.. and rollerblades.. and superglue..) in
their backpack?  And are those rubber tips at the end of their lances?
Surely you joust.  The whole thing is overscored and overlong, the
latter by at least twenty minutes.  But, hey, this is Disney, where
fluff is stuff and lame makes millions.
(To be fair, there are a few laughs, usually from the kid's reworking of
the Kings English.  Sample dialogue:  "Your chain has been royally
pulled."  The cast is also quite nice, though underused.  Look for
HEAVENLY CREATURES' Kate Winslet as Arthur's older daughter.)
In SOMETHING TO TALK ABOUT, aka A SOUTHERN WOMAN'S GUIDE TO INFIDELITY,
the characters don't really talk at all.  Sure, there's a confession
here, and a frank comment there-- the latter usually coming from Kyra
Sedgwick, smartly cast as Julia Robert's lookalike sister.  Instead,
most of the story time is spend on jokey outbursts, such as when Roberts
stands up in the middle of a meeting to ask if anyone *else* has slept
with her husband (Dennis Quaid, having a had hair day).
Scenes like these are too cutesy for what writer Callie Khouri (THELMA
AND LOUISE) is trying to dig at.  They disrupt the tone, much in the
same way that slapstick diminished the delivery of NINE MONTHS.  (Of
course, Hugh Grant wasn't married.  Oh, wait, that was real life.) By
the second hour, Khouri's point is lost as she inexplicably points her
characters toward a happily-ever-after finale that you can see coming
from a mile off.  Maybe *that's* her point.
Also check out CRUDE OASIS, the remarkable debut of writer/director/
producer/editor Alex Graves.  The story-- which centers on a depressed
Kansas housewife, and plays like an inverted BRIDGES OF MADISON COUNTY--
was shot in 14 days for a mere $25K.  Even blown up from 16mm, there's
still more dramatic potency here than almost all the other summer stock
combined.  An oasis, *indeed*.

Title
Review for Bullets Over Broadway (1994)
     Let's face it, Woody Allen never changes and his yearly movies
never disappoint.  That much we know.  His films always open with the
same nondescript titles, they always star an great ensemble cast, and,
lately at least, they always comment on the role of the artist.
     BULLETS OVER BROADWAY is set in the 1920's and stars John Cusack
as a young Village playwright with a mob boss as a backer.  The catch:
the boss's mistress (Jennifer Tilly) has to get a part.  The girl can't
act, but she's no worse than the material--dialogue that a needs
doctor and needs one badly.  Help arrives in the form of the bodyguard
(Chaz Palminteri), who has a better ear than the author and who starts
suggesting rewrites to the playwright.
     Light, loose, and a little bit overlong, BULLETS OVER BROADWAY has
several side-splitting sequences.  The best, by far, is the first
meeting between the playwright, the mobster, and mistress.  Who else
but Jennifer Tilly can pronounce "hors d'oeuvres" as "horse dervs" and
sound so natural?  Then there's Dianne Wiest, enormous fun as an aging
theater queen who bears no small resemblance to Norma Desmond.  Her
great line:  "Don't speak."
OSCAR WATCH:   Wiest and, maybe, Tilly and Palminteri.

Title
Review for Dangerous Minds (1995)
DANGEROUS MINDS boasts a winning performance from Michelle Pfeiffer and
that's about it.  She's a marvel as real-life teacher LouAnne Johnson, an
ex-Marine whose innovative teaching techniques help her in "combat" against
a distracted, disillusioned inner-city "audience."  She captures their
attention by demonstrating karate, handing out candy bars, and, in the
farthest leap from reality, getting them interested in reading by reciting
the lyrics to "Mr. Tambourine Man."  [ Insert sound clip of William Shatner
singing same. ]
In *this* version of LouAnne's story-- which is believable for all five
minutes-- the students can read *and* write, presumably because they're
rarely distracted by sex, drugs, or rounds of ammo.  Another stretch is
Pfeiffer's character, who apparently has no life outside of the classroom.
(A subplot with Andy Garcia as the boyfriend was cut.  He probably kept
blushing at her accent.)  She spends all of her time with her students, the
only students in the only period that we see her teaching.  Talk about
dedication!
The loss, here, is that DANGEROUS MINDS never goes far *enough* away from
reality to make a difference.  The soundtrack is juiced, but not the story.
It's neither real enough, nor *unreal* enough to be interesting.
Though it's already left Triangle theaters, Alex Graves' remarkable debut is
certainly worth a look-see if and when it arrives on video.  The story--
which plays like an inverted BRIDGES OF MADISON COUNTY-- centers on a
depressed Kansas housewife (Jennifer Taylor) who, literally, meets the man
of her dreams (Aaron Shields).
Shot for 14 days on mere $25K, this OASIS is hardly crude.  Sure, the
production values are modest, no duh, but Graves' writing and direction are
both dead-on.  Even blown up from 16mm, there's more dramatic potency here
than almost all of the summer stock combined.
The subject of cross-dressing has already, ah, come out of the closet in
recent films ranging from MRS. DOUBTFIRE to PRISCILLA, QUEEN OF THE DESERT.
The novelty of men-as-women has passed, making a full-length documentary on
the subject -- in the context of New York's annual drag festival -- seem
like too little, too late.
Despite an endless array of towering wigs and colorful costumes, WIGSTOCK is
a shrill, unfocused film with no real momentum behind it.  There's virtually
no story to hold the raw footage together.  In terms of sheer spectacle,
it's amusing enough; but it's camp without a sense of time, place, or
purpose.  Who are these characters?  What is this event??  The film never
tells.
The Great Saturation continues.  Some 100+ films are scheduled for release
over the next four months, from a host of Our Favorite Directors.  Here's
what *I'm* looking forward to..
September
9/1  - THE PROPHECY - d. Gregory Widen.  Walken as evil angel.
9/8  - TO WOO FONG.. - d. Beeban Kidron.  More drag queens.  
9/13 - CLOCKERS - d. Spike Lee, w. Richard Price, p. Scorsese.
9/15 - UNSUNG HEROES - d. Diane Keaton.  Drama w/MacDowell & Turturro.
9/20 - SEVEN - d. David Fincher.  Pitt & Freeman track serial killer.
9/22 - SHOWGIRLS - d. Paul Verhoeven, w. Joe Eszterhas.  NC-17.
9/22 - BLUE IN THE FACE - d. Wayne Wang.  Informal sequel to SMOKE.
9/22 - CANADIAN BACON - d. Michael Moore.  Comedy w/John Candy. 
9/22 - THE RUN OF THE COUNTRY - d. Peter Yates.  Drama with Finney.
9/27 - TO DIE FOR - d. Gus Van Sant, w. Buck Henry.  Kidman stars.
9/29 - THE ADDICTION - d. Abel Ferrara.  Walken with fangs.
9/29 - DEVIL IN A BLUE DRESS - d. Carl Franklin.  More noir.   
9/?  - THE INNOCENT - d. John Schlesinger.  w/Hopkins & Rossellini.
9/?  - STEAL BIG, STEAL LITTLE - d. Andrew Davis.  Comedy w/Garcia.
October
10/4  - DEAD PRESIDENTS - d. Hughes Brothers.  Bronx thriller.
10/6  - ASSASSINS - d. Richard Donner.  Action w/Stallone & Banderas.
10/6  - FOUR ROOMS - Four directors, including Rodriquez & Tarantino.
10/6  - JADE - d. William Friedkin.  Thriller w/Caruso & Fiorentino.
10/13 - HEAVEN'S PRISONERS - d. Phil Joanou.  Thriller w/Alec Baldwin.
10/13 - MALL RATS - d. Kevin Smith.  From the director of CLERKS.
10/13 - THE SCARLETT LETTER - d. Roland Joffe.  Demi Moore as Hester.
10/13 - STRANGE DAYS - d. Kathryn Bigelow, w. James Cameron (her Ex-).
10/13 - THINGS TO DO IN DENVER.. - d. Gary Fleder.  Indy mob drama.
10/20 - GET SHORTY - d. Barry Sonnenfield.  Comedy w/Travolta.
10/27 - FAIR GAME - p. Joel Silver.  Actioner w/Baldwin & Crawford.
10/27 - MIGHTY APHRODITE - d. Woody Allen.  Comedy about married life.
10/27 - VAMPIRE IN BROOKLYN - d. Wes Craven.  Eddie Murphy with fangs.
10/?  - COPYCAT - d. Jon Amiel.  Holly Hunter hunts Harry Connick.
10/?  - THE CROSSING GUARD - d. Sean Penn.  Stars Nicholson & Huston.
November
11/3  - THE GRASS HARP - d. Charles Matthau directs dad. Capote story.
11/3  - HOME FOR THE HOLIDAYS - d. Jodie Foster.  Drama with big cast.
11/3  - THREE WISHES - d. Martha Coolidge.  Fantasy in the `50s.
11/10 - ACE VENTURA 2: WHEN NATURE CALLS.  d. Steve Oedekerk.
11/10 - CARRINGTON - w/Emma Thompson & Cannes winner Jonathan Pryce.
11/10 - CASINO - d. Scorsese.  Gambling with DeNiro, Stone, & Pesci.
11/10 - MONEY TRAIN - d. Joesph Rubin.  Action w/Wesley & Woody.
11/17 - THE AMERICAN PRESIDENT - d. Rob Reiner.  Romantic comedy.
11/17 - CRY, THE BELOVED COUNTRY - d. Darrel James Roodt.  Apartheid.
11/17 - GOLDENEYE - d. Martin Campbell.  Pierce Brosnan as 007.
11/17 - JUMANJI - d. Joe Johnston.  Based on the children's books.
11/22 - NICK OF TIME - d. John Badham.  Thriller w/Depp & Walken.
11/22 - TOY STORY - d. John Lasseter.  Completely computer-animated.
11/?  - WAITING TO EXHALE - d. Forest Whitaker.   From the novel.
December
12/15 - CUTTHROAT ISLAND - d. Renny Harlin.  $70M of pirates.
12/15 - HEAT - d. Michael Mann.  DeNiro, Pacino, & Kilmer.
12/15 - OTHELLO - d. Oliver Parker, Stars Fishburne & Branagh.
12/15 - SABRINA - d. Sydney Pollack.  Remake with Ford & Ormond.
12/15 - THE STUPIDS - d. John Landis.  From the children's books.
12/20 - SENSE AND SENSIBILITY - d. Ang Lee, w. Emma Thompson (!).
12/22 - FROM DUSK 'TILL DAWN - d. Robert Rodriquez, w. Tarantino.
12/22 - GRUMPIER OLD MEN - d. Howard Deutch.  Sequel w/Sophia Loren.
12/22 - THE JUROR - d. Brian Gibson. Demi Moore & Alec Baldwin.
12/22 - NIXON - d. Oliver Stone.  Anthony Hopkins as Mr. President.
12/22 - RICHARD III - d. Richard Loncraine.  Stars Ian McKellen.
12/25 - DRACULA: DEAD AND LOVING IT - d. Mel Brooks.  Count me in.
12/25 - MARY REILLY - d. Stephen Frears.  Jekyll & Hyde w/Julia.
12/25 - TWELVE MONKEYS - d. Terry Gilliam.  Sci-fi future thriller.
12/27 - AMERICAN BUFFALO - d. Michael Corrente.  From the Mamet play.
12/?  - BOGUS - d. Norman Jewison.  Fantasy w/Whoopi & Depardieu (!).
12/?  - BROKEN ARROW - d. John Woo.  Woo!Woo!Woo! w/Travolta & Slater.
12/?  - DEAD MAN WALKING - d. Tim Robbins.  Drama w/wife Sarandon.
12/?  - FATHER OF THE BRIDE II - d. Charles Shyer.  Remake of sequel.
12/?  - SHANGHAI TRIAD - d. Shang Yimou.  Mob drama w/Gong Li.
12/?  - SUDDEN DEATH - d. Peter Hyams.  Actioner w/Van Damme & Boothe.
12/?  - TOM SAWYER - d. Peter Hewitt.  Jonathan Taylor Thomas stars.
12/?  - WILD BILL - d. Walter Hill.  Western w/Bridges & Barkin. 

Title
Review for American President, The (1995)
     A widowed Chief Executive starts dating again.  That's the
deceptively straight-forward set-up of this crowd-pleasing romantic
comedy from director Rob Reiner (WHEN HARRY MET SALLY).  The new
girlfriend is Sydney Ellen Wade (Annette Bening), an environmental
lobbyist who finds herself flustered, and later charmed by Democratic
President Andrew Sheperd (Michael Douglas).  Together, they fumble
through the implications of White House dating, which includes an
upcoming election year and a series of ugly character attacks from
Senate Minority Leader Robert Rumson (Richard Dreyfuss).
     As written by Aaron Sorkin, THE AMERICAN PRESIDENT is less about
politics than about two people falling in love under extraordinary
circumstances.  The story does, however, provide a fascinating,
behind-the-scenes glimpse into the daily activities of the Chief
Executive.  He's a very busy man, to say the least, and Sorkin has
characterized the "Clintonesque" President as a bit disconnected from
his personal life.  (His pampered lifestyle and constant dashing away
to a crisis reminds of a better-written Bruce Wayne.  I wonder how he
would look in a rubber suit?)
     The political issues are the least successful.(**)  A couple of
plot points are downright confusing, the character of Bob Rumson is
never fully developed, and the big, Frank Capra finale falls a bit
flat.  No problem.  Reiner knows exactly what his assets are, and so he
places the greater weight on romance and comedy.  And what comedy!
Sorkin has written some great lines, here.  A wicked reference to the
Carolinas is a howl.  As is the President's "none of your damn
business" phone call.  The closing line, though, which I won't reveal
here, is by far the best.  (All good movies should end with such great
lines.)
Sure, the story could be longer, with more substance to balance the
weaker political segments, but with both Douglas and Bening virtually
*glowing* in their roles, THE AMERICAN PRESIDENT delivers the kind of
old-fashioned, cornball romance that makes stepping into these movies so
very much fun.  Perfect chemistry between the leads, as well as a crack
supporting cast that includes Martin Sheen and Michael J. Fox, more than
compensates for any deficit spending in the political arena.  Watch out
at Oscar time.
**- As are the morality issues.  The script makes quite a fuss about
"character" and "family values" and, yet, these two lovebirds jump so
quickly into the sack that you have wonder exactly *where* Hollywood's
logic center is residing, these days.  Sigh.  I guess even the most
old-fashioned of films can't be entirely old-fashioned.

Title
Review for True Lies (1994)
Directed by James Cameron
Written by Cameron, based on a screenplay by Claude Zidi, Simon Michael,
           and Didier Kaminka.
Cast Arnold Schwarzenegger, Jamie Lee Curtis, Tom Arnold, Bill Paxton,
     Tia Carrere, Art Malik, Eliza Dushku, Grant Heslov, and Charleton Heston
MPAA Rating     "R" (for language, gore, violence, and sexual
                     references)
Running Time    141 minutes
     What is James Cameron up to now?  His new movie, TRUE LIES, is
*easily* the most entertaining film of the year.  Forget SPEED, THE
LION KING, and FORREST GUMP, here's a blockbuster that swats those
aside like houseflys.  Talk like a tag line and you'd say that TRUE
LIES is "more exciting than SPEED, more charming than KING, and more
humorous than GUMP."  Unquote.  With T2 talent Arnold Schwarzenegger in
the lead, James Cameron has delivered the best Bond movie that Albert
Broccoli never made.
     TRUE LIES opens in the Alps (!) with secret agent Harry Tasker
(Schwarzenegger) emerging from an icy lake at the edge of a heavily
guarded compound.  Bathed in blue light (of course), he strips off his
wetsuit only to reveal a perfectly pressed tuxedo.  With a dash of
cologne for good measure, Harry steps from the bushes and into the
chateau.  Just like that.
     Inside is a party and that's no trouble with Harry.  He mingles,
he flirts, and speaks six different languages.  He even dances the
tango before the inevitable Hasty Exit.  After a dizzying
foot/ski/snowmobile chase right out of ON HER MAJESTY'S SECRET SERVICE,
Harry hooks up with his buddies to get down to the real business of
tracking a gang of middle-Eastern terrorists who may be in possession
of some stolen nuclear warheads.
     The Wall came down and peace came up and, now, we have bug-eyed
Easterners as the token spy-movie villains.  Stereotypes and all.  Tom
Clancy might complain, but not James Cameron.  His fun starts when
Agent Harry Tasker goes *home*.  No, not to some slinky siren from the
French Riviera, but, rather, to a quiet neighborhood outside D.C.
     At home is Helen (Curtis), a legal secretary with (what she think
is) a boring husband with a boring job.  Together, they have one kid
and one dog, but neither is enough to keep Harry home from "business
trips" and "working late."
     He's an oily used-car salesman who, get this, is masquerading as
spy to seduce Mrs. Tasker!  Harry finds out and, once his neck veins
stop bulging, executes a wicked revenge that leads to such
complications as Helen's induction into "service" and the couple's
abduction by terrorists.
     With enough action and plot for *three* films, TRUE LIES begs the
question:  when is enough enough for James Cameron?  Not content to
make a spy movie, he's also created a *spoof* of a spy movie.  A spoof,
mind you, that's funnier than anything out now.  Watch Arnie butt heads
with a pair of pinschers in the opening scene, if you don't believe
me.
     But *after* the guns and gags have run their course, the film is
still only half-finished.  TRUE LIES is also about jealousy and the
*extreme* reactions of a husband who thinks his wife is having an
affair.  Cameron pulls no punches here; Harry's abusive treatment of
Helen includes one of the strongest scenes you'll see this summer.
     Timely stuff, which begs the question:  why the misogyny?  Has
James Cameron crossed to the other side of the field, after the
fight-back feminism of T2 and ALIENS?  Has the director's personal life
finally soured the "sensitive guy" who's best known for letting his
heroines act tougher than his heroes?
     Jamie Lee Curtis *does* get her due.  Of sorts.  Her empowerment
comes at the end, with a cute coda that has the couple living happily
every after.  But the transformation is slight and nothing at all along
the lines of either Linda Hamilton (T2) or Sigourney Weaver (ALIENS).
     The men fare worse.  Both Arnie and (Tom) Arnold are as far from
PC as can be.  Their collective locker-room wisdom is off-color, to say
the least, but they are no less appealing than, say, any racist
character in a Quintin Tarantino film.  They work in *spite* of their
questionable behavior.
     The chemistry between Arnie and Jamie alone is worth the price of
admission.  Sure, Arnie is a bit stiff for suave, but what range he
*does* have is put to great use, including some of the lengthiest leers
in film history.  Curtis is wonderful and, with her costar, makes TRUE
LIES seem light years away from either HERCULES IN NEW YORK or
HALLOWEEN.  Their best scene is Harry's rescue of Helen from a
speeding-to-its-doom limo.  Watch the looks.
     Tom Arnold is surprisingly solid as Harry's scene-stealing
partner.  He now has a career.  Bill Paxton, who once said some very
bad things to the Terminator, is an over-the-top, raunchy riot as
Simon.  Art Malik, good as the Hissable Villain, gets a great
double-take near the end.  And even Charleton Heston breezes through
with two tart scenes as an agency head.
     Only Tia Carrere sticks out like a sore thumb.  She has the looks,
but the not the chops, to hold her own with these pros.
     Cameron's script, adapted from the little known French farce LA
TOTALE, has more wit than the genre typically permits.  But, then
again, a James Cameron film typically *defines* the genre it's in and
not vice versa.  Watch how deftly the director mixes campy comedy and
sexy sincerity into Helen's strip tease (don't ask).  It's the best
scene in the film.
     Last, but by no means least, are the show-stoppers.  Try a horse
chasing a motorcycle onto the roof of a skyscraper. Or a public
restroom shootout that's a ballet with bullets. Or a great car chase
through the Florida Keys sans section of bridge.  Scene after scene
after stunt after stunt-- all as a fabulous $100 million dollar
reminder of why James Cameron is one of the top technically
accomplished filmmakers on the planet.

Title
Review for Daylight (1996)
     This mildly diverting update of THE POSEIDON ADVENTURE stars Sly
Stallone as the sole rescuer of a group of motorists trapped in New York
City's Holland Tunnel after a chemical explosion seals off both ends.
Along with the survivors-- about a dozen, all carefully balanced by both
race and socio-economic status-- our hero, who's the city's former EMS
Chief, must contend with in-fighting, flood- ing, hypothermia,
structural collapse, and, last but not least, a flotilla of New York's
most-famous four-legged friends.  Why did it have to be rats?  Both the
dialogue and the plot are laughable-- witness Amy Brenneman wrestling
with a sparking power wire as if it were a live anaconda.
     The tunnel's resemblance to a future Universal Studios theme park
ride is also unfortunate.  Two early sequences do dazzle, though:  the
big fireball, which is a seat-gripper, and Stallone playing a Super
Mario Brother as he attempts to jump through four giant fans.  (Each is
timed separately and can be stopped only once and only for a few
seconds.) While the entire cast deserves a special Oscar for maintaining
the year's straightest faces, mention must be made of Stallone, who
never lets us forget how hard he works for his money, be it climbing
rocks, hanging from girders, or exploring underwater anterooms.  What a
guy.  
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC, USA, Earth
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
I'm also on the Web!  http://www.pagesz.net/~legeros/

Title
Review for Clockers (1995)
     Spike Lee adapts Richard Price to mixed effect.  The director's
over-the-top approach reminded me of Oliver Stone's NATURAL BORN
KILLERS, which may or may not suit the genre of urban "gansta" drama.
Over-scored and under-lit, CLOCKERS is a surreal murder-mystery-as-
morality-play that takes about thirty minutes to settle into.  (Hip hop
over street slang doesn't help the acclimation process.)  The saving
grace is the story.  Price's portrait of a small-time crack dealer
(Meki Phifer) is *far* more potent than anything Lee can do with a
camera.
     The fourth wall is almost nonexistent in this silly adaptation of
Paul Rudnick's off-Broadway smash.  A young gay man's celibate reaction
to the AIDS era is played as scattershot sketch comedy, where the walls
are torn down so quickly that the film never has a chance to recover.
This may have worked wonders on stage, but, here, you can't take a
minute of it seriously.  And that's a problem when the melodrama steps
in.  The cast is very appealing, though.  Standout Patrick Stewart
swishes with style as Jeffrey's best friend, Sterling.  Cameos abound,
including Nathan Lane as a horny priest.  No worries, *indeed*.
     The nicest thing you can say about THE TIES THAT BIND--
screenwriter Wesley Strick's unfortunate directoral debut-- is that all
of the scenes appear to be in the correct order.  If you saw *any* film
this summer, then you've seen the trailer, which gives away the entire
movie: a cute little girl is adopted by two yuppies (Moria Kelly and
Vincent Spano), who find themselves in peril with the return of the
girl's psychotic, white-trash parents (Keith Carradine and Daryl
Hannah, slumming).  Zero wit, style, tension, characterization, etc.
*must* be somebody's idea of a cruel joke.
[ Insert drum roll... ]  Makes CONGO look like CITIZEN KANE.

Title
Review for Evita (1996)
     More music video than musical, EVITA is a rock opera that doesn't
rock.  Three, maybe four songs crackle with the kind of energy that
threatens to send the audience into the aisles dancing.  The rest of the
songs-- all of which sound canned, another problem-- are slower, softer,
and often sleep-inducing.  Lady Madonna is picture-perfect and, at 
times, vocally impressive as the died-young-after-sleeping-her-way-to-
the-top Argentinean First Lady.  Rarely does she sing with the gusto,
though, that wandering narrator Antonio Banderas does; he has a set of
pipes that you won't believe!  The other singer/star is Jonathan Pryce
(CARRINGTON) and he barely registers as Juan Peron, partially due to his
having the least-interesting singing voice.  (And where are the profound
basses?  Andrew Lloyd Weber's score sorely lacks a bruising bottom-end.)
EVITA isn't exactly a fun movie to watch, nor is it particularly power-
ful.  Director Alan Parker (THE COMMITTMENTS, MISSISSIPPI BURNING), who
also co-wrote the script with Oliver Stone, provides, at best, bombastic
sketches of a certain someone's life.  Little to nothing is revealed
about Eva Peron's character, but, oh, doesn't she look pretty and sing
well?  
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC, USA, Earth
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
MOVIE HELL home page:  http://www.n-vision.com/hell/

Title
Review for Jack (1996)
     Last seen making trashy vampire movies, Francis Ford Coppola
directs this low-powered, light-hearted drama about a boy with the body
of an adult.  Sound familiar?  This time the magic is medical:  an
infant who is growing at four times the rate of normal.  Cut ahead to
age ten and Jack Powell, played by Robin Williams, looks like your
average forty-year-old adult.  (Or, with those hairy arms, your average
forty-year-old lumberjack.) Jack is a boy in a suburban bubble.  He's
tutored at home, his mom doesn't work, and he's given everything he
wants, *except* the chance to play with kids his own age.  So what
happens?  Jack Goes to School, where he experiences a bunch of new
things, from alienation to acceptance to, finally, awareness about
himself and his condition.
     Though ultimately unsuccessful as a message movie-- the moral of
the story is...  people get old?  Well, duh-- JACK is endearing enough.
And entirely recommendable.  Given plenty of room to act his age, Robin
Williams delivers a performance that is warm, funny, and far from
ingratiating.  No Oscar baiting here; not in a movie featuring such
frivolity as fart lighting.  (Suggested story idea for CHAIN REACTION 2:
Keanu Reeves spends two hours fleeing his own flatulence.  Sorry.) The
pokey pacing, however, makes for a bit of a long sit.  As does the
occasionally gushing sentiment and the ever-dawning realization that the
story isn't going anywhere in particular.  Except, perhaps, as fodder
for the next Mel Brooks spoof.  (Suggested title: LARGE.) With strong
supporting work from Bill Cosby, Fran Drescher, and Michael McKean.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Beyond Rangoon (1995)
(Columbia) 
Directed by    John Boorman 
Written by     Alex Lasker & Bill Rubenstein 
Cast           Patricia Arquette, Frances McDormand, Spalding Gray, 
               U Aung Ko 
MPAA Rating    Rated "R" (presumably for graphic violence) 
Running Time   Approx. 100 minutes 
Reviewed at    General Cinemas at Pleasant Valley, Raleigh (22AUG95) 
     We could paraphrase Michelle Pfieffer's character in DANGEROUS
MINDS and say that BEYOND RANGOON starts with an "A."  That's fair
enough.  All movies, like all school children, should be given the
benefit of the doubt.  The chance to succeed.  After all, we like to
think that the right combination of talent and effort can do wonders.
Mountains can be moved, and good movies can be made.  Yeah right.
Children fail, as do films.  As does director John Boorman's latest.
     The success of BEYOND RANGOON hinges on the believability of
Patricia Arquette (ED WOOD, TRUE ROMANCE) as the busty
Westerner-in-peril wandering about 1988 Burma without a passport.
Though we can stomach the mild plot contrivances that get her there,
it's a tougher task to overlook the actress.  She's a lightweight.  As
the first scene (with narration!) demonstrates, she doesn't have
*nearly* enough range for the emotions that her character--a mother
fleeing the memories of a murdered husband and son--is supposed to
show.  She may give a stronger performance than, say, Keanu Reeves in A
WALK IN THE CLOUDS, by not by much.
     BEYOND RANGOON is a very physically appealing film, thanks to the
practiced craftsmanship of John Boorman (DELIVERANCE, EXCALIBUR, HOPE
AND GLORY).  He keeps the narrative moving, no matter how muddy the
story--or the heroine--gets.  Why he chose Arquette remains a
mystery, though.  Maybe he was thinking that the dramatic weight of the
story would overcome any casting deficiencies.  But even after an hour
of half-stated political statements and murky mass killings, we *still*
don't know enough of what's happening in this country to feel
distressed for the characters or their situations.  Empty exoticism.
     The technical credits in BEYOND RANGOON are a curious mix,
combining lush jungle photography with bad blue-screen work.  Also odd
is the obvious dubbing.  Done to make some of the foreign characters
sound less foreign?  And, is it my mistake, or do the same extras keep
reappearing as different soldiers??  Doo doo doo doo.  ["Twilight Zone"
theme, or opinion of movie.  You be the judge.]

Title
Review for Edge, The (1997)
     THE EDGE is an okay thriller about a billionaire bookworm (Anthony
Hopkins) and a swinging-dick fashion photographer (Alec Baldwin) who,
along with one of the hired help, get stranded sans provisions in the
Alaskan wild, miles from their middle-of-nowhere lodging, where the rich
man's model wife (Elle Macpherson, contributing to the local supply of
timber) and the rest of their party is waiting.  The catch?  Well, there
are a couple.  First, the younger dude may or may not have dangerous
designs on Mrs. Money Bags.  Second, that seemingly unassuming old guy
is actually a fount of knowledge-- theoretical, at least-- on the sub-
ject of outdoor survival.  Third, it's bear season.  And, when one of
those 1800-pound monsters gets a taste for human flesh, well, guess who
gets eaten first.
     As directed by Lee Tamahori (MULHOLLAND FALLS, ONCE WERE WARRIORS),
from a script by David Mamet of all people, THE EDGE doesn't have much
of one.  The various elements, while admittedly intriguing, never gel
into a compelling, cohesive whole.  Hopkins delivers a thoughtful per-
formance, while his costar slogs through a much murkier characteriza-
tion.  What do these men *really* mean to each other?  Who knows, but
they *do* get to engage in one whammo of a bear fight.  However unaf-
fecting the first and final reels are-- did they have to reveal *all* of
the survivalist secrets in those first few scenes?-- the big battle is
probably worth the matinee price of admission.  I mean, when will you
ever again get to see Hopkins, a live bear, and a handmade spear sharing
the same frame?  Breathtaking scenery, too.  

Title
Review for Bogus (1996)
     Were it better written and directed, this unaffecting fantasy might
come across as something other than leftovers from a high-powered
Hollywood lunch.  ("Let's get Whoopi!" "Yeah, and pair her with...  that
Frenchman!") There isn't much subtlety to this story of a little boy
(Haley Joel Osment), his imaginary friend (Gerard Depardieu), and the
grumpy guardian that the boy goes to live with (Whoopi Goldberg) after
his mother is killed in a car accident.  Spoon-feeding is the order of
the day and director Norman Jewison (MOONSTRUCK) overstates nearly every
emotion and related plot point.  (The incessant musical cues are also
tough to take, though I didn't mind hearing Louis Prima's "Banana Split
For My Baby" played during a soda-fountain fantasy sequence.)  Worst of
all is Whoopi's characterization.  Instead of coming across as a lovable
party poop, her self-absorbed actions suggest a level of negligence that
might send a social worker screaming from the theater.  Mercifully, the
darkness is cursed by two luminaries.  The kid, Osment, is a natural and
that Frenchman, with his loopy smile and bulbous nose, is an imaginary
giant for all ages. 
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Fierce Creatures (1997)
     Neither sequel nor equal to A FISH CALLED WANDA, this zoo-keeping
British comedy reunites the original cast-- and a portion of the
original production crew-- with looser, if not downright lazier results.
The timing isn't as sharp, the pace isn't as brisk, and the four
characters aren't nearly as tight together as an ensemble.  Both Michael
Palin and Jamie Lee Curtis are wasted, but, hey, that leaves the door
wide open for John Cleese and Kevin Kline to steal the show.  And they
do.  Kline actually plays two roles, including his character's father.
His younger self is a slightly sillier variation on Otto, his Oscar-
winning WANDA role.  Cleese treads equally familiar ground with an
update of his "Fawlty Towers" television character.  His script (co-
written with Iain Johnstone) rehashes several better-known Basil bits,
which, for the newcomer, should have them in stitches.  The seasoned
hotel guest, however, may react with less than total hilarity.  Sorry,
sorry, sorry.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC, USA, Earth
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
I'm also on the Web!  http://www.pagesz.net/~legeros/

Title
Review for Arrival, The (1996)

Title
Review for Dracula: Dead and Loving It (1995)
(Col)
Directed by     Mel Brooks
Written by      Mel Brooks, Rudy De Luca, Steve Haberman
Cast            Leslie Nielsen, Peter MacNicol, Steven Weber, Amy
                Yasbeck, Lysette Anthony, Harvey Korman, Mel Brooks
MPAA Rating     "PG-13"
Running Time    Approximately 90 minutes
Reviewed at     Carmike Cinemas at Six Forks, Raleigh, NC (13OCT95)
     Any excursion into the mind of Mel Brooks is an occasion for cele-
bration, even when it's a surprisingly slim spoof of Dracula films, old
and new.  Slight, and more than a little bit flat, DRACULA: DEAD AND
LOVING IT is at least an improvement over his last film, ROBIN HOOD:
MEN IN TIGHTS.  The laugh count is still awfully low--there hasn't
been a *funny* Mel Brooks movie since, oh, his 1983 remake of TO BE OR
NOT TO BE--but there are a *few* funny moments.  And at least one
classic scene involving a large quantity of blood.
     Casting is part of the problem.  In better days, Brooks had his
pick from the likes of Madeline Kahn, Gene Wilder, Dom DeLuise, and
Cloris Leachmen.  Here, with the exception of Harvey Korman and a few
fleeting old faces, he's working with featherweights.  Such as Steven
Weber (JEFFREY) and Amy Yasbeck (PROBLEM CHILD).  (To be fair, Peter
MacNicol is dead-on funny as the insect-loving Renfield.  He has a
great scene with Korman at a breakfast table.)
     Oddly, the role of Dracula seems miscast.  Leslie Nielsen is a
great bumbler, but far less effective as a suave Transylvanian.  (His
inclusion, I suspect, was more market-driven than anything else.  He's
amusing enough, but would people really have paid to see, say, Frank
Langella spoofing himself?)  Brooks, who appears as the vampire-hunting
Van Helsing, plays things straight; perhaps too straight.  Nobody
breaks into song; nobody appears dressed as a Nazi.
     However good-natured the humor is, DRACULA: DEAD AND LOVING IT is
still flat on all fronts.  This movie is neither scary-funny enough;
nor quick-witted enough; nor authentic-looking enough to be effective.
(If anything begs for some serious spoofing it's those great visual
effects in BRAM STOKER'S DRACULA; effects that Brooks never takes a
hearty stab at.  Too bad.)  The old Mel Brooks shows his face in a few
scenes--an autopsy here, a gynecology line there--but, for the most
part, the man who made YOUNG FRANKENSTEIN is still down for the count.
Michael J. Legeros - Raleigh, NC        
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Check triangle.movies for weekly reviews from MOVIE HELL

Title
Review for Ransom (1996)
    RANSOM, director Ron Howard's underwhelming though thoroughly
plotted remake of the little-known Glenn Ford film, stars Mel Gibson as
a self-promoting, self-protecting, self-made billionaire whose world
comes crashing to a halt when his young son is kidnapped.  The catch?
As the ads have revealed for several months now, instead of given them
what they want, he takes their money to a television station and offers
a two million-dollar bounty on the kidnappers' heads.  This twist, which
comes about an hour into the film, is exciting in principle, but doesn't
send the story charging forward.  Instead of Mel gearing up with a band
of bounty hunters-- and wouldn't *that* be something to see!-- we get
even more talk, a couple of keen role reversals, and an entirely odd
final confrontation between Gibson and Gary Sinese, who plays the
mastermind behind the crime.
    Sinese is a waste, which I'll detail later, but Gibson gets to go
nuts and that's what we pay him for.  Other prominent players include
Rene Russo (TIN CUP), looking less plastic than usual.  She has little
to do as the trophy wife, but contributes to the overall suspense by
appearing shorter than her co-star.  (How did they do that, you'll
wonder.  Morphing?  Trick photography??) The ever-prolific Delroy Lindo
(BROKEN ARROW, CLOCKERS) plays the head FBI agent and he's always good.
Most interesting is the inclusion of Lily Taylor and Liev Schreiber,
established actors from the world of indy cinema who play two of the
grungy, Gen-X henchmen.  The presence of these unsavory young characters
in a Hollywood Event Picture-- not to mention in a Ron Howard film, for
gosh sakes!-- suggests that the new villain of the nineties may be of
the dirty, tattooed, cigarette-smoking, cereal-eating, cyber-phreaking,
rerun- watching variety.  Who's that guy with the nose ring, Robin?  I
don't know, Batman, better blow him away.
    Both heroes and villains get equal time and that makes for a well-
balanced story, with everyone giving a game performance, even when they
don't entirely fit in.  Like Ms. Russo.  The glaring exception is Gary
Sinese, who's horribly miscast as the cop-turned-criminal-mastermind.
Lieutenant Dan is a good actor who, here, has almost no tangible weight
as a heavy.  Frankly, he's about as threatening as Joe Pesci's Leo Getz.
Okay, okay, okay, but witness his hollow monologue about THE TIME
MACHINE to see what he's missing.  If the characters don't always work,
at least the plot machinery does.  It keeps churning away, like the
Morlock machinery beneath that future world.  The end result is a
reasonably entertaining popcorn pic-- two hours of multiplex filler that
only crashes and burns when it tries to take itself too seriously.  If
Ron Howard had recognized RANSOM as the potboiler that it is, he
might've trimmed some of the hokum.  (Or restored some of the logic.  Or
replaced that fuzzy score from James Horner.  Ugh.) Try not to giggle
when something serious is seriously funny, like when Sinese says with a
straight face to Taylor: "You know what you're scared of?  Your own
humanity." I laughed out loud.  
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC, USA, Earth
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Substitute, The (1996)
(Orion)
Directed by     Robert Mandel
Written by      Roy Frumkes, Rocco Simonelli, and Alan Ormsby
Cast            Tom Berenger, Diane Venora, Ernie Hudson, Glenn Plummer,
                Marc Anthony, William Forsythe, Luis Guzman
MPAA Rating     "R" (presumably for language and violence)
Running Time    120 min.
Reviewed at     Carmike Cinemas, Raleigh, NC (21APR96)
     Anyone who has ever taught public school should get a (mild) charge
out of this one.  Tom Berenger stars as an out-of-work "operative" who
take his girlfriend's place at an inner-city high-school, after an
assault (on her) by a gang member.  He traces the attack back to a
student, quickly arranges some fake credentials, and shows up the next
day as "Mr. Smith." Just like that.  Predictable, poorly lit, and
possessing a tone that too easily shifts on a dime (from revenge fantasy
to message movie to all points in-between), THE SUBSTITUTE is best
enjoyed at face value.
     The ensemble acting is surprisingly sincere, with Berenger lean and
mean in the title role.  (He reminds me of how the Marvel Comics'
character The Punisher would behave on-screen, had he not been played by
the unfortunate Dolph Lundgren in that unfortunate 1990 movie.) The film
also has a strong sense humor, right down to the straight-faced
Schwarzenegger accent attempted by Berenger.  Of course, to enjoy this
nonsense, you have accept a harsh moral stance that allows, among other
things, all drug dealers to be shot on sight.  Exploitative?  Yes.
Gratuitous?  Yes.  Just remember to check your testosterone level before
entering.
     THE SUBSTITUTE kicks effective butt for about an hour and a half,
at which point the story finally-- inevitably?-- begins to repeat
itself.  The last twenty minutes are the worst:  Yet Another Showdown,
except this one so poorly lit that we can't tell who is shooting whom.
Leave a half-hour early and you won't miss a thing.  Really.  Now, if
only someone had thought to make DANGEROUS MINDS with Linda Hamilton
instead of Michelle Pfieffer.  She'd be back.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Phantoms (1998)
(Dimension)
Directed by     Joe Chappelle
Written by      Dean Koontz, based on his book
Cast            Peter O'Toole, Joanna Going, Rose McGowan, Ben Affleck,
                Liev Schreiber, Clifton Powell
MPAA Rating     "R" (presumably for violence and profanity)
Running Time    95 minutes
Reviewed at     The Imperial, Cary, NC (21JAN98)
    PHANTOMS is the new Dean Koontz crap-fest, about a remote Colorado
town where some 700 people have disappeared, save for a few things left
behind:  a body here, a body part there, a conspicuous pile of
"undigestibles" (buttons, watches, pacemakers, etc.) over in the corner.
Two sisters (Joanna Going and Rose McGowan) make the grim discovery,
after arriving in the empty town.  One's a doctor, so she suspects an
epidemic and they both begin poking around, instead of immediately
heading for the hills.  (They'd have to hoof it, though, as neither
theirs nor any other car around will start.) As night falls, they're
joined by the local law (Ben Affleck presiding) and they continue to
poke around, though now accompanied by periodic gunfire.  (They shoot at
stuff.) Later that evening, they're joined by a tabloid-employed, Army-
escorted expert on mass disappearances who happens to look exactly like
Peter O'Toole.  And they continue to poke around.  And more gunfire
happens.  And, soon, we begin to learn exactly who or what is menacing
the town and causing these actors to take themselves so seriously.
    Despite dim dialogue and even lousier lighting, the first half of
PHANTOMS *does* pull off a few well-wrought frights.  (My neck hairs
might've risen to the occasion, had I not been walking to and fro,
asking the management of the Cary Imperial about an audio problem that,
to these ears, sounded like a speaker with a blood- soaked blanket
thrown over it.) Things get scary in a different way in the second hour,
with cruddy CGI effects and increasingly insipid plotting.  (I liked the
sheriff's snap conclusions about the invading menace.  He's seen his
share of "Star Trek" episodes.) You'll yawn, you'll wince, but if you
walk out early, you'll miss Liev Schreiber's return.  (He first appears
as an intense deputy.  In later scenes, he's back, hamming it up as "one
of them.") Oh, and at the end, there *is* one huge, helluva hearty laugh
to be had, at O'Toole, standing in the snow and delivering a monologue
to... an open manhole.  Friends, now *that's* entertainment.  Directed
by Joe Chappelle (HALLOWEEN 6) and scripted by Koontz, from his 1983
novel.  (Rated "R"/95 min.)

Title
Review for I'll Do Anything (1994)
Written and directed by James L.  Brooks
Starring Nick Notle, Whittni Wright, Albert Brooks, Julie Kavner,
         Joely Richardson, and Tracey Ullman
     Nick Nolte sings!  At least that was the intention of
writer/director (and producer) James L. Brooks, who originally filmed
I'LL DO ANYTHING as a musical complete with songs written by Prince and
Sinead O'Conner!  But lousy test scores--in addition to audiences that
literally walked out during the songs--prompted Brooks to reshoot and
restructure his film.  The non-musical result is a charming, but
dreadfully slow, romantic comedy.
     The plot revolves around veteran character actor Matt Hobbs
(Nolte).  He's so desperate for work that he's taken a job as chauffeur
to movie producer Burke Adler (Brooks).  Hobbs has been handed his
six-year-old daughter, whom he hasn't seen in two years and now has to
raise on his own.  He's also attracted to one of Adler's staff
members--Cathy (Richardson), a charming development executive with
designs on restarting his career.
     Needless to say, the actor quickly realizes that bachelorhood and
fatherhood don't always go together.
     The story's second tier accompanies Adler.  His relationship with
Nan Mulhanney (Kavner), an audience-tester and dating skeptic, is under
stress because the self-obsessed producer of "Popcorn Pictures" can't
calm down.  He's bugged because his latest actioner is getting lousy
"scores." To add insult to injury, the only time his calls are returned
is at lunch.  When he's not there. (!)
     All this, set against the seemingly exciting and no-longer-musical
world of motion picture and television production!
     Handsomely shot and very well-written, I'LL DO ANYTHING is,
simply, s-l-o-w.  Here and there, a couple scenes move like the better
Brooks comedies BROADCAST NEWS and TERMS OF ENDEARMENT.  But the bulk
of it is a lazy insider-look at movie-making with a sitcom-cute kid
angle.
     Which doesn't work 'cause this kid ain't cute.  In fact, she's
downright obnoxious!  Up until one whopper of a cloying ending,
newcomer Whittni Wright gives a very remarkable performance.  But she
acts just like a six-year-old brat.  And that's *no* fun to watch.
     Dad's quite a draw, though.  Even when sporting a long-haired wig
that makes him look like Ron Perlman's "Beast," Nick Nolte gets off one
of his best (and most subtle) roles in a while.  His chemistry with
Richardson is good, too!
     If Nolte gets the best scenes, Albert Brooks gets all the good
lines.  As the self-absorbed Adler, he even gets a classic monologue in
which he describes a field of "exploding windmills."  Forget those
fictional Joel Silvers; this is a megalomaniac to remember!
     Oddly, both Tracey Ullman and Julie Kavner seem miscast.  Ullman
is barely watchable in her scenes, sporting a Bad Southern Accent as
Notle's jail-bound wife.  Kavner is more watchable, albeit unappealing,
but she doesn't have the fire to match Brooks' raging gloom.  Only
Richardson stands strong on the female front.
     Watch for a few cameos, including Woody Harrelson and Kavner's
"Simpsons" co-star Harry Shearer.
     One question lingers: who is the intended audience?  If mainstream
America didn't want to hear Nick Nolte sing, can they also appreciate
the jokes about "target audiences" and "test scores?"

Title
Review for Sense and Sensibility (1995)
(Columbia)
Directed by      Ang Lee
Written by       Emma Thompson, from the novel by Jane Austen
Cast             Emma Thompson, Kate Winslet, Alan Rickman, Hugh Grant
MPAA Rating      "PG"
Running Time     135 minutes
Reviewed at      Mission Valley Cinemas, Raleigh, NC (20JAN96)
     Over-praised even more than Ron Howard's good-but-not-that-good
APOLLO 13, the last Jane Austen adaptation of the year (after CLUELESS
and PERSUASION) is a sweet, stately affair.  The story stars Emma
Thompson and Kate Winslet (HEAVENLY CREATURES) as two sisters-sans-
dowries, anxious to be married even if their cash-flow problems may
preclude same.  The suitors do come, of course, and all sorts of
silliness ensues as everyone tries to figure out exactly who is engaged
to whom.
     The charms of SENSE AND SENSIBILITY are many, thanks in great part
to the warmth of a fine cast.  The stronger performances include Winset,
Thompson, Alan Rickman, and Elizabeth Spriggs, my favorite, as the
lively Mrs. Jennings.  Sure, Ms. Thompson is too old for her part, but
she's a world better than the less-than-divine Hugh Grant.  The stam-
mering actor is too stiff the role of Bachelor Number One and his
presence completely weakens one of the story's core relationships.
     Taiwanese director Ang Lee (EAT DRINK MAN WOMAN) directs from a
screenplay by Thompson (!) that's very amusing.  In fact, the audience
that I saw this with laughed at almost every line, gesture, or action by
the characters.  Perhaps the reason for so much praise is due, in part,
to what this movie *isn't.*  SENSE AND SENSIBILITY is easy to like (and
easy to recommend) because it doesn't contain any blood, bullets,
hookers, strippers, cursing, swearing, superheroes, product plugs, sex,
drugs, rock `n' roll, or other self-destructive behaviors.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit the MOVIE HELL site http://www-nvision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Double Team (1997)
     Jean-Claude Van Damme's third pairing with a renowned Chinese film-
maker-- director Tsui Hark, a veteran of fifty films including ONCE UPON
A TIME IN CHINA-- is wonderfully dumb fun.  And, I believe, even more
movie than either HARD TARGET (directed by John Woo) or last year's MAX-
IMUM RISK (Ringo Lam).  In fact, the plot is so convoluted that even *I*
couldn't follow all the twisty turns.  (Terrorists.  Counter-terrorists.  
Six-foot-eight arms dealers.  Pregnant wives in peril.  A Roman order of
Internet-surfing monks.  An island think tank of "retired" specialists.
And one big Bengal tiger.  Got it?) However head-spinning it sounds,
this is another movie of stunts and set pieces and explosions.  Lots of
explosions.  Forget the holes.  Forget the believability quotient.  For-
get the high-profile presence of Dennis Rodman, one of many internation-
al "stars" who appear here.  It's Hark, his editor, and his many stunt
coordinators and choreographers who take your breath away.  All you have
to do is buy a ticket.  And a Coke.  

Title
Review for Muppet Treasure Island (1996)
     Robert Louis Stevenson gets the musical Muppet treatment in this 
swashbuckling story of a boy, a rat, and a Great Gonzo who find adventure 
on the high-seas, under the judicious green thumb of a gracious Captain 
(Kermit the Frog), and the watchful eye of a particular pirate (Tim 
Curry, as Long John Silver).  There's a surprisingly solid story to go 
along with the expected in-jokes, asides, and anachronisms; credit one of 
the writers, James V. Hart, who also co-wrote HOOK.  But just as Renny 
Harlin and Geena Davis failed to patch the leaks in CUTTHROAT ISLAND, so 
have Brian Henson and Frank Oz sunk themselves with MUPPET TREASURE 
ISLAND.  They've made a fine kid's movie that's *way* too slow for anyone 
over the age of eight.  Even the songs are dull.  Except, that is, for 
"Cabin Fever," an amusing number in mid-film that most adult viewers will 
be able to relate to.  Arrgghh. 
--
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
MOVIE HELL is on the Web!  http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Serial Mom (1994)
     If memory serves, Kathleen Turner was originally offered the role
of the neurotic nanny in ADDAMS FAMILY VALUES.  Joan Cusack took
it--and ran with it--and Ms. Turner lent her body heat to less-popular
films like UNDERCOVER BLUES.  Judging from her performance in the new
comedy SERIAL MOM, Ms.  Turner would've made an admirable addition to
the FAMILY.  As it stands, her portrayal of a Betty Crocker killer is
the *only* thing funny in this rather unfunny film.
     Meet Beverly Sutphin (Turner)--a happy homemaker with a happy home
and a happy family.  Dad (Waterston) is a dentist, daughter's (Lake) in
college, and son (Lillard) is a high-school-aged gore-film freak.  They
all smile in the sunshine and beam over breakfast and Mom sends her
clan packing with fresh fruit in their lunches.  But once they've left,
her countenance cracks and Beverly becomes the Housewife From Hell.
     Her "day" begins with obscene phone calls to a neighborhood
woman.  Then comes a visit to the high school and a suggestion from a
teacher that her son seek therapy.  Beverly snaps and, on her way out,
calmly runs the man down with her car.  The body count begins as frau
Sutphin sets her sights on everyone from her daughter's impolite
boyfriend to a nosy neighbor who doesn't recycle...
     Buyer beware, director John Waters--two words: PINK
FLAMINGOS--pushes the "R" rating to the limit.  SERIAL MOM is an
omnibus of gross-out gags and *nothing* is sacred in these Waters.  You
can imagine the director's glee in letting his players play with
everything from fresh phlegm to eviscerated internal organs.  Yum yum.
     Very black it is, very funny it ain't.  SERIAL MOM covers familiar
ground with yet another satirical slam on white-bread America.  Heck, we
saw it only last week in Michael Ritchie's less-daring but far-funnier
COPS AND ROBBERSONS.  Plastic America is a tired cliche.  Period.
     SERIAL MOM also targets the current craze of courtroom
celebrities.  But let's face it, we've already *had* our laughs at
Lorena Bobbitt and Tonya Harding and Menendez and Mendendez.  How can
the film's mildly amusing trial sequence ever *hope* to compete with
Letterman or Leno on a good night?
     Equally distressing is the missing climax.  SERIAL MOM ends
abruptly and without anything resembling a "big finish." Too bad.
     Kathleen Turner is a stitch as June-Cleaver-with-a-cleaver and her
manic mood changes are the lifeblood of SERIAL MOM.  Turner brings a
campy charm to all of her scenes, including an inspired moment of
Hitchcock homage with Beverly bludgeoning a woman (with a leg of lamb,
no less!) who is watching and singing along to ANNIE.  The rest of the
cast--and the film--should be so funny.

Title
Review for Joe's Apartment (1996)
     The year's best tag-line, "sex bugs rock 'n' roll," is actually a
bit of misnomer.  There's precious little skin and only a mild rock
sensibility to this feature-film expansion of the MTV short.  John
Payson, who created the original, writes and directs this absurdly
amusing comedy about a young man from Iowa (Jerry O'Connell) and his
adventures living with thousands of talking (and singing, and dancing)
cockroaches in a run-down, rent-controlled apartment in New York City.
Animated by stop-motion and CGI effects, the bug sequences (roach
clips?) are delightful.  The insects squeal like Joe Pesci on helium as
they bicker, banter, and break into song.  (My favorite: a Busby
Berkeley number set inside a toilet bowl.) The plot, involving a
romantic interest and some serious landlord woes, is awfully thin and
makes the 79-minute running time seem longer than it really is.  JOE'S
APARTMENT works best as a mild comedy about life in the Big Apple.  How
will gags about 911 operators, street violence, and pooper scoopers play
in Peoria?  Only the grosses will tell.  With appearances by David
Huddleston, Don Ho, and Robert Vaughn, who has aged into a fine Strother
Martin look-alike.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Blue Chips (1994)
Directed by William Friedkin 
Written by Ron Shelton  
Starring Nick Nolte, Mary McDonnell, J. T. Walsh, Alfre Woodard, Shaquille
O'Neal, and Ed O'Neill
MPAA Rating     PG-13  (though boasting the highest "god****" count in
                        recent memory. :)
Running Time    108 minutes
     Hurrah!  Hurrah!  Once-upon-a-time wunderkind Bill Friedkin is
back and with a subject that hits, at here in North Carolian, *very*
close to home.  With an assist from basketballsy writer Ron Shelton,
Friedkin's first film in four is a exciting but easy examination of
illegal recruiting practices in college basketball.
     BLUE CHIPS introduces Pete Bell (Nolte), the dedicated coach of
the Western University Dolphins.  The team has just wrapped its first
losing season and Bell is upset, to the say the least.  He knows that
his team is doing their best, but he needs better players--boys they
can't recruit because *he* won't play "dirty pool." Pressured by
everyone from the alumni to his athletic director, Bell confronts this
issue to build a strong "starting line" for the upcoming season.
     BLUE CHIPS is a frantically charged film.  True to Friedkin form,
*everything* stays in motion.  Bill films basketball like he was born
for it and even his off-court scenes have an infectious energy.  He
also pulls a powerhouse performance from Nolte, who spends the entire
film wrestling with his conscious more than with his players.  Nolte's
best scene comes early, when he punts a basketball into the stands
after losing a fight with a ref.
     Less successful is Shelton's script and how it oversimplifies
illegal recruiting.  The characters have depth, but not the story.  The
ending is unusually good for a sports film, though.  BLUE CHIPS favors
fair-play instead of feel-good and it's a welcome change.  Even *with*
a soapbox speech at the end.
     McDonnell gives a mediocre performance as Bell's basketball-smart
ex-wife.  And there's barely any chemistry between her and Nolte.  The
ever-leering J. T. Walsh hangs out the ham, again, as an boorish
booster.  And seven-foot, four-inch "Shaq" O'Neal makes an appealing
freshman recruit.
     (Six-foot, one-inch "Ed" O'Neill is wasted as an investigative
reporter, though.  But his inclusion may be nothing more than a simple
joke--if memory serves, O'Neill once played a TV version of "Popeye"
Doyle!)
     For basketball fans, BLUE CHIPS is a fountain of familiar faces.
Larry Bird, Bob Cousy, Jerry Tarkanian, and, yes, Dick Vitale, are just
some of the good sports who appear in the film.

Title
Review for Spy Hard (1996)
     The rapid-fire formula that worked so well in AIRPLANE!, the
"Police Squad!" television series, TOP SECRET!, three NAKED GUN films,
and two HOT SHOTS!  movies has finally reached a desperate dead-end with
SPY HARD.  Even Ezio Gregio's THE SILENCE OF THE HAMS is arguably
funnier than this over-extended spy- and action-movie spoof.  Leslie
Nielsen stars as secret agent WD-40, who returns from retirement to
battle his old nemesis, General Rancor (a cackling Andy Griffith).  The
jokes fly in every direction and with hardly a hint of restraint,
timing, or tact.  Most the movie is comprised of recycled AIRPLANE and
NAKED GUN gags, recreated movie sequences, and soggy star cameos.  Yeah,
maybe we *do* need Ray Charles driving an L.A. bus bound for a SPEED
bump, but did Mr. T, Hulk Hogan, and Dr. Joyce Brothers also have to
appear in the same movie?
     Leslie Nielsen plays it straight with his usual dopey flair.  There
is something oddly inspiring about the sight of Nielsen wearing a nun's
habit, even the resulting SISTER ACT spoof is silly.  As are the bits
directly lifted from HOME ALONE, PULP FICTION, TRUE LIES, etc. etc.
(Adolescent males might enjoy this mess, tho.  The butt shots, breast
peeks, penis pokes, flatulence gags, and related innuendo are right up
Beavis and Butthead's alley.) Beyond the hilarious title sequence with
"Weird" Al Yankovich performing the theme song, SPY HARD is barely the
stock that it's printed on.  My recommendation:  duck in while you're
waiting for another movie to start.  Stay long enough to see the camera
dart inside of Weird Al's nostril and then leave.  You won't miss a
thing.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Sudden Death (1995)
     There's a playful absurdity to SUDDEN DEATH that wouldn't be 
out of place in a John Woo movie.  Sure, the plot--about a lone 
fireman (Jean-Claude Van Damme) in a terrorist-held hockey rink--
is a rip-off of DIE HARD, but the over-the-top approach could have 
come straight from Hong Kong.  Of course, director Peter Hyams 
(TIMECOP) is no John Woo.  (Or, for that matter, even a Robert 
Rodriguez.) He can't construct a tightly choreographed fist-fight 
to save his life.  What Hyams *is* good at, though, is the *big* 
stuff:  impressive aerial shots of the Pittsburgh Civic Arena, 
surrounded on all sides by the flashing lights of emergency 
vehicles.  Or the in-your-face hockey footage that is juxtaposed 
through- out the film.  (The plot has the Vice President held 
hostage during a Stanley Cup playoff.)
     Hyams liabilities as a lean-and-mean action director are 
evident in the very first scene.  Cut to a residential 
neighborhood, where Van Damme's character, a Pittsburg firefighter, 
is trapped inside a working house fire.  The short sequence is 
staged with no more finesse than your average TV movie and that's a 
sign for us.  We know, in those first few minutes, that the rest of 
the action is going to be only OK.  Not great, just OK.  (The later 
"oohs" and "aahs" you hear are from those who have never seen the 
good stuff, such as John Woo's HARD TARGET, made with Van Damme in 
1993.)
     With the visceral impact diluted, the incentive to keep 
watching comes from the honest humor--which is unusually generous 
for a film of this sort--and the parody.  Or is it self-parody?  
Who can tell where to draw the line after watching a free-for-all 
kitchen brawl between Van Damme and a woman in a mascot suit?  When 
a giant penguin tries to push our hero's head into a deep-fat 
fryer, we know not to take things too seriously.  SUDDEN DEATH is 
not a dumb movie, per se, but it is dumb fun.  So, relax and roll 
with the punches.  After all, this *is* a hockey game.  (Rated 
"R"/~110 min.)
Michael J. Legeros - Raleigh, NC        
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Check triangle.movies for weekly reviews from MOVIE HELL

Title
Review for Paradise Road (1997)
     PARADISE ROAD gets my vote for Most Boring Movie of the Year.  A
bunch of stately actresses play a bunch of stately prisoners of war,
interred by the Japanese during World War II, and who form a "vocal
orchestra" as a way to wail in harmony.  The story is true and the
actresses are appealing and neither of these is a reason to recommend
this exceptionally uninteresting movie.  Oh, sure, a *few* things
happen:  one woman is doused with gasoline and set on fire.  A catfight
erupts over soap in the shower.  And Francis McDormand speaks in a campy
German accent.  (Well, at least that's one less role to cast for a big-
screen update of "Hogan's Heroes.")  With the exception of a-cappella
renditions of Dvorak and Ravel, there isn't a thing here that we haven't
seen before.  I kept praying for the film to break.

Title
Review for Cops and Robbersons (1994)
     Despite what the "critics" claim, COPS & ROBBERSONS may be the
movie that jump-starts the career of Chevy Chase.  Said career needs
*something*, considering that its brightest spot (in the last five
years, at least) is a nacho chip commercial.
     Survive the trailer for 3 NINJAS STRIKE BACK--Pepto Bismal
encouraged--and you're ready for COPS & ROBBERSONS: a nicely
underplayed, almost-charming comedy about a super-tough city-cop
(Palance) who invades Suburbia to start a stake-out.
     Welcome to Pleasant Valley--a sickly sweet suburb located only a
few blocks away from the preplanned nonsense of E.T. and EDWARD
SCISSORHANDS.  The cars and homes and streets look almost alike and in
this idyllic little world lives the less-than-idyllic Robbersons.
     The father, Norman (Chase), is a cop-show junkie who spends his
boring days humming TV themes and reading penal codes and driving with
a police radio.  Over-eager Mom (Wiest) tries to be super-sunny, but
she can't even get the family to eat dinner together.  The daughter is
dating, the older son (Ritcher) is smoking, and his younger brother
thinks he's a vampire.
     Clearly, this family needs *something*.
     Enter Detective Jake Stone (Palace).  He and his partner (Gray)
want to spy on a counterfeiter (Davi) living next door.  Jake is a
seasoned sourpuss and his relationship with the Robbersons is strictly
hate-hate.  That is, until Norman starts snooping and ends up
introducing "Uncle" Jake to their nefarious neighbor.  Said action
forces Jake and The Young Man to maintain their cover for 24
hours-a-day and, thus, eat, sleep, and shoot with the Robbersons.
     COPS & ROBBERSONS is 100% light comedy.  The plot is absurd, the
characters are sketches, and the gags are mild.  Even the prerequisite
free-for-all ending is a tame one, save for Chase impersonating Robin
Hood Daffy with a gag stolen from Chuck Jones.
     What's fun, though, is the lazy chemistry between the leads and
their delivery of some great, goofy dialogue from writer Bernie
Somers.
     Chase remains *the* effortlest bumbler.  His blase blunder hints
at the simplicity that Peter Sellers brought to the role of *Chief*
Inspector Jacques Clouseau.  Watch him roll a cigarette for maximum
minimum-hilarity.
     COPS plays closer to ensemble comedy and Chase shares his share of
screen time with both Jack Palance and Robert Davi--two rasping
rapscallions who get quite a bit of mileage by simply leering at Chevy
chasing his tail.  Palace doesn't have much of character, though, but
he gets to growl great lines like "Don't ever throw a cat on me."
Listen for his classic monologue about mowing grass.
     (The obligatory one-armed pushup occurs in a photo montage before
the closing credits.)
     Dianne Wiest doesn't get to play as often as the boys, but she's a
stitch in her few scenes and, in the finale, go nuts with gusto.
     COPS & ROBBERSONS strains in a couple places.  The beginning is a
bust--come on, *another* exploding car?  Then there's Chase doing
DeNiro doing TAXI DRIVER.  Save that one for your next SATURDAY NIGHT
LIVE appearance, Chevy.

Title
Review for Reality Bites (1994)
     REALITY BITES doesn't quite add up.  On the surface, this
agreeable romantic comedy seems like a landmark achievement from both
director Ben Stiller and writer Helen Childress.  It's funny, it's
handsome, and it boasts a *very* appealing cast.
     Touche, Richard Linklater, REALITY BITES is also Hollywood's first
saga about today's disillusioned, post-college youth.  A group better
known as "Generation X."  Comic book forthcoming.
     The film centers on Leaina Pierce (Ryder), a recent Houston, Texas
grad.  Formerly the class valedictorian--who closed her speech with the
sentence "There's no answer."--she now works as an intern on a morning
television show.  She also moonlights as an amateur filmmaker.
     Her roommates are a motley crew.  There's Troy (Hawke), a musician
who excels at lost jobs and umkempt hair.  And Sammy (Zahn), also
unemployed but known to bathe.  And Vickie (Garofalo), proud manager of
a Gap clothing store.
     All living and breathing and eating together.  All in the throes
of dating woes.  And all being filmed for Leaina's documentary.
     With its film-within-a-film subplot, REALITY BITES sounds the
perfect "verite" vehicle for an exploration of "X."  Wrong!  REALITY
BITES is a completely conventional film right down to the squishy,
happy Hollywood ending.  Which is not needed in a story rich with both
humor *and* insight.
     These are kids raised on sitcoms and advertising; kids who talk in
jingles and don't understand why their worlds cannot be restored at the
end of the half-hour.  To which Troy can only comment "Mr. Brady died
of AIDS."
     Who needs formula with psychology like this?
     Ryder, Hawke, and the rest of the gang are tremendous appealing.
Even if they need baths and better clothes.  Ryder, in particular, is a
dynamite presence.  Watch for John Mahoney, who steals a couple scenes
as a chatty TV host, and an unbilled Jeanne Tripplehorn.
     With Stiller's smart direction and good gag after gag, REALITY
BITES feels fine up to a point.  After about an hour of endless
references to the seventies, something doesn't just add up.  These kids
were infants at that time!  How do they know so much about disco and
"Good Times" and PLANET OF THE APES?  Do reruns *really* contain that
much detail?
     Honestly, REALITY BITES feels like it was written by someone in
their their '30's.  The cultural references just don't add up and it
makes an for an incongruity that almost pushes the film into fantasy.
Is writer Helen Childress (in her '20's) *really* taking the pulse of
America's young-adults.  Or did she just find the perfect world to
populate with phony characters?
Suggested alternate title: FANTASY BITES.

Title
Review for Crash (1996)
(Fine Line)
Directed by     David Cronenberg
Written by      David Cronenberg, from the novel by J.G. Ballard
Cast            James Spader, Holly Hunter, Elias Koteas, Deborah Kara
                Unger, Rosanna Arquette
MPAA Rating     "NC-17" (presumably for sex, gore, nudity, etc.)
Running Time    100 minutes.
Reviewed at     The Rialto, Raleigh, NC (21MAR97)
    CRASH is about a bunch of over-sexed Canucks who get their jollies
from colliding cars.  Yup, it's explicit.  Yup, it's vintage David
Cronenberg, with all those scars and wounds and reshaped flesh.  As a
study of sexual fetishes, though, the story needs at least *some* sem-
blance of a reality base.  (And, perhaps, an explanation of why there
are no such things as traffic cops in Canada.) We're thrown into a world
of weird people doing weird things and, without even a remote sense of
which way is up, it's nearly impossible to get oriented enough to get
involved.  Winner of a Special Jury Prize at last year's Cannes Film
Festival.
    CRASH was screened at the Rialto, in Raleigh.  We were greeted by
the sweet smell of sawdust, from the previous day's installation of a
brand-spanking-new screen.  And, oh, doesn't that Dolby Digital system
sound good on the trailer for SMILLA'S SENSE OF SNOW?
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC, USA, Earth
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
I'm also on the Web!  http://www.pagesz.net/~legeros/

Title
Review for Flipper (1996)
     We lasted thirty minutes in this one.  FLIPPER is what I call a
"cinematic black hole," a film so utterly flat-- so completely non-
compelling-- that almost nothing escapes from the screen for the
audience to connect with.  As a teenager spending the summer with his
Florida fisherman uncle, Elijah Wood (THE WAR) is a comatose kid
walking.  He speaks without a hint of inflection in his voice and barely
animates the muscles in his face.  What, was he afraid to outperform the
fish?  Or did he learn a little too much from his WAR co-star Kevin
Costner?  Paul Hogan isn't much better.  The Aussie actor displays
about, oh, one-tenth of the screen charisma that he brought to the role
of "Crocodile" Dundee.  The minimalist plot has something to do with a
dolphin, a hurricane, and a Red Hot Chili Peppers concert.  Oh yeah, and
we heard the word "dioxin" mentioned.  For those kids who have never
seen underwater footage nor visited an aquarium nor vacationed at Sea
World, FLIPPER might be worth a watch.  As for the rest of the western
world... well, I can't think of a single reason to sit through this
movie.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Down Periscope (1996)
     This cornball combo of CRIMSON TIDE and STRIPES plays far better
than it deserves to.  Television star Kelsey Grammer-- known to millions
as the beloved Sideshow Bob on "The Simpsons"-- makes his feature-film
debut as an unorthodox military officer who must win a war game to prove
that he's worthy of his own command.  Sound familiar?  (Among other
things, he must whip a misfit crew into shipshape shape.  Yawn.  The
same plot is used in Jonathan Lynn's SGT. BILKO, which stars Steve
Martin and opens later this month.)
     DOWN PERISCOPE takes about 45 minutes to get up to laugh-out-loud
speed.  Grammer's subdued performance is hard to fathom at first, but an
extended "silent running" sequence-- near the middle of the movie--
marks the transition from "mildly amusing" to "infectious fun." The
bland ensemble cast finally begins to gel over a couple of good sonar
gags and one hilarious bit of flatulence.  (Some semi-serious submarine
stalking is also fun, despite the obvious stock footage.  Think Tom
Clancy lite.)
     Grammer considerations aside, the rest of the cast is exceptionally
unexceptional.  Even Rip Torn's Admiral doesn't add much, though he
*does* get to growl the memorable line: "I want a man with a tattoo on
his dick!" (Don't ask; it's a plot point.) The jokes directed at Lauren
Holly-- as the lone female crew member-- are equally non- PC, but who
can argue with a movie that has the chutzpah to include both a rallying
rendition of "Anchor's Aweigh" and a music video of Kelsey Grammer and
the Village People singing "In the Navy?"
--
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
MOVIE HELL is on the Web!  http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Outbreak (1995)
     If we learned anything during those lazy Saturday afternoon sci-fi
film festivals of our youth, it's that there's nothing more fun than
watching the end of the world.  WAR OF THE WORLDS ... INVASION OF THE
BODY SNATCHERS ... THE DAY THE EARTH CAUGHT FIRE ... great disaster flicks
from an era when our fears were fueled by the space race and the arms
race.  Decades later, those fears are still there. Only now we've
traded our space suits for bio suits.
     In the super-creepy OUTBREAK--which has nothing to do with the
Richard Preston bestseller CRISIS IN THE HOT ZONE--the threat is the
deadly Motaba virus, which has spread from the African jungle to the
sleepy California community Cedar Creek.  The disease is 100%
contagious and 100% fatal.  The victims bleed from the inside out.
     Only one scientist (Dustin Hoffman) knows how bad the situation
really is, and, of course, he's the lone voice of logic against every
possible cliche, from the ex-wife colleague (Rene Russo) to the
skeptical military commander (Morgan Freeman).  He even has a
wet-behind-the-ears sidekick!
     Director Wolfgang Petersen turns the screws very effectly, even if
he paces the film like a sequel to SPEED.  The are very few pauses in
the first ninety minutes, so some scenes seem rushed.  No problem,
There's still *plenty* of paranoia to go around.  The sight of soliders
barricading a quarantined town is something to see.  As is a
single-take tour of the U.S. Army Medical Research Institute for
Infectious Diseases.  The best, by far, is a sequence showing airborne
microbes spewing from a coughing patron in a movie theater!
     The whole thing works very well until the final reel, at which
point the film falls apart.  Credit a pair of tacked-on helicopter
chases and a completely unnecessary confrontation between Morgan
Freeman and Donald Sutherland (as a goofy general).  The added action
is pretty stupid, and it almost causes an important plot point to get
glossed over.  But who am I to argue with audience testers?
BOTTOM LINE:  Contagious fun with a lousy ending.

Title
Review for Widows' Peak (1994)
     WIDOW'S PEAK is a shoddy comedy cum drama about a glamorous
English war widow (Richardson) who wreaks havoc in the humble hamlet of
Kilshannon, a small Irish resort town in the mid 1920's.  Her home is
on a hill--a minor mount called Widows' Peak, where all the residents
are childless and manless.  This maiden mafia is ruled by the blustery
Mrs.  Counihan (Plowright), whose son (Dunbar) is also the pride of the
Peak.  When the war widow sets her sights on the son, she also draws
the attention of the Peaks' strangest spinster, Miss O'Hare (Farrow).
Needless to say, the two commence a-feudin'.
     WIDOW'S PEAK is shoddy.  The dialogue is muted, the direction is
limp, and the music is way too-intrusive. (For a contrast, look at the
clean direction and smooth execution of SPEED.  Different subjects;
same medium.)  The story--written over ten years ago with Mia's mom in
mind--also has problems, notably in the late-in-the-film leap from
comedy to drama.
     The actors are fun, though, and help balance the boredom.
Richardson is great and even manages an accurate American accent.
Plowright is a gas, casually tossing off line after haughty line.
"Enough's enough, we don't want to spoil them!" she tells her fellow
widows, who are tending their husband's graves.  Farrow is fine, but
her character is underwritten.  A loss.  The two prominent
males--Adrian Dunbar and Jim Broadbent--are both good.

Title
Review for Nell (1994)
     Nothing in the first hour of NELL effectively explains what's
going on.  Sure, we're spoon fed the basics: Appalachian doctor Jerome
Lovell (Liam Neeson) is called by the sheriff to a backwoods cabin, the
home of a recluse who was thought to have lived alone.  She was a
stroke victim who had very little contact with the outside world.  She
also had a daughter that no one knew about--a young woman named Nell
(Jodie Foster) who has never known contact with strangers.
     They call Nell a "wild child" and immediately consult a
psychologist (Natasha Richardson) in Charlotte.  She wants Nell in a
hospital, Jerry wants Nell to be left alone, and there you go.  What
does *Nell* want?  Why is Jerry interested in her?  Why does Richardson
talk like she had Reba McEntire as a dialect coach?  The script never
answers these questions.
     Based on a play by Mark Handey, Nell is built around a magnificent
plot device:  a child reared without any human contact other than her
mother.  Said child was borne as the result of a rape and so Mom
painted a very cruel portrait of the outside world.  Mom also suffered
multiple strokes and her aphasia affected how the child was taught to
speak.  (Mom's accent didn't help much either, y'all.)
     The scenes for such a story should write themselves.  Sheriff
discovers cabin.  Doctor discovers Nell.  Nell discovers civilization.
Civilization discovers Nell.  Those scenes exist, but they're pieced
together in a routine, ambiguous fashion that never explains much of
anything.  We get plenty of moonlit shots of Nell communing with
nature, for example.  She dances under the stars and goes swimming
buck-naked.  It's a very showy performance from Foster that says very
little.
     Nell speaks through slow, swaying motions, appearing drunk in
almost every scene.  Why is she acting intoxicated?  Only in the last
few minutes does Nell reveal the mind that *we* know she's had all
along.  We've seen her intelligent stares; we know she's smart.  The
movie needs *less* of her silly swaying and *more* of the characters
who are paying attention to her.
     Director Michael Apted includes a number of images from inside
Nell's mind, which he overuses.  How about some scientific mumbo jumbo,
instead?  Here's a story *filled* with doctors and hospitals, yet no
one stops to give a frank explanation of why Nell is behaving in the
manner she is.
     The film achieves satisfying closure, when Nell gives a courtroom
speech that lets her say all the things that she should've said
before.  Of course, if she had spoken too soon, she would've ruined the
suspense.  Will the bad doctors study her like a specimen?  Will the
good doctors fall in love and protect her?  Duh, what do you think?
BOTTOM LINE:  Great idea for a stupid movie.

Title
Review for Private Parts (1997)
    Believe it or not, this short 'n' sweet biography of shock jock
Howard Stern is rather endearing.  The self-proclaimed King of All Media
is portrayed as a loving father and devoted husband.  He's just a guy
with a raunchy radio act and, thus, is misunderstood by everyone but
himself.  The makers of this movie make it very easy to like Mr. Stern.
Or at least tolerate him.  His hair looks good, he's filmed under favor-
able camera conditions, and the snippets of his show are considerably
toned done.  (Toned down, but still funny.  A kielbasa-swallowing
stripper is something you don't see every day.  For my money, though,
it's the bit with a woman and a woofer that's worth the price of
admission.) Much of PRIVATE PARTS is about the History of Howard, pre-
NBC and before his battles with the program director he dubbed Pig
Vomit.  We see some of his childhood, watch his marriage dissolve and
repair, and wince in embarrassment at his early attempts behind the
mike.  This is mandatory viewing for anyone who's ever worked in radio.
I was taken back to *my* first time in the booth, when the wrong button
stopped George Thorogood's "Bad to the Bone" in mid-song.  I hear ya,
Howard.
    PRIVATE PARTS was screened at the Six Forks Station Cinemas in
Raleigh on 3/7.  Screen #6 smells bad, but the sound was decent.  Except
for the hiss, that is, that was audible when the movie wasn't.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC, USA, Earth
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
I'm also on the Web!  http://www.pagesz.net/~legeros/

Title
Review for Stealing Beauty (1996)
     With apologies to John Landis, a better title might have been AN
AMERICAN VIRGIN IN TUSCANY.  This exquisitely shot soft-core romp
through the Italian countryside stars Liv Tyler (EMPIRE) as a 19-
year-old American whose stay at a sculptor's hillside home-- for the
purposes of having her portrait made and losing her virginity, and not
necessarily in that order-- causes all the men around her to act like
dogs in heat.  They sniff, growl at, and circle their bitches for two
very long hours.  Ms. Tyler, the current queen of the ingenues, projects
an innocence that would be rather sweet to behold if the director,
Bernardo Bertolucci (LITTLE BUDDA, LAST TANGO IN PARIS), didn't have so
much sex on his mind.
     When a dying playwright (Jeremy Irons) meets Lucy, he immediately
begins babbling about the importance of the dirty deed.  At this point,
a certain absurdity creeps into the movie that never leaves, and which
prevents the semi-serious story from breathing without heaving.  The
whole thing is over-sexed.  My favorite:  the strange symbolism of Liv
vomiting into a man's crotch!  And what about all those
below-the-hemline camera angles?!  (To be fair, the story isn't entirely
perverted:  Lucy is also trying to solve the mystery of who bopped her
mom, many years ago on that same hillside.) Bathed in the relaxed amber
tones of cinematographer Darius Khondji (SEVEN, THE CITY OF LOST
CHILDREN), STEALING BEAUTY certainly has the best scenery of any summer
movie.  Too bad that those below- the-belt stirrings have more to do
with a lack of blood flow to the buttocks than anything else.  
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)

Title
Review for When We Were Kings (1996)
     This year's Best Documentary is about rhythm.  The rhythm of the
blues.  The meter of soul.  The cadence of verse, fist, and dance.
Director Leon Gast journeyed to Africa in 1974, to film a festival of
music that was to accompany the championship contest between Muhammad
Ali and George Foreman.  The fight was postponed for six weeks, the
festival went ahead as scheduled, and Gast stuck around, becoming
increasingly interested in both the politics and the personalities
involved.  He shot some great concert footage and also pinned down the
fighters, the promoters, and, even, Zaire's dictator, President Mobutu
Sese Seko.  Two decades passed before Gast could finish his film.  To
the hundreds of hours of footage, he added interviews, including writers
George Plimpton and Norman Mailer, both of whom were originally
ringside.  (And both of whom get a little too much screen time.) The
result is an immensely entertaining time capsule that rocks with an
electrifying rhythm.  And it's funny!  From Ali's rhyming rants to
Mailer's description of Don King's hair, there's a hearty sense of humor
here.  In fact, all that's missing is a modern-day encounter with the
champs.  What we saw at the Academy Awards should've also happened in
this movie.
Mike Legeros - Movie Hell
legeros@pagesz.net - http://www.n-vision.com/hell/

Title
Review for Hunchback of Notre Dame, The (1996)
     Nobody lays it on quite as thick as Walt Disney.  Their newest
seasonal juggernaut, an animated operetta based on the Victor Hugo
classic, is just as big, bright, and beautiful as the marketing and
merchandising assault would lead us to believe.  Heck, we *already* know
most of what we're getting.  Having purchased our limited-edition
copies of THE LITTLE MERMAID, BEAUTY AND THE BEAST, ALADDIN, THE LION
KING, and POCAHANTAS, we're pumped and primed for the schmaltzy ballads,
anthropomorphic critters, adult in-jokes, and, of course, an everybody-
cries ending.  Throw in the strange sight of a singing hunchback, some
more of that nifty computer- aided artwork, and a trio of finger-
snapping, wise-cracking gargoyles (led by the voice of "Seinfeld's"
Jason Alexander) and, viola, Disney's done it again...  except, this
time, with a twist.
     Under the direction of Gary Trousdale and Kirk Wise (both from
BEAUTY AND THE BEAST), the animators have broken the mold in many
places.  This is a very Gothic movie that festers with surprisingly dark
and sinister deeds.  In the first ten minutes, alone, we witness both a
murder and attempted infanticide!  (You may want to keep the three- and
four-year olds away from this one.)  There are plenty of other adult
references, some serious and some side-splitting.  It's all a well-
deserved form of compensation for us grown ups; a reward, if you will,
for having to endure all the trailers, the tie-ins, and those dreadful
cardboard figures in the lobby.
     Yeah, the commercialism *is* crass.  (And, perhaps, in the case of
most major studios, entirely co-dependent to the creative process.)
However, I challenge anyone to name another movie this season (or year?)
that shows as much inspiration as perspiration.  No child, for example,
is likely to understand the agonies of the villainous Frolio, the
repressed Parisian judge who is tormented by his desire for the feisty
gypsy girl Esmeralda (voiced and modeled after Demi Moore).  But just as
they laughed at pink elephants on parade and without knowing a thing
about inebriation, so can children marvel at the demons that erupt from
Frolio's fireplace as he imagines the Hell that awaits his condemned
soul.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Before and After (1996)
     Another butt-number in a season of long-sits.  Director Barbet 
Schroeder (KISS OF DEATH, REVERSAL OF FORTUNE) adapts the Rosellen 
Brown best seller to sluggish, somber effect.   As a soap opera-- 
did small-town rich-kid Eddie Furlong really kill his girlfriend?-- 
it's hardly compelling; as a morality play-- what happens when 
parents try to shield their kids from the consequences of inap-
propriate behavior-- it's a mess.  Even less appealing is Alfred 
Molina's character, a defense lawyer whose ethics are as a scary as 
the dye job he wears.  This crap belongs on television.  
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
MOVIE HELL is on the Web!  http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Journey of August King, The (1995)
     The mountains of North Carolina are the setting for this agreeable
period drama (1815) about a lonely, widowed farmer (Jason Patric) who
befriends a runaway slave (Thandie Newton) on his three-day trek back
from trading.  He's a quiet, gentle man who consents to conceal the girl
in his horse-drawn cart, along with the geese, pig, and cow that he's
carrying.  Her owner (a squinty Larry Drake) is also on the trail, as
are numerous other people, which makes the journey all the more
dangerous.  (And dangerously graphic!  Cover your eyes after a male
slave is captured.  The fate that befalls him involves one of the most
violent acts that I've seen in some time!) Rather engrossing for both
the excellent period detail and the breathtaking scenery, THE JOURNEY OF
AUGUST KING doesn't muster much in the way of dramatic weight.  Missing
is a sense of August King The Person.  We're shown what he *does*, but
not who he *is*.  Thus, whatever metaphorical "journey" he undergoes can
only be inferred.  And that's no good.  Nice use of the accompanying
animals, tho.  They are a small supporting cast unto themselves.  Filmed
entirely in North Carolina.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Shine (1996)
     Another overrated underachiever from last year, SHINE is the true
story of David Helfgott, a classical pianist from Australia who spent a
double decade in a mental institution before returning to the ivory
fold.  Three actors play the prodigy, with Geoffrey Rush's adult
arguably the most memorable of the lot.  (He doesn't even use a hand
double!) His stammering, seen-RAIN-MAN-one-too-many-times shtick,
however, is far less affecting than it should be.  Blame better movies
like MY LEFT FOOT, whose tortured heroes were a world more-accessible
than this one.  (Helfgott's story is incomplete and, at times, incompre-
hensible.  More than once I wondered if I was watching a dream
sequence.)  Of the other actors, Armin Mueller-Stahl displays subtle
sadism as Helfgott's demanding, narcissistic father.  Even better is
John Gielgud's London mentor, the one character who comes the closest to
showing us the soul of a performing musician. 
--
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC, USA, Earth
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
I'm also on the Web!  http://www.pagesz.net/~legeros/

Title
Review for Shawshank Redemption, The (1994)
     THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION is one of the most faithful Stephen King
adaptations to date and that's only partial good news for viewers of
this pleasing prison pic.  Taken from the short novel "Rita Hayworth
and the Shawshank Redemption," the film recounts the 20-year friendship
between two "lifers" (Tim Robbins and Morgan Freeman) and how that
relationship changes both each other and the entire prison community.
     True to tradition, every calaboose cliche is present and accounted
for:  the sadistic "screw" (Clancy Brown), the Warden From Hell (Bob
Gunton), and the bad-but-not-too-bad cons (William Sadler and Gil
Bellows, among others).  But don't hold your breath for any action--a
rape is the most jailhouse rock you'll see here.
     Too bad, then, that writer/director Frank Darabont never gets a
firm hold on his hoosegow.  Just as King occasionally overwrites,
Darabont occasionally "overfilms."  Simply, he lets too many scenes run
too long.
     Darabont's eye is fine, though, and the prison--a condemned
facility in Ohio--looks as sharp as any stir seen before.  Strange,
then, that the film never feels as lived-in as it looks.
     One problem is Tim Robbins, too bland for the soft-spoken role of
a banker who was convicted of killing his wife and her lover.  His
character has neither sides nor edge; he's Forrest Gump with a brain.
Mainstream audiences won't mind, though--they'll cry just as much as
they did in that other film.  Sigh.
     Morgan Freeman, on the other hand, excels beyond expectations as
the prison "fixer."  Jeez, when did he get so good?  Too bad the script
shortchanges him by never elaborating enough on his character.
     Other cast members include Clancy Brown (remember HIGHLANDER?),
James Whitmore (last seen going NUTS), and veteran stage actor Bob
Gunton as the religious warden whose first rule is "no blasphemy."
Gunton once played Professor Harold Hill and that's pretty funny until
you recall William Sadler's previous role as Death in BILL AND TED'S
BOGUS JOURNEY.  Excellent.

Title
Review for Maverick (1994)
Cast  Mel Gibson, Jodie Foster, and James Garner
"I promise I will lose for at least an hour."
     - Gibson as Maverick, to a table of reluctant poker players.
     MAVERICK, the first of two Warner westerns to hit the summer screen, 
reteams Mel Gibson and Richard Donner for an update of the 1957-62 ABC TV 
series. Despite a pair of ace co-stars and a script by SUNDANCE scribe 
William Goldman, MAVERICK is merely an OK corral of top talent.
     "Maverick" is Bret Maverick (Gibson), a sharp-witted, sharp-shooting 
card player en route to a championship poker game. He's cashing old debts 
as he rides between towns, making both friends and enemies along the way. 
His "love" is a pesky pickpocket (Foster), his foil is a former lawman 
(Garner, who originated the title role on television) and, together, they 
face everything from a runaway stage to not-so-renegade indians.
     MAVERICK proves, once again, that what works on paper doesn't always 
work on-screen. This witty western-wannabe isn't exactly D.O.A., but it 
ain't exactly F.U.N., either. Simply, MAVERICK never comes alive.
     Gibson makes a gamely gambler, but, compared to his antsy antics as 
detective Martin Riggs, the man-with-a-face seems stuck in slow motion. 
Foster is a loss with her (intentionally?) bad Southern accent and Garner 
doesn't get enough shared screen time to truly tap his talents.
     (If you commit to sit, don't miss scene-stealing Graham Greene as an 
indian who addresses Maverick as "Mav.")
     Donner's direction is hardly lethal. The man can make a movie, no 
question, but he lacks the precision to punch-up a standard set-piece 
like a runaway stage. He's backed by a posse of pros, though, and therein 
lies the irony. Far from an inspiring experience, MAVERICK is *still* 
crafted better than recent roundups TOMBSTONE and GERONIMO.
     Film fans should savor a cornucopia of cameos recruited from film, 
television, and country music. Blink and you'll miss Corey Feldman, 
Margot Kidder, Doug McClure, Dan Hedaya, Dub Taylor, Denver Pyle, Robert 
Fuller, Hal Ketchum, Waylon Jennings, and Clint Blink.

Title
Review for Pulp Fiction (1994)
     Quentin Tarantino's follow-up to RESERVOIR DOGS is a brilliantly
funny series of sketches about professional criminals and their
miraculous second chances.  No sophomore slump here; PULP FICTION is a
shoo-in for sanction among critical and commercial audiences alike.
     The stories number four and go something like this: two lovers
(Amanda Plummer and Tim Roth) want to switch from heisting liquor
stores to robbing restaurants.  Meanwhile, a hitman named Vincent
(Travolta) has been ordered to take the boss's wife (Uma Thurman) out
to dinner.  Meanwhile, boxer Butch Coolidge (Willis) has been ordered
to take a dive in fifth.  Meanwhile, Vincent and his partner Jules
(Samuel L. Jackson) have to clean-up the mess from a "bad hit."  Got
it?
     Said stories are presented both separately and out of order, and
the effect actually strengthens the suspense.  All is made clear in the
last hour, but, until then, the viewer is lured into a lurid limbo
where no one--either in the audience or on-screen--can even *imagine*
what's going to happen next.
     While the direction is good, very good, nothing sizzles like the
script.  Tarantino's prose overflows with some of the richest (and most
unprintable) dialogue of the decade.  Punctuating the obscenities are
pop references of every sort; from Madonna (of course) to "Le" Big
Mac.
     You could quibble on a couple points, such as the length of the
third segment.  But, oh those stories!  Here is a world where even the
smallest detail--such as the unavailability of a "balloon"--can
mushroom into the most catastrophic of consequences.  The violent
unpredictability of the Tarantino universe has never been more brutal.
     With two exceptions, the ensemble is exceptional.  PULP FICTION
marks the umpteenth return of John Travolta, who gives a career
performance as the toilet-trained (don't ask) hitman Vincent Vega.  His
partner, Samuel L. Jackson, hits a higher note in the commanding role
of Jules; he's so cool, you can't take your eyes off him.
     The two sore thumbs are Willis (too loose) and Tarantino (too
stiff).  Better is Christopher Walken, who wanders through for one
scene and one delicious monologue.  He's almost as good as Harvey
Keitel, who makes an eleventh-hour appearance as the world's
best-dressed janitor.
     To those who strain to complain about the subject matter, all I
can say is, well, touche.  PULP FICTION plays for laughs rape, racism,
murder, masochism, drug overdoses, Vietnam POWs, and, even, the Bible.
If any of the aforementioned offends, then this may not be best movie
for you.
NOTE:  Film won the Best Picture award at this year's Cannes film
       festival where the director gave the finger to a detractor during
       a press conference.  Really.

Title
Review for Baby's Day Out (1994)
Directed by     Patrick Read Johnson 
Written by      John Hughes
Cast Joe Mantegna, Lara Flynn Boyle, Joe Pantoliano, Brian Haley,
     Cynthia Nixon, Adam Robert Worton, Jacob Joesph Worton
MPAA Rating     "PG"
Running Time    98 minutes
     Expand the final fifteen minutes of HOME ALONE into a
feature-length film and you've got BABY'S DAY OUT--an agreeably
amusing children's comedy about a bumbling band of kid kidnappers who
are unwittingly outwitted by an innocent infant.
     The plot tracks a trio of crooks-posed-as-photographers (Mantegna,
Pantoliano, Haley) who steal nine-month-old Bennington August Cottwell
IV, aka Baby Bink, from his old-money home.  But the plan goes awry
when Baby crawls out an open window and into the streets of downtown
Chicago!  Following the path of his favorite story, called "Baby's Day
Out," Baby rides a bus and visits the zoo and winds up at a skyscraper
construction site.
     While Baby stays unscathed, the crooks fare worse for the wear.
The stooges get hit by boards and dropped from roofs and, of course,
suffer multiple crotch injuries.  (John Wayne Bobbitt should probably
steer clear of this one.)
     Like he did in PLANES, TRAINS, and AUTOMOBILES, John Hughes again
demonstrates his mastery of the simple set-up and extended execution.
Here, he's aided and abetted by a director, Patrick Read Johnson, whose
choreography could rival a Coen brother.  Best bit: baby crawling
across a busy city street.
     BABY'S DAY OUT has only two emotions--awww and ouch--and the
actors play them accordingly.  Forget the cartoon concern of Lara Flynn
Boyle or Cynthia Nixon, disposable as mom and nanny, respectively, the
ones to watch are the ones who are wincing.
     Joe Mantegna is a great head stooge, barking lines like "that
little doo-doo machine is my retirement money." Brian Haley has a great
scene with a gorilla, while Joe Pantolianto plays Curly to Mantegna's
Moe. *He* is funny.
     Needless to say, twins Adam and Jacob Warton are adorable beyond
belief.

Title
Review for Philadelphia (1993)
     PHILADELPHIA is Hollywood's first mainstream AIDS film and how
very mainstream it is.  There are few surprises or enlightenments in
this tasteful examination of the killer disease and its effect on both
the hetero- and homosexual population.
     Tom Hanks stars as Andrew Beckett, a favored young attorney at a
prestigious Philly law firm.  He's also gay and suffering from AIDS--
two facts that he has concealed from his employers.  After Beckett
begins displaying the first visible signs of the disease, he's fired.
His boss (Robards) says it's for incompetence, but Beckett believes
discrimination.
     The ailing attorney seeks counsel, gets several rejections, and,
finally, turns to Joe Miller (Washington)--a flashy, TV-advertising
lawyer who is quite vocal about his disapproval of the gay lifestyle.
Miller is willing to put aside his personal prejudices, however, and go
to court to fight for his dying client's wrongful termination...
     Though an exciting film by Jonathan Demme standards, PHILADELPHIA
is a bit of a bust as AIDS awareness.  Ron Nyswaner's story examines
homophobia from every angle, but offers far less insight into either
the disease or the lifestyle that contributes to it.  Given that the
title character is both gay and AIDS-afflicted, this discrepancy is
rather glaring.  And completely expected.
     PHILADELPHIA doesn't break too much ground.  The material is
treated in a standard, sterile fashion that could hardly threaten any
sensibilities.  Translated into plot specifics, this means virtually no
insight into Beckett's personal life and, essentially, no portrayal of
homosexual intimacy.
     Happily, in the hands of eclectic director Demme, even a
gloss-over doesn't appear glossy.  The director brings believability
and, even, fun to a solemn story.
     Demme is not a smooth filmmaker, by any counts, and PHILADELPHIA
is not a glamorous movie.  He populates Philly like he does all his
films--with characters that look and live like real people.  There no
mansions or storybook homes in Demme's universe.  Only authentic
characters.  And actors.
     Just as he strives to portray reality in all of its diversity,
Demme never lets his audience forget that they're watching a movie.  As
expected, the director peppers his product by rounding-up the usual
suspects.  The result is such seemingly non-sequitur casting as Charles
Napier as the trial judge and Roger Corman as a key witness.
     Move up to the majors and the top roles in PHILADELPHIA are played
equally well.
     Jason Robards is credible in a tough, but one-dimensional role as
Beckett's boss.  Mary Steenburgen shows up at the forty-minute mark
with a fine performance as a sharp defense attorney.  Washington, in
turn, shows off his OWN courtroom cool while making a nice
transformation from bigot to believer.
     (That is, with the exception of the film's Intentional Oscar
Moment--an ineffectual bit with Beckett driven to tears while
explaining the beauty of Maria Callas to his attorney.)
     Hanks also *looks* the part, courtesy of some very-real head-shaving
and intentional weight-loss.  His death-bed scenes are nothing short of
scary.
     One interesting/annoying aspect of PHILADELPHIA is the film's
omnipotent point-of-view.  Instead of a story told merely from both
Beckett's and Miller's viewpoint, Demme lets the audience eavesdrop on
EVERY character.  Does the narrative REALLY need the inclusion of such
things as the jury deliberations?
     To the credit of both Demme and writer Nyswaner, PHILADELPHIA
avoids most of the melodrama inherent in the subject matter.  Familiar
cliches, such as The Big Death Scene, have been graciously omitted.
Bottom: As the first mainstream AIDS film, PHILADELPHIA offers few
        surprises or enlightments into the killer disease.  Well
        acted, written, and directed, this tasteful film is more of
        an examination of homophobia than the disease that inspires
        it.

Title
Review for Kolya (1996)
(Miramax)
Directed by     Jan Sverak
Written by      Zdenek Sverak
Cast            Zdenek Sverak, Andrej Chalimon, Libuse Safrankova,
                Ondrej Vetchy, Stella Zazvorkova, Ladislav Smolijak
MPAA Rating     "R" (presumably for sexual situations)
Running Time    112 minutes
Reviewed at     The Colony Theatre, Raleigh, NC (22MAR97)
     KOLYA is one of the richest films I've seen in some time.  Zdenek
Sverak plays a confirmed old bachelor (who's likely to remain so), who
finds his life as a Czech cellist increasingly impacted by the five-year
old boy that he's taking care of.  Though it ends rather abruptly-- and
I'm whining, 'cause I wanted to spend more time with these characters--
the acting, writing, and production values are as high as, if not higher
than, comparable American dramas.  This father-and-son delight-- Sverak
also wrote the script, while his son, Jan, directed-- won a Golden Globe
for best Foreign Language film and, a couple days after I saw it, walked
away an Oscar.  In Czech and Russian, with English subtitles.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC, USA, Earth
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
I'm also on the Web!  http://www.pagesz.net/~legeros/

Title
Review for Speed 2: Cruise Control (1997)
    Sandra Bullock in high heels and wielding a chainsaw?  Yup, it's
gotta be summer.
    Just when you thought the pointless sequel had gone the way of
franchise films and direct-to-video releases, into port slams SPEED 2:
CRUISE CONTROL, the gloriously godawful follow-up to the 1994 sleeper
about a bus rigged to explode if it slowed below a certain speed.  The
gimmick, this time, is an ocean liner rigged to, well, crash into stuff.
Sound exciting?  Dennis Hopper's disgruntled bomb squader, the villain
of the first film, has given way to Willem Dafoe's disgruntled computer
programmer, a maniac whose main beef has something to do with having to
use live leeches, I kid you not, as a self-treatment for copper poison-
ing.  (And said poisoning induced by prolonged exposure to electro-
magnetic fields, no less!  Calling Dean Edell...) So, he overrides the
boat's computer, convinces the crew to abandon ship, and sends the
remaining passengers, those who couldn't evacuate in time, on a col-
lision course with destiny.  (Oddly, no one thinks to just...  jump off
the back of the boat.)
     With Keanu Reeves electing not to return-- perhaps he read the
script?-- the job of John McClane goes to Jason Patric (SLEEPERS), as
the *second* LA cop and SWAT team member that that bus drivin' babe
Annie (Bullock) has dated.  (What are the odds?) They're on this
Caribbean cruise for pleasure, as are a handful of requisite stock
characters, including a deaf teenager (!) who has a crush on the hero
(!!) who also knows how to sign (!!!).  (And you thought the Raptor Slam
was a cool summer movie move?  Wait till you see the feats that *this*
little girl can do, when stuck on a shipboard elevator!) Bullock is her
pesky, perky self, though she ends up with far less screen time than her
top billing suggests.  (Those paying attention to her bikini- and tank-
tops probably won't complain, however) Patric is the main man in motion
and that's damn good, 'cause when he stops to talk, he's only slightly
less monotone than his predecessor.  (His first LOL line is to Ms.
Bullock:  "I'd like to boogie with you.")
     Of course, nobody in front of the camera embarrasses themselves
quite the way that returning director Jan de Bont does.  He also
produced this mess, which is insulting even by the most lax summer
standards.  (CON AIR, BUDDY, FATHER'S DAY, ROMY AND MICHELLE'S HIGH
SCHOOL REUNION, MURDER AT 1600, 8 HEADS IN A DUFFLE BAG, ANACONDA, VEGAS
VACATION, MEET WALLY SPARKS, METRO, BEVERY HILLS NINJA, THE RELIC, all
is forgiven).  Worse, he's spent a hundred mil on a premise that doesn't
even live up to its title!  There's no sweat-inducing motion of the
ocean here-- just two hours of shaky handheld camera work and a handful
of cross-cut exteriors, all leading up to the big slam, when the love
boat sideswipes an oil tanker and then plows into a harbor town.  (Oh,
how far we've come in twenty years.  Remember the simple fun of seeing a
locomotive smash into railway station in THE SILVER STREAK?) Admittedly,
either of the aforementioned sequences is worth the price of admission.
It's just the rest of the movie-- the other hundred or so minutes--
that's pure nonsense.  And wonderful nonsense at that.  I know he didn't
intend to, but de Bont has done one thing right:  he's created the
hands-down funniest film of the year.
     o plain English, whole-sentence computer instructions
     o Jason Patric's character walks onto the bridge and immediately
       understands everything that's happening
     o Willem Dafoe's amazing arm-mounted keyboard
     o fishing reel.  Pontoon plane.  Memories of WEEKEND AT BERNIE'S

Title
Review for Saint, The (1997)
     Oh, where to begin?  This morning-after mess of a movie, starring
Val Kilmer as the latest screen incarnation of Leslie Charteris'
gentleman thief, is billed as a "romantic thriller." Meaning, and when
translated into a language that test audiences can understand, a movie
with an action hero who talks about his feelings.  That's right-- a
roguish, real *James Bond* of a character who mouths "I love you" and
makes goo-goo eyes and, Heaven help us, has a moral crisis before
screwing somebody's brains out.  All of this would be fine, of course,
if we could believe even a minute of any scene starring Elisabeth Shue.
The Academy Award-nominated actress is horribly miscast as the intro-
verted, poetry-sensitive, cold-fusion scientist with, get ready, a heart
condition.  (I'm going to spoil the surprise:  one scene puts the pair
in handcuffs, with Kilmer palming her pills on the sly!  Hilarious!) Her
best worst moments are when she looks in the direction of the camera,
wearing an expression of vacancy as glaring as a neon sign.
     THE SAINT is preposterous in other places.  A couple of Kilmer's
disguises are absolute howlers.  (His long-haired Spaniard is pretty
funny.  As is his buck-toothed Nutty Professor.) Every Russian somehow
speaks English.  A later sewer sequence makes no sense.  (Where in the
Hell did they find those flashlights?) And, in an equally far-fetched
climax, a mob of thousands miraculously understands the significance of
a miraculous energy source.  Oh, and let's not forget that coda!  The
final fifteen minutes of this movie have to be seen to be disbelieved.
More sex.  Another of Shue's laughably vacant stares.  Kilmer getting
cutesy.  An encore presentation of the Jerry Lewis disguise.  And, even,
a botched joke involving the theme to the television series!  (Hint:
listen closely.) Rates higher than lousy, though, for production values
and location photography, both of which are exemplary. 

Title
Review for Jerry Maguire (1996)
     It's a talented filmmaker who can turn off the Cruise control, but
writer/director Cameron Crowe (SAY ANYTHING, SINGLES) does just that in
this funny and refreshingly frank romantic comedy.  In one of the better
roles of his career, Tom Cruise plays Jerry Maguire, a high-powered
sports agent who has a change of heart, gets fired, and is forced to
practice what he now preaches as his own employee.  (One night, after
spontaneously developing a conscience, Jerry drafts a 27-page Mission
Statement on the subject of integrity.  His employer thinks his Mission
impossible and, one week later, Jerry Maguire is toast.) He leaves the
agency with an accountant, a young, single mother (the charming, but
rather one-dimensional Renee Zellweger) who is so inspired by Jerry's
principles that she walks out the door with him.  Together, they set up
shop and begin directing their energies on a couple remaining clients,
while, of course, falling in love.  Or so we think.
     One of the strengths of Cameron Crowe's writing is that his script
is populated with real, believable people in real, believable
relationships.  Thus, and like life itself, the story takes several
unusual and unexpected turns, one of which explores the reality of what
happens when a lonely guy meets a desperate girl.  Not exactly your
standard formula for romance and that makes JERRY MAGUIRE all the more
rewarding.  Sure, there are other reasons to appreciate this movie:
Crowe's offbeat direction, a hilarious morning-after sequence that's one
of many big laughs, Bonnie Hunt as the cynical older sister/divorcee,
Cruise's chemistry with child actor Jonathan Lipnicki, screen sex that's
actually sexy, and a scene-stealing Cuba Gooding, Jr. (OUTBREAK, BOYZ N
THE HOOD) as the sassy, second-tier football player who helps Jerry get
back in the game.  Go see it.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC, USA, Earth
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
I'm also on the Web!  http://www.pagesz.net/~legeros/

Title
Review for Big Green, The (1995)
     Has it really been two decades since Walter Matthau coached THE
BAD NEWS BEARS?  Nineteen years and two MIGHTY DUCKS later, the formula
is still going strong.  POLICE ACADEMY graduate Steve Guttenberg stars
as a small-town deputy sheriff corralled into co-coaching the school's
hastily formed soccer team.  His partner-in-crime is the new British
"exchange teacher" (Olivia D'Abo), a lively lass who has obviously seen
DANGEROUS MINDS and knows that the best way to gain the respect of a
disinterested, outer-city audience is to teach them something neat.
Like soccer.
     Most of the good-natured gags are of the fast-motion variety, such
as runaway cows and out-of-control lawnmowers.  Kids will laugh at the
occasional belching bit, while their parents peacefully doze beside
them.  Other than letting a supporting character named Newt go
unscathed, what's missing from THE BIG GREEN is a better integration of
music and comedy.  Instead of a peppy pop score, which would arguably
work to better effect, most of the action is set to a bombastic
orchestral score that belongs somewhere else.
     Comedy needs music.  Just watch any old Bugs Bunny short.  The
Marx Brothers knew it.  Mel Brooks knows it.  Unfortunately, the
current trend is to "overscore."  Lush strings and booming brass in
every scene, at every moment.  Remember the simple strains of Bizet's
"Habanera" in the original BAD NEWS BEARS?  These days, it's usually a
bellowing fanfare that threatens to smother every scene in its path.
Much like adding frosting to already frosted cake.
     The reteaming of director Mike Newell and star Hugh Grant is about
as far removed as you can get from the lightsome comedy of FOUR
WEDDINGS AND A FUNERAL.  Their second collaboration is a downbeat
theatrical drama about a young intern (Georgina Cates) struggling to
survive in post-W.W.II Liverpool.  Hugh plays the gay director, an
*extremely* unappealing character who may alienate whatever fans are
left after the nonsense of NINE MONTHS.  Bleak make-up and thick
accents conspire to make this a difficult story to settle into.  AN
AWFUL ADVENTURE is not without *some* rewards, tho.  The Peter Pan
subtext is intriguing.  As is the diverse ensemble cast that includes
Peter Firth, Alan Rickman, and Prunella Scales.  Basil!
     The comparisons to CHINATOWN are easy enough, except for the fact
that this film isn't nearly as gripping.  Writer/director Carl Franklin
(ONE FALSE MOVE) is the force behind this accomplished-but-stiff
adaptation of Walter Mosley's crime novel.  Denzel Washington is as
sturdy as ever, but he's burdened with a miscast supporting cast.  Tom
Sizemore and scene-stealer Don Cheadle are both fine.  The problems
start with Jennifer Beales, who never registers as the plot's femme
fatale.  She's a pretty face and nothing more.  Also underweight are
Maury Chaykin and Terry Kinney.  They play opposing mayoral candidates
in 1948 Los Angeles and neither actor commands enough authority to
stifle giggles.  John Huston, we miss you!  Fine period detail and a
strong sense of humor are a plus.  They help to overcome a pace that's
too polite for Mosley's jazzy, swingin' story.
     I can't say much about this one.  Director Andrew Davis follows
THE FUGITIVE with a wildly unfunny farce about twin brothers (Andy
Garcia) with opposing moral codes.  They're fighting over their
adoptive mother's estate, a 40,000-acre ranch worth millions and
supporting dozens of migrant farm workers.  So many different plots are
trying to come together--feuding brothers, reconciling husbands,
loan-shark hired hitmen--that you have to admire the director's
ambition.  Too bad that almost every single person or plot-line is out
of sync.  That is, with the exception of Alan Arkin.  He's the best
thing in a movie that--despite the work of four credited
writers--*still* manages to waste such diverse talents as David Odgen
Stiers, Kevin McCarthy, and Joe Pantolinao.  And what the heck does
that title mean?

Title
Review for Paradise Lost: The Child Murders at Robin Hood Hills (1996)
Directed by     Joe Berlinger and Bruce Sinofsky
Produced by     Joe Berlinger and Bruce Sinofsky
MPAA Rating     "R" (presumably for language and gore)
Running Time    150 minutes
Reviewed at     The Varsity, Chapel Hill, NC (3OCT96)
     A true-crime film that credits a "Heavy Metal Music Consultant?"
Believe it or not, a sparse soundtrack by Metallica is one of the many
pleasures to be partaken in PARADISE LOST: THE CHILD MURDERS AT ROBIN
HOOD HILLS.  This fascinating though overlong documentary from the
makers of BROTHER'S KEEPER recounts the events surrounding the discovery
of three murdered boys in West Memphis, Arkansas, the reaction of their
families, and the resulting trial that convicted three adolescent
outcasts with nary a shred of physical evidence.  Though the details of
the crime-- involving sexual mutilation-- are graphic enough to make
your hair stand on end, the most harrowing portrait of evil is that of
an unforgiving Christian community.  Filmmakers Joe Berlinger and Bruce
Sinofsy, who were given access to anyone and everyone associated with
the trial, take us into the churches, the trailer parks, and, in one
unforgettable sequence, onto the firing range where a grieving father
imagines the suspects as the giant pumpkin he's using for target
practice.  Recommended.  
--
Mike Legeros
Corporate Training
SAS Institute Inc, Cary, NC, USA, Earth
mailto: legeros@unx.sas.com (w) legeros@pagesz.net (h)

Title
Review for Boys Life 2 (1997)
    A follow-up to the 1995 anthology of gay-themed short films, BOYS
LIFE 2 features four stories about ordinary guys in (mostly) ordinary
situations.  The four films are well-produced, exceptionally well-acted,
and, when seen in the context of a summer movie season, serve as a
bracing reminder of just how much raw storytelling can be accomplished
in a mere fifteen minutes of screen time.  For my money, the standouts
are Tom De Cerchio's NUNZIO'S SECOND COUSIN, about a gay cop's (Vincent
D'Onofrio, last seen in THE WHOLE WIDE WORLD) clever confrontation with
a gay basher (Miles Perlich, who looks to be Max's younger brother), and
the adorable Academy-award winning TREVOR, directed by Peggy Rajski and
starring Brett Barsky as a girlie boy suffering through his first ado-
lescent crush.  The only obvious gripe has been heard before:  the col-
lection is too short.  There's plenty of room, here, for a fifth film.  
Also featured: Nickolas Perry's MUST BE THE MUSIC and Mark Christopher's 
ALKALI, IOWA.

Title
Review for Gone Fishin' (1997)
     Reteamed for the first time since the LETHAL WEAPON sequels, Joe
Pesci and Danny Glover play a pair of New Jersey numbnuts, headed to the
Everglades for their annual pre-Thanksgiving fishing trip.  There, they
promptly lose their car, then their boat, then another boat, etc. etc.
A pair of unfunny opening gags is an early indicator that director
Christopher Cain (THE AMAZING PANDA ADVENTURE, THE NEXT KARATE KID)
can't set up slapstick to save his life.  Pesci and Glover, however,
have an innocent charm that endures when the physical comedy doesn't.
(Much in the same way that Mira Sorvino and Lisa Kudrow anchored the
otherwise awful ROMY AND MICHELLE'S HIGH SCHOOL REUNION.)  Ok ok ok ok,
you won't split your sides, but you may enjoy the less-frantic moments.
Like when the two stooges are set upon by a smooth-talking salesman at a
boat yard.  Or when they're giving babes the "killer look." With
appearances by Carol Kane (as Pesci's wife!), Louise Fletcher, Rosanna
Arquette, and, in one of the year's most curious cameos, Willie Nelson
as an avenging angel fishing instructor.

Title
Review for Jane Eyre (1996)
     Franco Zeffirelli adapts Charlotte Bronte and the result is a
starchy, slow-moving soap opera that, depending upon your sense and
sensibility about these things, will leave you either swooning or sick
to your stomach.  The plot revolves around a homely governess (Charlotte
Gainsbourg) and her adventures in a gothic mansion full of secrets and
other surprises.  (That mansion is great, BTW.  I half-expected to see
Uncle Fester scurrying by in the background.) Zeffirelli's film has an
EYRE of cheesiness about it; from the sweeping music-accompanied scene
changes, to the self-important dialogue delivery, done so slowly that
you can almost count to ten between each line.  (Unlike, say, those
Austen adaptations, which are far from trashy.) The international cast
is quite a treat.  Ms. Gainsbourg is all neck, William Hurt is very
good, and Joan Plowright, fresh the deadly duo of MR. WRONG and THE
SCARLET LETTER, is her usual smiling self.  Other familiar faces include
Anna Paquin, Amanda Root, Fiona Shaw, and, even, Elle MacPherson.  The
audience that I saw this with applauded at the end, but were they happy
at the outcome, or just happy that it was over?
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Last Supper, The (1995)
     Five liberals invite various right-wing extremists over for Sunday
dinner and death.  That's the premise of this heavy-handed black comedy
from up-and-coming director Stacy Title.  The liberals-- grad student
housemates, of course-- are played by a quintet of appealing young
actors.  Cameron Diaz, Annabeth Gish, Courtney B.  Vance, Jonathan
Penner, and Ron Eldard are an enjoyable ensemble, until their characters
become too smart-alecky for their own good.  The roles of the victims--
one per meal-- are relegated to (mostly) star cameos.  Look for Bill
Paxton as a racist redneck, Charles Durning as a homophobic priest, and
so on.  Paxton, as the first addition to their tomato patch, makes the
strongest impression of the lot.  However, by the time we get to Jason
Alexander's brief appearance as a meat-eating anti-environmentalist, the
joke has become extinct.  THE LAST SUPPER isn't nearly as funny as the
set- up suggests.  The characters all but bludgeon the audience with
their extreme political viewpoints.  Comedy has no room to breathe and,
by the turnabout-is-fair-play end, the heavy-handed narrative makes the
final transition from unbearable to just plain boring.  For this, talk
radio exists.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Matilda (1996)
     The second Roald Dahl adaptation of the year is a James of a giant
disappointment, a strictly-for-kids revenge fantasy about an exceptional
little girl (Myra Wilson, from MRS. DOUBTFIRE) and how she gets back at
both her nincompoop parents (Danny DeVito and Rhea Perlman) and her
school's horrible headmaster (Pam Ferris).  Danny DeVito also produces,
directs, and even narrates, heaven help us.  (The effect of the latter
is actually quite jarring.  His voice is too recognizable and the
resulting contrast-- between the neutral narration and his non-neutral
character-- is so confusing that it nearly stops the film cold.) Behind
the camera, though, Danny the Director (WAR OF THE ROSES, HOFFA) is as
innovative as ever.  He has enough cinematic slight-of-hand up his
sleeve to rival Brian the DePalma.
    Unfortunately, DeVito doesn't know to quit when he's ahead.  The
director's fatal mistake is that he never pulls back from either the
cartoon cruelty or the overplayed buffoonery.  The result is a movie
that quickly grows tiresome and, like too many other summer entries,
ends up a one-dimensional ride.  Not that the intended audience will
mind.  Kids will laugh and scream and shout, while their parents pay
attention to other problems, such as the starkly lit exteriors, the
off-balance plotting, and one little girl with very little range.  (Myra
Wilson can express all of, what?, three emotions?  Or is four?) There
may be as much imagination at work, here, as in WILLY WONKA AND THE
CHOCOLATE FACTORY.  However, *this* Dahl needs to be handled with a
softer touch. 
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Good Burger (1997)
A movie review by Michael J. Legeros
Copyright 1997 by Michael J. Legeros
     GOOD BURGER is just as juvenile as anything I've seen since, oh,
ERNEST RIDES AGAIN.  What can I say about this one?  It kept me awake,
made me laugh more than once, and held my interest long enough that I
didn't walk out.  (And my reward for sticking it through?  A late ap-
pearance by George Clinton as a mental patient who gets down with ward-
mates in a funky asylum jam.) This Nickelodeon co-production-- based on 
the shows "Kenan & Kel" and "All That"-- is probably perfect fare for 
anyone under the age of, say, ten.  Lots of agreeably stupid stuff, 
performed by a colorfully charming cast, and with nothing particularly 
offensive, unless you overreact to the occasional use of "ass," "hell," 
or "sucks." But, shit, that's nothing worse than the language used on 
your average episode of "The Simpsons." And don't miss the animated 
short that precedes, about a quartet of superhero dolls that have to 
fight an attacking baby (voiced by Harry Connick Jr.!) when he threat-
ens a concert performance of... the Kiss action figures.  Pretty funny.

Title
Review for Time to Kill, A (1996)
     And it goes something like this:  rednecks rape a little girl; her
black father (Samuel L. Jackson) guns them down in a courtroom; a young
white lawyer (Matthew McConaughey) refuses to budge from the center of a
high-profile, small-town trial; a local chapter of the Klan is formed;
the NAACP comes to town; crosses are burned; riots erupt; tourism to
rural Mississippi plummets to an all-time low; a visiting law student
(Sandra Bullock) flirts; an ambitious District Attorney (Kevin Spacey)
schemes; a crusty judge (Patrick McGoohan) cautions everyone against
grandstanding, which of course they do, while glistening in sheets of
sweat as they attempt to work their high-paid tongues around what must
be a dozen different variations on the traditional Southern accent.  All
that's missing is a cameo from Gregory Peck, y'all.
     As adapted from the John Grisham best seller, A TIME TO KILL is as
shamelessly string-pulling as INDEPENDENCE DAY.  There isn't an ounce of
depth-of-feeling to the characters, but you can project in all you care
to.  (Especially during the racial confrontations, which may be the most
gratuitous depictions that we've seen since MISSISSIPPI BURNING.)  Blame
an over-ambitious story.  The movie runs for about two-and-a-half hours
and it's still too short.  Director Joel Schumacher (working from a
script by his BATMAN FOREVER and CLIENT collaborator Akiva Goldsman)
paints in broad-but-succinct strokes.  The plot merrily churns away and
most people probably won't notice that they are reacting more to the
dramatic devices than to the characters.  No problem.  A TIME TO KILL is
easily the most entertaining of the Grisham films.  The plot makes
sense, the acting is superb, and there's even a minor message delivered
at the very end.  Not bad for a summer movie.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Sgt. Bilko (1996)
     Another TV sitcom ("The Phil Silvers Show") mined for the movies,
SGT. BILKO stars Steve Martin as the famous fast-talking master sergeant
who will do anything for a buck.  He runs the base casino-- that is,
motor pool-- under the unsuspecting eye of his commanding officer (Dan
Aykroyd).  He also has a gambling-addicted fiancee (Glenn Headly), who
doesn't seem to mind being repeatedly left at the altar.  (He wins her
back, each time, with a card game.) Only with the return of an old
nemesis (Phil Hartman), is Bilko forced to adjust, adapt, and, of
course, come out smelling like a rose.
     As contemporary combat comedies go, STRIPES is still the one to
beat.  SGT. BILKO lacks a strong story, ensemble, or lead.  The script
is an abomination that recycles the decades-old material with nary an
original twist.  (The plot involves some nonsense about a "hovertank.")
The laughs are there, in spots, but nothing in the movie builds upon
itself.  A wealth of comic opportunity is wasted, along with good actors
Hartman and Headly.  (The smaller players score minor hits, as does Dan
Aykroyd's underplayed base boss.)
     The biggest misfire is Martin, who belongs here but doesn't.  He
lacks the steely shiftiness to make the role his own.  (A better choice
would be someone like, say, Rip Torn.  Of course, *he's* not a box-
office draw.) Martin doesn't *command* SGT. BILKO, but he does *carry*
it.  His limitless energy and precision timing single- handedly keeps
the film in step, and that's a performance worth watching even if the
movie isn't.  And, yes, that's Phil's daughter Catherine playing one of
the auditors called in to check Bilko's financial records.  Directed by
Jonathan Lynn (MY COUSIN VINNY). 
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
MOVIE HELL is on the Web!  http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Simple Wish, A (1997)
      A SIMPLE WISH is well-cast, I'll give it that.  Martin Short is
the perfect choice for a bumbling fairy godmother (hey, it's the nine-
ties) who botches his first assignment, granting a wish to a little girl
(Myra Wilson) whose father (Robert Pastorelli) is an aspiring New York
City stage actor.  And who else would you want but Kathleen Turner as
the evil godmother-turned-Wicked Witch of the West Side, out to claim
his (and every other good witch's) wand?  Short is, at times, passable,
but Ms. Turner is great fun.  Her character gets the shaft on screen
time, though, and that's a loss.  The rest of this crap is strictly for
kids, with wit of the squirting-catsup-bottle-in-the-face variety.
(Okay, okay, there *is* an inspired encounter between Short, Wilson, 
and a Nebraska redneck, but that's about it.) One hour was more than
enough for me.  I left around the time that a character began vomiting
computer-generated frogs.  Did I miss a scene of someone farting fish?

Title
Review for Cobb (1994)
     Tommy Lee Jones is the best thing behind COBB, director Ron
Shelton's broadly played "biography" of baseball great Ty Cobb.  By all
accounts, the immortal Cobb broke more than just records.  He was
everything from a racist, to a wife beater, to a man who attacked a
handicapped heckler during a stadium game.  Jones plays the part
wide-open, and you can't take your eyes off of him.
     Costar Robert Wuhl is another matter entirely--he's *all* wrong
for the part of the sportswriter-turned-biographer.  The actor may have
a greater range, but here he acts like the dopey sidekick.  He shows
about five facial expressions total and, since he's in nearly every
scene, he basically kills the tone.  The overblown music suggests that
COBB is a drama.  You'd never know it from watching Wuhl.
     If this trip's worth taking it's because of the script.  Shelton
gives Jones a few great lines, and the actor hits each one right over
the fence.  On rude behavior: "life's too short to be a diplomat." On
Babe Ruth: "he ran okay for a fat man."  The gems are few and
far-between, thanks to the poor pacing, but at least they're there.
     When COBB finally wraps, it wraps thirty minutes too late.

Title
Review for Celtic Pride (1996)
     Dan Aykroyd and Daniel Stern are well-cast as a pair of rabid 
Celtics fans who kidnap the opposing team's star player (Damon 
Wayans) before the last game of a tied championship series.  They 
make a good, goofy couple:  Stern as the gym-teaching, distracted 
husband whose wife, once again, wants a divorce; Aykroyd as the 
never-dates plumber with a head full of stats and an apartment full 
of kitsch.  The movie, unfortunately, doesn't give the pair nearly 
enough to do.  Their gags are too often air balls and the verbal 
interplay-- between them and the sour-mouthed Wayans-- doesn't 
score the way it should.  (To make matters worse, the distressingly 
underwritten film is distressingly overscored by composer Basil 
Poledouris.)   Sports fans should find this funny, but lay people 
may want to lay off such a lame lay up.  Now, if only someone would 
make a movie about rabid *ACC* fans... 
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Species (1995)
     Three boring movies opened in Triangle theaters last weekend.
Sigh.  Perhaps a movie's greatest failure is the failure to
entertain--that single, extraordinary misstep that can never be
recovered.  For once the audience is asleep, the only sound left in the
theater is the surroundsound wail of a fat lady singing somewhere in
the distance....
     The dopey title credits are a warning not to take things too
seriously, and, sure enough, in the very first scene of this Roger
Donaldson (NO WAY OUT) sci-fi feature, covert government scientist (is
there any other kind?).  Ben Kingsley botches an attempt to gas a little
girl.  She escapes from the lab because somebody left a door open,
and, more importantly, because she's a little monster who was grown
from a DNA sequence received via intergalactic e-mail.  Faster than you
can say, "What the hell were you thinking, Hugh?," Little Miss Dangerous
makes it away from the compound, hops a train to L.A. (where else?),
and transforms into a sexy adult terror (Natasha Henstridge)
overnight.
     Meanwhile, Ghandi is recruiting a team of experts that includes a
sociologist, a biologist, an empath (!), and a "specialist." (The
latter is played by Michael Madsen, not Sylvester Stallone.) They're a
fun lot, and though they don't have a lick of common sense between
them, they bring a unique flavor to a film that's already way too
derivative to begin with.  (Think THE FUGITIVE meets ALIEN.)  Of course,
said novelty quickly wears thin as each character grows more stupid the
longer they stay on-screen.
     Prolonged exposure to this movie apparently affects human brain
cells.
     This one fares better, a bit better, because it's more coherent.
Three writers are credited with this retooling of the Arthurian legend
that plays like a pitch from a Hollywood power-lunch.  Connery as
Arthur!  Ormand as Guinevere!  Gere as Lancelot!  Though quite the tidy
affair under the assured hand of director Jerry Zucker (GHOST), the
film is really as uninspired as the title.  (FIRST KNIGHT?  First in
what??) Most of the mythology has been jettisoned in favor of a chaste
love story with action sequences.  Excalibur?  Merlin?  African
swallows??  Forget it.  This is a polite Camelot where the dashing
hero, Lancelot, is an existential wanderer who's better with a sword
and a horse than ye olde English accent.  Think of Eroll Flynn as Roy
Rogers.
     Then there's SMOKE, which unites director Wayne Wang (THE JOY LUCK
CLUB), author Paul Auster ("The Music of Chance"), and a handful of
characters at a Brooklyn cigar shop.  We meet three at the beginning:
store owner Auggie Wrenn (Harvey Keitel), writer/customer Paul Benjamin
(William Hurt), and teen lifesaver Rashid (newcomer Harold Perrineau).
There are other characters, played by other cast members including
Forest Whitaker, Stockard Channing, and Ashley Judd, all of whom lead
interconnected lives with interconnected meanings, and none of which I
paid much attention to while asleep.  The film finally shows a pulse at
the beginning of the second hour, when Ashley Judd makes her appearance
as Wrenn's crackhead daughter.  And that's just about the time that my
date and I decided to leave.  What a drag.

Title
Review for Paper, The (1994)
Directed by Ron Howard
Written by David Keopp & Stephen Keopp
Starring Michael Keaton, Robert Duvall, Glenn Close, Marisa Tomei, and
Randy Quaid
MPAA Rating     "R" (presumably because of f-f-f-f-foul language)
Running Time    Approx. 114 minutes
     Ron Howard makes good, old-fashioned Hollywood movies with good,
old-fashioned Hollywood casts.  In PARENTHOOD, Opie snagged Steve
Martin, Rick Moranis, Dianne Wiest, and Mary Steenburgen.  In
BACKDRAFT, he "fired" Kurt Russell, William Baldwin, Scott Glenn, and
Bobby DeNiro.  Howard's newest, THE PAPER, is an immensely enjoyable
big-city newpaper nod with a by-line that reads Michael Keaton, Robert
Duvall, Glenn Close, Marisa Tomei, and Randy Quaid.
     So what if the notion of a newspaper film is nothing more than a
tired truckstop on the information highway?  In New York City--where
the story is set--newspaper newsrooms, plural, still exist and still
reach a readership that television hasn't turned completely
illiterate.  This PAPER is the fictional "New York Sun," a tabloid
loosely modeled on the "New York Post."
     First and foremost, THE PAPER reminds us why we like Michael
Keaton.  As the editor of the City Desk, who's worried about everything
from a job interview to a very-pregnant wife (Tomei), Keaton crackles
with an energy that we haven't seen in years.  MY LIFE was no life and
the real Mr. Mom appeared only briefly in both MUCH ADO ABOUT NOTHING
and BATMAN RETURNS.
     THE PAPER brings Keaton back into the foreground with a role he
can sink his sharp teeth into.  His character is super-strung and lives
on Coke product placements and never takes a break to eat or sleep or
have a lengthy conversation with his wife.  He stays wired as only
Keaton can, which is one-step below W.F.O.  Except for one scene on a
phone call to Spalding Gray-- who plays an edtior at a rival 'paper--
when Keaton get nuts and transforms into Beetlejuice Beetlejuice
Beetlejuice.  And that's why we love him.
     Randy Quaid is a riot as a gun-toting columnist who's waging a
personal war against the City's parking commissioner.  Even in a
mock-serious bar fight, Quaid drops one-liners like the seasoned pro
that he is.  Marisa Tomei seems to have fewer scenes than Quaid, but
she has a good time getting ticked at her husband and playing roving
reporter and looking like all other movie wives who are at least
ten-years younger than their husbands.
     Glenn Close is a delight as the bitchy Managing Editor who is
perpetually feuding with Keaton up to the point of exchanging blows
without the benefit of rubber costumes.  Her role improves with the
running time, though, and Close closes the film with a classic line.
     Oddly, Robert Duvall is wasted as the weary-with-prostrate-cancer
Editor-in-Chief.  We've heard his voice-of-experience rap before and
with an estranged-daughter subplot, his character exists solely to
hammer home the central idea of "do not squander time, that is the
stuff life is made of."
     The dialogue crackles from start to finish.  Pick your scene and
pick your favorite line.  Keaton to Quaid: "When did you get so
paranoid?" Quaid to Keaton: "When they started plotting against me."
The words are backed by impressive images--a nice synthesis of
photography and production design.  Which translates into a lot of
conversations with gorgeous skylines or gargantuan printing presses in
the background.
     THE PAPER smudges in a few spots.  Howard employs a handy-cam too
many times and, obviously, didn't watch either HUSBANDS AND WIVES or
MANHATTEN MURDER MYSTERY to see just how annoying *that* technique can
be.  Unless you're filming in Poland, Ron, keep your stuff steady.  The
story is also rather pat in places and this to be expected because in a
Ron Howard film *everything* gets wrapped in a comfortable and logical
fashion.
     Still, a little more grit would've been welcome.
     Finally, THE PAPER is a great sum of great parts.  Smaller, but no
less significant, bits include a hilarious bar fight with Jason
Alexander wearing a fake moustache and waving a gun while overacting; a
wall of clocks displaying separate times for each borough; and Tomei
touch-typing baby-shower thank-you notes.

Title
Review for Birdcage, The (1996)
     Though you think we'd be tired of the drag gags after TO WONG FOO,
WIGSTOCK, and PRISCILLA, QUEEN OF THE DESERT, this respectable remake of
LA CAGE AUX FOLLES (1978) successfully reminds us that there are few
sights funnier than that of a man dressed as a woman.  Here, the "woman"
is Albert (Nathan Lane), a star drag queen in South Beach, FL, and the
shrill half of a happy gay couple.  Her longtime companion is Armand
(Robin Williams), the straighter man in the relationship and the owner
of the all-ages club where Albert performs.  Together, they must
scramble to reinvent themselves for the impending arrival of Armand's
son's fiance's right-wing parents (Gene Hackman and Dianne Wiest).
     Despite the inclusion of several awkward, though timely, political
statements-- Hackman's character is both a Republican Senator (!) and
the founder of the Coalition for Moral Order (!!)-- THE BIRDCAGE is a
surprisingly wholesome comedy that preaches nothing more than the
virtues of acceptance.  The super-swishy caricatures are probably passe,
sure, but director Mike Nichols and writer Elaine May bring a sincerity
to the characters that overrides any outdating.  Of course, by the end,
any and all messages are moot as the ensemble gets down to brass tacks.
     THE BIRDCAGE is first and foremost a farce, which means that every-
thing-- plot, character, etc.-- is secondary to set-up.  The entire
movie is spent in preparation for what befalls Armand and Albert when
the In-Laws-to-be arrive.  (Though the biggest laughs come at the end,
there are many funny bits peppered throughout.  Such as a hilarious
sequence of Williams trying to teach Lane how to "act like a guy.")
Though not without problems-- the poor definition of Hackman's character
is a big one-- THE BIRDCAGE delivers a minor message and some major
laughs, and, in a movie season as dry as this one, that's hardly a drag.
--
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
MOVIE HELL is on the Web!  http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>
-- 
Evelyn C. Leeper | +1 908 957 2070 | eleeper@lucent.com
The review above was posted to the
rec.arts.movies.reviews newsgroup (de.rec.film.kritiken for German reviews).
The Internet Movie Database accepts no responsibility for the contents of the
review and has no editorial control. Unless stated otherwise, the copyright
belongs to the author.
Please direct comments/criticisms of the review to relevant newsgroups.
Broken URLs inthe reviews are the responsibility of the author.
The formatting of the review is likely to differ from the original due
to ASCII to HTML conversion.

Related links: index of all rec.arts.movies.reviews reviews


Title
Review for Quest, The (1996)
     So Jean-Claude is now an auteur.  Well, why not?  Segal, Stallone,
and Schwarzenegger (in a TV movie) have all done it and emerged from
behind the camera with their careers still intact.  And, there's
certainly more to this martial arts (near) epic than one might expect.
In fact, the only particularly jarring moment occurs in the opening
scene, when Van Damme, wearing old-age make-up, bellies-up to a bar and
threatens to speak the word "rosebud." No, he never says *that* word,
but he does recount the entire story in flashback.
     Cut to a street scene in 1920's New York City, where Van Damme's
clown-faced, stilt-walking pickpocket (!) is about to run afoul of both
the law and the mob.  Making his escape, he hops a freighter bound for
(where else?) the Far East.  Eventually, he finds his way to Tibet, to
participate in a mountain-top martial arts competition between the
greatest fighters from sixteen counties.  Orphans, elephants, gun
runners, and Sumo wrestlers, it's *all* here. 
     The period detail and location photography is very nice, as is the
story's near-epic scope.  Unfortunately, THE QUEST suffers from several
fatal flaws, the most glaring of which is an absolute lack of dramatic
tension.  Nothing propels this movie.  And you can take it from there.
(Flaw #2 is the chemistry that the characters *don't* have.  I can't
decide who is less-animated:  Van Damme or co-star Roger Moore.  Phew.
Flaw #3: missing scenes...) Martial- arts fans and video-game junkies
might enjoy this one, but everyone else should save their money. 
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Harlem (1993)
Directed by Leon Ichaso  
Written by Barry Michael Cooper
Starring Wesley Snipes, Michael Wright, Theresa Randle, Abe Vigoda,
Ernie Hudson, and Clarence Williams III
MPAA Rating     "R" 
Running Time    Approx. 110 minutes
     Wesley Snipes is starting the year solo!  After recent pairings
with everyone from Dennis Hopper to Sly Stallone, the back-to-brunette
actor has returned to NEW JACK territory as another KING OF NEW YORK.
     In the downbeat drama SUGAR HILL, Snipes stars as a Harlem hood
who's ready to retire.  For years, Romello and his brother (Wright)
have been dealing drugs for a neighborhood gangster (Vigoda).  But
Romeo's tired of the trade.  He's knows what's ahead--including a rival
dealer (Hudson)--and wants to "get out." Unfortunately, Romello's
"retirement" is threatened by obligations to both his brother and his
junkie father (Williams).
     Forget SUGAR HILL's moral slant, the *cast* is the best reason to
watch this film.
     Snipes is great and always worth watching.  He's backed by former
"Mod Squad-er" Clarence Williams III, a knock-out as the drugged dad.
Father's final scene is the most chilling in the film.  Less impressive
is Michael Wright, who twitches more than Samuel Jackson in JUNGLE
FEVER.  And don't forget Abe Vigoda's genial gangster.  He gets the
best lines *and* the best monologue.
     Of course, *everyone* in SUGAR HILL gets a monologue.  Which is
the problem.
     Barry Michael Cooper's script is way too talky.  Yap yap yap and
everyone keeps talking.  Here's a first: a gangster film with more
speeches than murders!  Don't look to director Leon Ichaso--he doesn't
know when cut his characters off.  So every scene d-r-a-g-s.  *Then*
come the flashbacks, which stop the film cold.
     The intrusive soundtrack doesn't know when to quit, either.
     But there are *some* rewards to the overdone drama.  In addition
to the acting, the photography is handsome, the humor is rich, and the
message is frank.  Not a bad balance for a "butt bruiser."

Title
Review for Steel (1997)
     How's this for diminishing returns?  In BATMAN AND ROBIN, George
Clooney battled Arnold Schwarzenegger.  In SPAWN, it was Michael Jai
White versus John Leguizamo.  In STEEL, the third and presumably *final*
superhero stretch of the summer, Shaquille O'Neal dons a high-tech,
hand-crafted suit of armor to combat the earth-shaking, world-shatter-
ing, super-duper-ultra evil menace of... Judd Nelson?  Holy economical
casting!  The latest synergistic teaming of Warner Brothers and D.C.
Comics is a strictly third-rate affair, with a forgettable hero (Shaq,
all size and smiles in his ridiculous costume) performing forgettable
feats (stopping a mugger, shooting back at bad guys) while in pursuit of
a forgettable villain (Nelson's revenge-seeking arms dealer, whose sole
super-power appears to be the ability to stifle laughter among those
actors sharing scenes with him).
     Pure cheese, but it's well-intended.  There's lots of family love
and a majority of minority characters and one disabled person (Annabeth
Gish) that the story makes a bit of an embarrassing big deal about, but
later redeems itself by giving her a kick-ass laser-firing wheelchair.
(Let's see *her* action figure go up against Share-a-Smile Barbie.) The
amount of gratuitous violence is quite reasonable and there's enough
scattered laughs to hold a bored parent's attention.  (I enjoyed Richard
Roundtree's SHAFT reference, a couple of hilarious comments about the
Internet, and one whopper of an Ahnuld gag at the end.) If only the lack
of realism wasn't *quite* as distracting.  I know, I know, not exactly a
valid complaint in a movie based on a comic book, but, good God, a Man
of Steel with an exposed mouth and lower jaw?  And who spends half of
his time engaged in gunfights?  Sigh.  Written and directed by Kenneth
Johnson, an old TV hack whose credits include "Alien Nation" and "The
Incredible Hulk."  Eat the hot dog, don't be one.

Title
Review for Striptease (1996)
      This one gets my vote as Worst Movie of the Year.  Robert Patrick
(TERMINATOR 2), of all people, gives the most consistently credible
performance.  He plays the white-trash husband whose costly custody
battle has forced his wife (Demi Moore), a former FBI clerk, to start
stripping as means to meet ends.  At least, that's why we *think* she's
doing it.  Incredulously, the director-- Andrew Bergman (HONEYMOON IN
VEGAS), adapting from the novel by Carl Hiaasen -- simply cuts from the
courtroom to the dressing room!  Moore mumbles something about "needing
the money" and that's all we get in the way of character motivation.
Period.  Robert Patrick is pleasantly distracting for a while, as is
Ving Rhymes' occasionally scene-stealing bouncer-of-few-words.  Ms.
Moore, on the other hand, gives an intensely coarse performance that's
probably too serious for what this movie had in mind.  She's no fun to
watch.
     How an ordinary Miami mom ends up with such a buffed bod is never
explained, either.  (Perhaps she is working to pay off her trainer and
plastic surgeon, as well?) There's also the small matter of Burt
Reynolds' corrupt congressman.  Slurring his way through a bad Brando
impersonation, Reynolds embarrasses himself more than any bad toupee
ever did.  Ugh.  Who knows what this unwatchable mess looked like before
the test audiences got hold of it?  (A reshot ending bumped the movie
from a planned Memorial Day release.) If nothing else-- and as Ms.
Moore's rote bumping and grinding can attest to-- STRIPTEASE proves one
point, conclusively:  that even SHOWGIRLS star Elizabeth Berkley can do
something better than the highest paid actress in Hollywood.  Bless her
heart. 
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Buddy (1997)
     Really, is anyone going to be surprised to learn that I walked out
on BUDDY, director Caroline Thompson's family-friendly drama, based on
the real life of Gertrude Lintz, an eccentric socialite in the 1920's
who loved animals, liked to keep chimps around the house, and raised a
certain gorilla as if it were a human child?  Despite a game cast (Rene
Russo, Robbie Coltrane, Irma P. Hall, and, in one scene, the Artist
Formerly Known as Pee Wee Herman), a workable premise, and a director
who most certainly knows her way around odd (she wrote EDWARD SCISSOR-
HANDS, among other things), there isn't a thing here to engage the
brain.  No subtext, no wit, no tension, no terror.  Nothing.  Nada.
Zip.
     So, if you can find amusement in watching well-dressed chimps mon-
key around a mansion... or delight in the care and feeding of anima-
tronic animal infants... or have never seen David Letterman pose the
question Can a Guy in a Gorilla Suit Get Into a Feature Film?, then 
this might be the movie for you.  Or, more likely, your kids.  Other-
wise, you'll probably end up as I did, feeling like a caged animal after
a mere twenty minutes.  My companion, however, had another half-hour of
optimism in her and, until that blessed beeline to the lobby, I passed
the time by imagining alternate fates for the furry tyke:  drop-kicked
by Bruce Willis, cryogenically frozen with Mike Myers, pitched head-
first into a lava flow, and, of course, swallowed whole by a still-
hungry Tyrannosaurus Rex.  Chomp.

Title
Review for Great White Hype, The (1996)
     A big, busy boxing satire with a surprisingly paltry punch, THE
GREAT WHITE HYPE stars Samuel L. Jackson as a shameless boxing promoter
whose plan to boost sagging pay-per-view revenues is to "invent" a white
contender (Peter Berg) to challenge his black heavyweight "champ" (Damon
Wayans).  (The logic is that people will pay more to see black vs. white
than black vs. black.) He may be right, in an absurdly accurate way, but
the film doesn't give us a reason to care.  As a scathing sports spoof,
HYPE is just that:  unfunny, unfocused, and, at times, just plain
pointless.  As a commentary on race relations, it's even *less*
effective.
     The dialogue is the best of this mess, lines like Jon Lovitz
exclaiming "I cannot make caviar out of fish eggs!" Writers Tony Hendra
and Ron Shelton also do good on the street slang, though we never hear
enough of it.  The script isn't strong enough, though, to support the
aggressive camera work of director Reginald Hudlin (HOUSE PARTY).  He
comes across as absolute overkill.  THE GREAT WHITE HYPE *almost* turns
around at the end, at the Big Match, when Hudlin attempts an extended
gag of rock-concert proportions.  With costumed dwarfs, gangsta rappers,
and the "champ" dressed as Death, only then do we get a glimpse of the
spoof that should've been. 
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Night Falls on Manhattan (1997)
     NIGHT FALLS ON MANHATTAN adapts Robert Daley's pulp novel "Tainted
Evidence," about a New York City Assistant District Attorney (Andy
Garcia), whose first big case is prosecuting the cop-killing drug dealer
who wounded his police officer father (Ian Holm, yes, Ian Holm).  If
that premise is difficult to swallow, don't even bother with the later
scenes, when bozo time compression makes months pass as minutes and
Garcia's character is suddenly elected the new District Attorney.  (And
very little of which bothered me.  I took offense to the abrupt addition
of Lena Olin's love interest.  In her scant scenes, she adds nothing.)
While it plays like a three-hour movie condensed into the space of two,
there are several riveting sequences, excellent acting across the board,
and a tidy lesson about the grayscales of justice.

Title
Review for Stargate (1994)
     Hilarious, ultra-low budget comedy from film school dropout Kevin
Smith chronicles a day in the life of two convenience store slackers
(Brian O'Halloran and Jeff Anderson).  They spend most of their day
ignoring customers while discussing everything from fellatio to
self-fulfillment.  The premise is strictly sitcom and the photography
is grainy as all get-out, but you could spend ten times the film's
budget (a reported $27,000) and still not get dialogue half as good as
this.
     Originally rated NC-17 for language.  Not recommended for viewers
with sensitive ears.
     Remake RESERVOIR DOGS as a French art film and you're halfway to
KILLING ZOE, writer/director Roger Avary's slow-moving story of a
failed Bastille Day bank robbery.  Eric Stoltz stars as an American in
Paris who gets in *way* over his head when hooks up with a band of
nihilistic bank robbers.  He's the safecracker who's blissful unaware
that the bank job is a botch job from the word go.
     Though intriguing on all fronts, the film is paced at half the
speed of PULP FICTION, which Avary co-wrote with Quentin Tarantino.  In
English and French.
     Based on the novel by T. Coraghessan Boyle, THE ROAD TO WELLVILLE
doesn't go very far.  Bowels, bowels, and more bowels are explored by
Dr. John Harvey Kellogg (a buck-toothed and bespectacled Anthony
Hopkins), who, in the early 1900's, advocated abstinence,
vegetarianism, and frequent defecation.  He also invented the
cornflake.  Really.
     Checking-in to Kellogg's Battle Creek Sanitarium are Matthew
Broderick and Bridget Fonda, just two of the many well-known faces in
this failed comedy.  Leave your laughter at the door and you can marvel
at the unfunny antics of John Cusack, Michael Lerner, Lara Flynn Boyle,
John Neville, and Dana Carvey.
     The art direction is impeccable and some of the early sequences
are amusing, but the novelty quickly wears off as writer/director Alan
Parkers tries his darnedness to turn doo-doo into drama.  What he ends
up with is something that I can't print here.  Phew!
     LAWRENCE OF ARABIA meets STAR WARS.  This epic sci-fi film is more
sheer spectacle than anything else.  Director Roland Emmerich
(UNIVERSAL SOLIDER) shamelessly rips off Lucas and Spielberg and just
about any other cosmic cliche that he can lay his hands on.  The film
is overlong, the characters are cardboard, and the script is filled
with some of the most laughable details in modern sci-fi history.
     That said, there's still plenty to watch here.  Sci-fi fans should
enjoy the sculpted sands, the morphing headdresses, and a surprisingly
spunky James Spader.  He plays the Egyptologist who gets to prove his
theory that that "somebody else" built the pyramids.  Less interesting
are co-stars Kurt Russell and Jaye Davidson of CRYING GAME fame.
     Trek fans may be more forgiving, but, for the rest of us, the
sluggish STAR TREK GENERATIONS is a mixed bag at best.  The story is
interesting, but each scene goes too long.  The cast is earnest, but
the direction lacks punch.  And so on.  (The best example of the latter
is a Klingon comeuppance that delivers none of the impact of a similar
scene in STAR TREK II.)
     Original Enterprise captain James T. Kirk appears on both ends of
the story, though they cut the scene where Shatner turns to the screen
to plead "get a life."  Remarkably unremarkable.
     In a season of THE SPECIALIST and PULP FICTION et al, maybe a
remake of MIRACLE ON 34th STREET *is* necessary.  John Hughes certainly
believes in Santa Claus and his Les Mayfield-directed production does
nothing to tarnish the memory of the 1947 original.  The romance
between costars Dylan McDermott and Elizabeth Perkins doesn't work too
well, but the film makes a strong case that Richard Attenborough is the
definitive Kriss Kringle.  His chemistry with children can moisten any
eye.
     Arnold Schwarzenegger pregnant?  Sure, Billy Crystal did it before
in RABBIT TEST, but the sight of Schwarz with a bulging belly is a
casting coup comparable to Dustin Hoffman in TOOTSIE.  What should be
nothing more than a one-joke premise actually gets better as it goes
along.  Director Ivan Reitman (DAVE, TWINS) wisely keeps the farce to a
minimum, so the first hour moves slower than you might expect.  Don't
expect too many yuks from Danny DeVito, but you can't beat those early
romantic scenes between Emma and Arnie.  How's *that* for a collision
of acting styles?

Title
Review for Little Rascals, The (1994)
     Mildly engaging indy drama about a crusty Vermont logger (Rip
Torn) who won't surrender (i.e., sell) to developers who are planning a
dam that'll flood his leased land.  Beautifully photographed by Paul
Ryan and underdirected by Jay Craven, film is notable for an absence of
*any* ecological stand and for the one-two punch of leading pair Rip
Torn and Tantoo Cardinal (as his mate).  Forget the
what-passes-for-chemistry between Bridget Fonda and Nicholas Cage in IT
COULD HAPPEN TO YOU, here's a summer-screen couple that *sizzles*.
Oscar may notice.
>From the novel by Howard Frank Mosher.
     Terminally inoffensive update of the classic Hal Roach
shorts--from unlikely choice Penelope Spheeris (WAYNE'S WORLD, THE
     BEVERLY HILLBILLIES)--that stars a cast of unknowns as "Our
Gang."  The kids can barely act, the editing is a mess, and the plot
has more holes than 60-year-old film stock.  That said, the whole thing
has a breezy, infectious charm that (almost) overpowers the technical
demerits.
     Kids should love it, though adults may groan at gags that are
older than they are.  A half-dozen well-placed celebrity cameos help,
as does the blooper reel over the end credits.
     Tart, well-written comedy from Will Stillman (METROPOLITAN) about
two American cousins (Taylor Nichols and Chris Eigeman) living in said
Spanish city in "the last decade of the cold war."  The former is a
salesman, the latter is a Naval officer and, together, they spend most
of the film trying to avoid anti-American sentiment while wooing the
wild women of Barcelona.  Watch for some great, low-key gags about
shaving, ants, and underwear.
     Not hilarious, but *very* amusing.  Keen political edge, too!
     Small but powerful inner-city drama about a 12-year-old Brooklyn
boy (Sean Nelson) who sets-up a scheme to get himself and his sister
away from drugs (he's a courier, she's a junkie) and out of the
projects.  The well-written script--by first-time filmmaker Boaz
Yakin--is the draw here.  The premise may not be entirely believable,
but Yakin's crisp characterizations more than compensate for any
occasional lag in narration.
     Nelson is a find, a tough cookie who'll break your heart by the
end.  Samuel L. Jackson plays the father, a speed chess player who
injects enough life lessons into the game to make FRESH feel like a
companion piece to SEARCHING FOR BOBBY FISHER.  Too bad the sound
enginnering is awful.  Don't expect to hear all the dialogue in this
one.

Title
Review for Getting Even with Dad (1994)
     There's one really good scene in GETTING EVEN WITH DAD, the failed
father-and-son frolic starring odd couple Ted Danson and Macaulay
Culkin.  Danson plays Ray, a robber whose son (Culkin) stashed the
stash of dad's last haul.  Timmy will tell, but on one condition: if
father collects then son ain't staying.  (He knows the cops are close
and doesn't want dad to disappear.  He'd rather go back and live with
his aunt.)
     Said scene unfolds at a bus station.  Ray has just placed his boy
on a bus and, walking away, is trying to decide if he *really* wants
the cash over the kid.  The cops are watching, of course, and they'll
round-up Ray the moment he unlocks the locker containing the cache.
     The scene is great:  Danson steps from the bus, stops, and
thinks.  He looks back, pauses, and keeps walking.  Cut to Culkin,
looking sad.  Cut back to Danson, stopped again.  Thinking.  All while
the cops--and the audience--are watching.
     Forget the rest of the film-- this is one of those great, dopey
Hollywood moments when a character comes to life right before our
eyes.  We swoon to these simple emotions, shamelessly holding our
breath as we wait for Ray's decision.  Will he?  Won't he?  It's great
schmaltz and the very reason we go to the movies.
     Too bad that most of the audience will have either *left* or
fallen asleep by this time.
Hardly *anything* is worth watching in the first hour of GETTING EVEN
WITH DAD.  Danson is sincere and that's about it.  His glued-on
ponytail is more interesting than co-star Culkin, though, who
sleepwalks through his scenes.
     Sartain and Rubinek are mildly amusing as Ray's unaccomplished
accomplices. (One inspired moment has Tweedledumb and Tweedledumber
trying to rob a collection box.  Stay awake and hear Sartain yell
"Wow!  Nun!" to great effect.)  Glenne Headly is the strangest find--a
rookie cop who pathetically falls for Danson.  Ugh.
     Forget either the script or the direction.  Here's a film that
features two, count 'em two, musical montages *and* Macaulay Culkin
doing bad lipsynch.  Shudder. (Maybe the title is a secret stab at Kit
Culkin, who must be wondering why he consented to this slop.)
     The saving grace is that GETTING EVEN WITH DAD delivers a
well-intentioned message, as best exemplified in the aforementioned
scene.  Too bad the film sucks.

Title
Review for Under Siege 2: Dark Territory (1995)
(WB)
Directed by   Geoff Murphy
Written by    Richard Hatem & Matt Reeves
Cast          Steven Seagal, Eric Bogosian, Katherine Heigl, Morris
              Chestnut, Everett McGill
MPAA Rating   "R" (presumably for language and violence)
Reviewed at   General Cinemas at Pleasant Valley, Raleigh (15JUL95)
     This bastard son of DIE HARD--and there are so very *many* of
them!--has a playful awfulness that's missing from the other
summer blockbusters.  Master thespian and martial-arts expert
Steven Seagal returns to the role of Casey Ryback, the former Navy SEAL
turned civilian chef.  This time, he's taking a train ride through the
Rockies.  Why?  Because he doesn't want to fly, or something like
that.  (His parents just died in a plane crash.  Or was it his
brother?  Who can tell?)
     Along for the trip is his pretty niece (Katherine Heigl), who gets
to spar with her uncle for all of fifteen minutes before she and the
rest of the passengers are taken into custody by a band of terrorists.
They chose this train because it's there, and because it's such a great
way to transport a satellite uplink that will let Eric Bogosian (as the
villain, if you can buy *that* one!) control a satellite with truly
devastating power.  Scary.
     Meanwhile, Ryback is hiding in one of the compartments.  He's a
master of guns, knives, and a mysterious form of yoga that can hold all
facial muscles immobile, even during dramatic close-ups.  Like UNDER
SIEGE, PASSENGER 57, DIE HARD 2, and all the rest of those movies, our
hero spends the duration of the film slowly staking the bad guys while
trying not to fall in/out/onto something.  Of course, Bruce Willis
never had to undergo the humiliation of falling off a train ala Gene
Wilder in THE SILVER STREAK.  Luckily, these bad guys are really
not-so-bad guys.  They actually back the train up to get him!
     Director Frank Oz (LITTLE SHOP OF HORRORS) and screenwriter
Melissa Mathison (E.T.) adapt the Lynne Reid Banks's children's classic
to pleasant effect.  The story of a young boy who gets to play dice
with the universe doesn't really go anywhere, but the actors are
appealing and the FX are great.  (Anyone else see the resemblance
between Litefoot and Keanu Reeves??) Certainly it's a better family
film than either POCAHONTAS or THE MIGHTY MARVEL MORPHIN' MUTANT
TEENAGE NINJA POWER RANGERS MOVIE.
     Director Chris Columbus continues to experiment with tone, trying
his hardest to juxtapose sentiment and slapstick the way he did so well
in HOME ALONE.  He partially succeeded with his last film, the stuffy
MRS. DOUBTFIRE.  Here, he fails.  The characters in this remake of the
French farce NEUF MOIS need a more intimate approach than what's
attempted here. (In fact, the film's best joke is a throwaway--the
characters race past a marquee that reads HOME ALONE VII.)
     The cast is good, though, and they'll survive to film another
day.  And nobody does reticence quite like Hugh Grant, even if NINE
MONTHS is a really poor showcase for Scandal Boy.  Hugh could do
better.  With Julianne Moore, Jeff Goldblum, Tom Arnold, Joan Cusack,
and a scene-stealing Robin Williams.
     Another funny film about film, this one boasting another smooth
comic performance from Kevin Spacey.  (Remember THE REF?)  He does an
Oscar-worthy turn as a tyrannical studio executive who gets *his* after
a year of abusing his fresh-from-film-school assistant (Frank Whaley).
Boasting torture sequences right out of DEATH AND THE MAIDEN, this
pitch-black comedy may be too much for some.  Hilarious.

Title
Review for Heat (1995)
(WB)
Directed by    Michael Mann
Written by     Michael Mann
Cast           Al Pacino, Robert De Niro, Val Kilmer, Diane Venora,
               Amy Brenneman, Tom Sizemore, Jon Voight, Ashley Judd
MPAA Rating    "R" (presumably for violence and language)
Running Time   152 minutes
Reviewed at    Mission Valley Cinemas, Raleigh, NC (15DEC95)
      Wow.  Director Michael Mann's epic crime story is an instant 
qualifier for the category of "year's best."  The three-hour tale 
of cops and robbers has been fashioned from the oldest of stories, 
but Mann puts a provocative psychologist twist on it.  He focuses 
on the *inner* lives of two obsessively driven men:  master thief 
Neil McCauley (Robert De Niro) and LA cop Vincent Hanna (Al 
Pacino).  They spend almost the entire movie apart, an irony that 
isn't lost on anyone before or behind the camera.  Pacino and 
De Niro have never shared a scene together, despite starring as 
father and son in THE GODFATHER, PART II.  When they finally meet, 
in the middle of the movie, for an impromptu coffee-shop conver-
sation, it's a quiet moment of impressive magnitude.
     Despite the implications of the punchy title, Mann's extended 
cat-and-mouse chase is not about testosterone-poisoned action 
heroes.  These guys are just out to do their jobs; each more 
methodical than maniac, or so they would rationalize.  They know 
they have a job to do, and that some people might get hurt as a 
result.  (Such as their women-- the wives, daughters, and 
girlfriends that the story poignantly portrays.)  The overall tone 
is cool; perhaps too cool for some.  The dolby-enchanced set-
pieces, the ones most likely shown in the ads, are few and far 
between.  A heavy-artillery shoot-out on the downtown streets of LA 
is something to see, though.  Mann, ever the thinking director, 
allows us to catch our breath.  Just as he allows his characters 
their own moments of silence.
     The superior photography, by Dante Spinotti, is one of the 
many technical credits that deserves Oscar recognition.  As he's 
shown in THIEF, MANHUNTER, and THE LAST OF THE MOHICANS, as well as 
in his two TV series "Miami Vice" and "Crime Story," Michael Mann 
is no slouch on style.  Nor on substance.  He's written reasonable 
roles for Tom Sizemore, Jon Voight (!), Val Kilmer, and Ashley 
Judd.  The supporting players are an equally impressive lot.  The 
whammo cast also includes Wes Studi, Ted Levine, Amy Brenneman, 
Mykelti Williamson, Natalie Portman, and Tom Noonan.  And, since we 
*are* in LA, both rocker Henry Rollins and rapper Tone-Loc wander 
through for a scene or two.  
Michael J. Legeros - Raleigh, NC        
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Check triangle.movies for weekly reviews from MOVIE HELL

Title
Review for That Thing You Do! (1996)
     The writing and directing debut of Tom Hanks is very much like his
screen persona:  pleasant, witty, and entirely inoffensive.  THAT THING
YOU DO!  is about a fictional '60's pop band (from Erie, PA) who find
fame and fortune with their first recorded song.  (That song they do,
which you'll soon love to hate, is played at least ten times during the
movie.  Or is it eleven?) Most of the story (about 90 minutes worth) is
devoted to the *rise* of the band and, once that's over, what happens
afterward is all but ignored.  No problem!  The obvious intent, here, is
a feel-good, everybody's happy period piece with lots of freshly
scrubbed faces and plenty of upbeat, uptempo, up up up music.  Few
frowns are allowed, thank you very much, which I guess means a movie
better suited to Beatles people than Elvis people.  (Somewhere you have
to make a choice.) And, if you winced at the modern-sounding soundtrack
of GRACE OF MY HEART, be prepared for more canned music.  Damn slick,
like every- thing else.  Frankly, I didn't like this movie.  Despite the
honest laughs, an appealing cast, and a couple of very personal cameos,
it was just too nice for my tastes. 
--
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Santa Clause, The (1994)
     Should you see this movie?  Probably not--not unless you're under
the age of ten.  Based on the (de)merits of story mechanics alone, THE
SANTA CLAUSE should be unwatchable.  The trouble is the star.  Tim
Allen, of TV's "Home Improvement," has leaped to the big screen with
his talent intact.  He's witty, he's charming and, thanks to a
*fantastic* make-up job, he's the life-presever for a movie that should
sink.  Plot holes can't swallow him, sentiment can't drown him; the
comic even gets away with a decade-old ZZ Top gag.
     The other cast members should be so lucky.  Two child actors are
good--Eric Lloyd and David Krumholtz--but the rest of the rest are
bargain-basement at best.  What can you say about a film where neither
Judge Reinhold nor Peter Boyle are funny?
     THE SANTA CLAUSE looks like a made-for-TV movie and that's no
good.  With the exception of Allen's exceptional make-up, the special
effects consist almost entirely of blue screens and flying wires.  Both
of which can be tolerated, but avert thine eyes at the cheesy arctic
soundstage.  Shudder.
     The story is sanitized--thank you, Mr. Disney--so most of the gags
are of the warm, fuzzy variety.  The tone is tame, but a divorce
subplot a la MRS. DOUBTFIRE provides a slight reality check.  What's
really needed, though, is a narrative device to help chart the passage
of time.
     THE SANTA CLAUSE chronicles one year in the life of Scott Calvin
(Allen), a busy businessman who just happens to be the big guy.  Over
the year his weight increases, his hair turns grey, and he develops a
taste for cookies and milk.  Because there's no framing device to count
down to the big day, the entire midsection sags.  Does dad gain all his
weight in one week?  Does his beard appear in July?  Sigh.
     The film wraps with a super-silly finale that should've been left
on the cutting room floor.  Who wants to see Santa and a SWAT team in
the same frame?  Oh, what John Hughes could've done here.

Title
Review for Phenomenon (1996)
     This crowd-pleasing melodrama is built around a nifty premise:
popular George Malley (John Travolta), a small-town auto mechanic of
average intelligence, undergoes a change on the night of his 37th
birthday.  He becomes smarter, devouring whole books in the evening
because he doesn't want to sleep.  He begin inventing things, like a
manure-fueled motor that gets 90 miles to the gallon.  He even acquires
such mysterious metaphysical talents as telekinesis and the ability to
predict when an earthquake is coming.  Poor George.  He's probably the
sweetest guy in his small Northern California town and, yet, he's just
as baffled as his doctor (Robert Duvall), his best friend (Forrest
Whitaker), and the divorcee-with-kids (Myra Sedgwick) that he dotes
upon.
     No extrasensory perception is required to predict how the rest of
the movie plays out.  PHENOMENON is designed to go down easy, with no
sharp edges and nothing bitter about the taste.  You know the drill:
warm humor, smiling people, loud musical cues, and all of those
oh-so-quaint, sun-baked surroundings.  The whole thing is about 90%
predictable and that's exactly how the director, Jon Turtletaub (WHILE
YOU WERE SLEEPING), wants it.  He may not be another Spielberg-- a
critical omission, here, is any genuine sense of wonder-- but he does
know how to take a coolly calculated story and turn it into a satisfying
and seemingly spontaneous product.  (Sci-fi fans, however, may be
disappointed to find that Turtletaub is much more interested in the
story's romantic implications than the scientific.)
     Unfortunately, what develops into an honest and rather wholesome
movie is all but negated in the last half-hour.  PHENOMENON turns ugly
somewhere around the ninety-minute mark.  The plot begins taking odd,
manipulative turns and, by the time that we've been subjected to yet
another pop song-scored montage, the story is clearly, though slowly,
spiraling out of control.  These "extra" dramatics are hideous, entirely
unnecessary, *and* suggest that neither the director nor the writer had
any idea about how to end this movie.  (The filmmakers should've quit
while they were ahead.) There is enough emotion at the very end, though,
to satisfy the movie's intended audience.  They'll cry, leave, and be
none the wiser. 
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Ulee's Gold (1997)
     This leisurely paced but increasingly gripping indy drama should be
high on any summer moviegoer's list.  In the first (the first?) Oscar-
worthy performance of the year, Peter Fonda plays Ulysses "Ulee" Jack-
son, a fiercely introverted Florida beekeeper who is playing single dad
to his jailed son's daughters.  He leads a reclusive life, forgoing
friends and the help of others, even during the busiest of bee seasons.
Everything expectedly changes with the arrival of the kid's drug-
dependent mother.  In her dazed and confused wake comes a kind nurse
from across the street (Patricia Richardson, from "Home Improvement")
and two small-time thugs who have unfinished business with Ulee's son.
While Fonda's performance is the obvious centerpiece here-- think an
eerie invocation of his father crossed with, say, Clint Eastwood--
writer/director Victor Nunez (RUBY IN PARADISE) has crafted a story
that's consistently engaging.  (Even if the methodical pacing is
potentially sleep-inducing.) I particularly enjoyed a beekeeper's-eye
view of honey-making, as well as watching the step-by-step process of an
entire family's healing.

Title
Review for As Good As It Gets (1997)
     The new romantic comedy from James L. Brooks (BROADCAST NEWS, TERMS
OF ENDEARMENT) is a hoot.  Jack Nicholson sinks his fangs into yet
another role of a lifetime as Melvin, an obsessive-compulsive Manhattan
writer whose cranky, cursing, confrontational tendencies are in grave
danger of being humanized by three beings:  a struggling single mom
(Helen Hunt), a wounded gay artist (Greg Kinnear), and said artist's
small dog.  Politically incorrect hilarity ensues, but also a few tears,
as Mel can break a heart as quickly as he warms one.  In fact, the film
covers a range of emotions that's arguably *too* wide for it's own good.
The big (but not crippling) problem is the tone, which is susceptible to
the same split-second shifts that Nicholson's character is.  (Yeah, it's
fun to see him turn on a dime; it's another matter entirely when the
movie wants to.)  Then there's the story, which feels more than a little
contrived.  We're asked to believe a whole lot in this one, the least of
which is the grave age (and experiential) difference between Mel and his
love interest, well-played by Ms. Hunt.  How odd, I must say, to enjoy a
romance that has you rooting for the two to stay *apart*.  With Cuba
Gooding Jr., Shirley Knight, and Skeet Ulrich.  And, the song sung at
the piano by Jack is, indeed, Monty Python's "Always Look On The Bright
Side of Life."

Title
Review for Boogie Nights (1997)
     This over-praised ensemble drama that thinks it's an epic, set in
the skin flick industry of late seventies L.A., ostensibly stars Mark
Wahlberg (TRAVELLER, FEAR) as a troubled teen whose "natural endowment"
attracts the attention of a renowned pornographer and, soon enough, has
him plunging little-headfirst into the increasingly intoxicating world
of sex, drugs, and disco.  No, it's not the year's best movie-- not by a
13-inch long shot-- but it *is* frank, funny, and surprisingly poignant.
(And, at times, quite exciting, with several exceptionally energized
sequences, such as an explosive cocaine heist that happens late in the
film.) The big dick problem of BOOGIE NIGHTS is an abruptly unfocused
narrative, signaled in the second hour by an out-of-the-blue turn by
Wahlberg's character.  After he throws a hissy fit, we wander about for
a good hour, never sure of which character we're following or why.
Things *do* improve in the final reel, however, when writer/director
Paul Thomas Anderson (HARD EIGHT) scares several of the characters
straight with three separate (and shocking) instances of violence.
Still, with so many other accomplishments all under one roof-- camera
work, set design, soundtrack, etc.-- this has gotta be an easy movie to
overrate.  BTW, how many of those TOUCH OF EVIL takes did P.T. pull off,
anyway?  With Julianne Moore, John C. Reilly, Heather Graham, Don
Cheadle, Luis Guzman, William H. Macy, and, in one of his best roles in
years, Burt Reynolds.

Title
Review for Trial and Error (1997)
(New Line)
Directed by     Jonathan Lynn
Written by      Gregory Bernstein, Sara Bernstein, and Cliff Gardner    
Cast            Michael Richards, Jeff Daniels, Charlize Theron, Austin
                Pendleton, Jessica Steen, Rip Torn
MPAA Rating     "PG-13"
Running Time    106 minutes
Reviewed at     Six Forks Station Cinemas, Raleigh, NC (31MAY97)
     TRIAL AND ERROR is a clumsy reworking of MY COUSIN VINNY, with
director Jonathan Lynn staging another small-town trial with another
exasperated judge presiding over yet another courtroomful of colorful
personalities.  In this case, its Michael Richards out-of-work actor
impersonating his best-friend lawyer (Jeff Daniel), after a bachelor
party for the latter leaves him incapacitated.  Despite the Kramer-ish
antics of Mr. Richards, some fresh flustering by VINNY veteran Austin
Pendleton (as the judge), and one howler of a testimony from Rip Torn
(as the defendant), the courtroom shenanigans end up only intermittenly
funny.  Far more interesting is the romance that develops between
Daniels' character and a waitress (played by a glowing Charleze Theron)
and a late line of thought that asks each character to examine how the
issue of truth affects them.

Title
Review for Sleepers (1996)
     Here's another long sit-- an elaborate revenge fantasy based, for
all we know, on events that best-selling author Lorenzo Carcaterra
pulled out of his butt.  (The story is supposedly true.) Written for the
screen and directed by Barry Levinson (DISCLOSURE, TOYS), SLEEPERS is a
textbook example of bad-choice filmmaking.  Jason Patric's impoverished
narration sets the tone of something's-not- right and the rest of the
movie is just as wrong.  My favorite flub is the entire third act, which
is too cramped to be comprehensible.  I mean, there's a good twenty
minutes in there where *nothing* makes sense.  Who are these adult
characters?  And why should we care about them?  The plot keeps surging
forward, with momentum in its sails and believability in its wake.
(Most disappointing are all those could've-been-better bits, such as
Brad Pitt feeding Dustin Hoffman his lines in court.  We need to savor
such scenes.) Yeah, this movie is easy on the eyes.  Yeah, enough
happens on- screen to pass the time.  Just don't expect to enjoy what
you're watching.
Mike Legeros 
Raleigh, NC, USA, Earth
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@pagesz.net (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>"Orange whip?  Orange whip?  Three orange whips." [and do gesture]

Title
Review for Last Man Standing (1996)
     A brilliant failure.  Director Walter Hill, who was in much better
form last year with his little-seen WILD BILL, has remade YOJIMBO not
once but *twice* in the same film.  First, as a dusty, dry- throated
Western (been there, done that, in A FISTFUL OF DOLLARS) and, secondly,
as a hard-boiled Prohibition-era thriller complete with fedoras, tommy
guns, and Model-A Fords.  The age-old plot again involves a wandering
stranger who happens upon a violent rivalry and promptly pits each side
against each other.  Sound familiar?  This time, it's a pair of Chicago
gangs competing for Mexican booze in a nearly-deserted Texas town.  Film
fans could devote an entire evening to discussing why this movie fails
from the get-go.  Here's my initial impression:  we want the central
character (Bruce Willis, miscast) to be a mystery man, which he can't be
as long as he's narrating the damn thing.  Our eyes see Sergio Leone,
but our ears hear Mike Hammer.  If you will.  For anyone who needs more
than just gunplay to ground a movie, it's a confounding waste of time.
We left and asked for our money back.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Heaven & Earth (1993)
Writer, director Oliver Stone (PLATOON, BORN ON THE FOURTH OF JULY,
        grassy knoll picnicker :-) )
Based on the books WHEN HEAVEN AND EARTH CHANGED PLACES by Le Ly
        Hayslip with Jay Wurts and CHILD OF WAR, WOMAN OF PEACE
        by Le Ly Hayslip with James Hayslip
Cast: Tommy Lee Jones (THE FUGITIVE, UNDER SIEGE)
      Joan Chen (THE LAST EMPEROR, TV's "Twin Peaks")
      Haing S. Ngor (MY LIFE, THE KILLING FIELDS)
      Hiep Thi Le
MPAA Rating: "R" (Presumably for rape, war, and related atrocities)
Running Time: 140 Minutes
     Director Oliver Stone completes his "Vietnam Trilogy" with HEAVEN
AND EARTH, a story that's told, for a change, from the perspective of
"the other side."  Based upon the real life story of Vietnamese peasant
Le Ly, Stone delivers another satisfying, but, this time, heavy-handed
lesson in war and peace.
     The story introduces the simple rice-farming community of Ky La.
It's a lush paradise in Central Vietnam, relatively unscathed until the
arrival of the Viet Cong in '63.  Young Le Ly (Hiep Thi Le) watches her
brothers join the Communists, who return one night to torture and rape
her.  (The 'Cong, that is.)  She escapes the bedlam by fleeing to Saigon
at age 18.  There, she works for a wealthy, married master who, promptly,
gets her pregnant.
     Later on, Le Ly meets a nice American soldier (Jones).  They get
married, he's nuts, and her life takes another terrible turn when she
moves to America.  All, so she can return to her homeland, many years
later, and deliver a touching message about the value of strife and
suffering....
     Taken at face value, most of HEAVEN AND EARTH is an interesting
and, ultimately, satisfying examination of war.  But the director lays
it too thick this time--hammering every point across at least a dozen
times too many.
     His most annoying technique is how he punctuates every Important
Moment with a short, slow-motion montage of Important Images.  This bit
works well for, about, five times, then grows grating.
     Of course, after the first hour, the viewer is already pretty numb
from the raw drama.  Happily, at the ninety-minute mark--when Tommy
Lee Jones shows up--Stone takes a breather and lets some levity into
his film.  Granted, it lasts for all of twenty minutes, but, oh, how
sweet it is!
     Stone mines some surprising humor out of Le Ly's arrival in
America.  Classic bits include her first encounter with a full
refrigerator and a wide-eyed visit to her first supermarket.
     As the supremely oppressed Le Ly, newcomer Hiep Thi Le is quite a
find.  She displays a good range of emotions and some surprising signs
of subtly.  Tommy Lee Jones is equally watchable.  He's at his most
menacing, though, in his later scenes.  Both Joan Chen and Haing S.
Ngor barely register playing Le Ly's parents.  Go figure.
     Look for Debbie Reynolds, who makes her first screen appearance in
over twenty years.
     Technical credits are all very fine, with the exception of a bit
too much filtered lighting.  What's the haze for, Ollie?

Title
Review for Scream 2 (1997)
     The fact that I survived a packed preview at the stinky Six Forks--
with a few hundred gabby teens and not a damn bit of hi-fi sound to
drown 'em out-- is an accomplishment unto itself.  Too bad the film
wasn't better.  SCREAM 2 is a hip, hair-raising, self-referential snore.
Series' creators Wes Craven (director) and Kevin Williamson (writer)
have relocated their smash franchise ($39M!) to a sleepy college town,
where the survivors of the first film (Neve Campbell, David Arquette,
Courtney Cox, etc.) are being stalked by a copycat killer.  (In the in-
spired but overlong opening, the killer makes his/her debut at a rauc-
ous, ROCKY HORROR--like premiere of STAB, a movie based on the book
based on the fictional events of the first film.)  Though the number of
in-jokes ends up far higher than any body count, the boo bits are act-
ually the *more* successful component of the movie.  Only intermittenly
does Williamson's script crackle with enough electric wit to make you
forget that you're watching a bunch of good-looking bad actors being put
through the standard slasher motions.  (Or, in the case of the godawful
ending, an apparent live-action update of "Scooby Doo, Where Are You?")
With Omar Epps, Rebecca Gayheart, Sarah Michelle Gellar, Jamie Kennedy,
Laurie Metcalf, Jerry O'Connell, Jada Pinkett, Liev Schreiber, and play-
ing Drew Barrymore in the opening of STAB, Rollergirl herself, Heather
Graham.

Title
Review for Fargo (1996)
     In the remarkably rich and furiously funny FARGO, brothers Joel and
Ethan Coen have returned to their roots, both thematically and geograph-
ically.  The "brats," as they are called by some, have effectively
remade their first film, BLOOD SIMPLE, as a Midwestern murder mystery
with a cutting comedic edge.  (Think of a snowy stew of darkness and
deadpan-- BLOOD SIMPLE mixed with a little RAISING ARIZONA.) More
importantly-- more hilariously-- the Twin Cities- born brothers have
concocted their first loving celebration of all things Minnesota.
     William H. Macy (last seen in what I call MR. HOLLAND'S ANUS) stars
as a scheming Minneapolis car salesman (and putz), whose idea for
raising cash involves kidnapping his wife to get the ransom from her
rich father.  Things quickly go wrong for everyone involved, including
two "hired hands" from Fargo (Steve Buscemi and Peter Stormare).  Three
murders, two hookers, and one jump-start later, the very-pregnant,
very-polite Brainerd (MN) Chief of Police Marge Gunderson (Joel's wife,
Frances McDormand) steps into the picture.  Or, rather, waddles.
     FARGO is the least-stylized and, probably, most-mature Coen film to
date.  The oft-criticized brothers have, finally, achieved a balance
between their love of eccentricity and their audience's base need for
feeling.  Simply, they've made a very quirky (read:  very Coen) film
with a heart.  Here are characters with real, negotiable emotions--
unlike the past cartoon creations that have been all too common in the
Coen universe.  (THE HUDSUCKER PROXY, for example, is both a visual tour
de force and an emotional black hole.  Jennifer Jason Leigh's
character-- the eventual force of good in the story-- never makes an
emotional impact.  She just talks fast.)
     As we're in very SIMPLE territory, expect plenty of grisly details
and sadistic flourishes.  (A couple of tree-clearing tools are used to
particularly fine effect.  Nods to Paul Bunyan?) The laughs are there,
too.  FARGO is recorded in sing-song, Scandinavian stereo, with dialects
and dialogue that you just don't hear south of Lake Michigan. (Yes, they
really *do* talk like that.  Yup, you betcha.) Don't expect an easy
explanation for it all, tho.  FARGO is more than a little intentionally
obscure.  For example, we don't know what to make of a hotel encounter
between Marge and an old schoolmate.  Is it a comment on her perpetual
politeness?  A deduction about her powers of reasoning?  For all we
know, the moment exists solely to hear an Asian-American who also talks
with that wonderful accent.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
MOVIE HELL is on the Web!  http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Anne Frank Remembered (1995)
     This sometimes-tedious and often-moving documentary charts the life
and times of Anne Frank, the young diarist and most-famous victim of
Adolph Hitler.  Writer/director/producer Jon Blair has collected a
staggering amount of historical material on both Anne and the Frank
family.  We meet Miep Gies, one of the family's protectors who is still
alive.  She recounts how she found the diary in the days after the
Germans captured the Franks.  We watch Otto Frank, Anne's father and
surviving family member, in interview footage filmed before his death.
Blair successfully combines these clips, footage, and other historical
records to recount exactly what happened during that terrible period of
European history.  As narrated by Kenneth Branagh and with diary excepts
read by Glenn Close, ANNE FRANK REMEMBERED retells more than just Anne's
story.  We meet and learn about the *many* friends, family members, and
acquaintances whose lives were touched by this young woman and her
writings.  Winner of the last year's Academy Award for Best Documentary.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Mystery Science Theater 3000: The Movie (1996)
     Mike Nelson, Tom Servo, and Craig T. Robot bring their cable-TV
shtick to the big screen in MYSTERY SCIENCE THEATER 3000: THE MOVIE,
though with a substantially less-awful target to take aim at.  The
three, who sit silhouetted at the bottom of the frame, wisecrack their
way through the cheesy 1955 classic THIS ISLAND EARTH.  From sitcoms to
"Star Trek" to DR. STRANGELOVE, their comments come from every corner of
the pop-culture spectrum.  More gags fail than fly, sure, but they all
contribute to an atmosphere of mirth and merriment that lasts the
duration of the film.  You'll laugh; you'll howl.  (Unfortunately, the
other sequences-- those set in the dog bone-shaped space station, where
the characters live, breathe, and watch movies-- are cheap-looking and
largely unfunny.) The best part of MST3K: THE MOVIE is that the humor
lacks either a mean-spirited or condescending edge.  The writers don't
attempt to outsmart the viewer; instead, they invite us to laugh along
with them.  They know, as we do, that bad movies are best heckled at.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Mary Reilly (1996)
     The swooping shots across darkened rooftops suggest a very Tim 
Burton movie, but, alas, no caped crusader descends to save *this* 
film. Instead, it's a skeletal housemaid (Julia Roberts) who must bear 
witness to this unfortunate retelling of "Dr. Jekyll and Mr. Hyde." 
For a few, fleeting, maddening moments, director Stephen Frears 
(DANGEROUS LIAISONS) gets everything just right-- the tone, the 
colors, the characters; all the ingredients to make a most-powerful 
potion out of Valerie Martin's best-selling novel.  Yet it fizzles 
too quickly; the volatile mixture losing potency from the very first 
scene.
     Casting is a large part of the problem.  The story all but collap-
ses around Ms. Roberts-- she doesn't have the range for this kind of 
drama.  Her accent also comes and goes, though it's nowhere near as 
glaring as the total lack of chemistry between her and co-star John 
Malkovich.  (He looks the same in both of his roles-- an incredible 
fact that's missed by everyone in the story!)  The very British 
supporting cast-- including Michael Gambon and George Cole-- gives 
credibility to the smaller parts.  Glenn Close also appears as a 
Madam that the Good Doctor calls upon.  Her performance is as close 
to intentional camp as the movie ever gets and-- as a bonus-- offers 
a likely peek at her upcoming Cruella De Ville in the live-action 101 
DALMANTIONS.
     The biggest botch in MARY REILLY is suspense:  there is none.  No 
terror, no tension; nothing.  Without any weight, wit, or wonder to 
propel the story, the viewer is left with little more to do than pay 
attention to the period detail, a few buckets of blood, and Stuart 
Craig's fabulously dreary production design.  All of which gets old 
after about an hour, at which point I recommend leaving.  (The pacing 
in the second-half is especially abominable.  If you *do* stick it 
through, your sole reward is a half-hokey special effect depicting 
the infamous transformation.)  
     Mr. Frears reportedly recut his film several times, missing 
several release dates in the process.  (Obviously, no one advised him 
to throw up his hands and just turn the whole damned thing over to Mel 
Brooks.  Blucher!)  MARY REILLY is the second Robert Louis Stevenson 
story of the month, after MUPPET TREASURE ISLAND.  Perhaps Mr. Frears 
should consult with Brian Henson on future projects.  I daresay that 
even Ms. Piggy is a better choice for a certain roles than Julia 
Roberts.  And she does have a great chop! 
--
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
MOVIE HELL is on the Web!  http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Schindler's List (1993)
Directed by Steven Spielberg
Written by Steven Zaillian, based on the novel by Thomas Keneally
Starring Liam Neeson, Ben Kingsley, Ralph Finnes
MPAA Rating: "R" (presumably for Holocaust horrors)
Running Time: 195 minutes
     Steven Spielberg's SCHINDLER'S LIST is a three-hours-plus-change,
black-and-white biographical drama about a Nazi industrialist who saved
over 1,100 Jews during the Holocaust.  And it's also grand
entertainment, albeit delivered in a very unexpected fashion.
     SCHINDLER'S LIST is the true story of Oskar Schindler (Liam
Neeson), a shrewd Nazi businessman who smells profit in Poland.  The
year is 1939 and displaced Jews are arriving in the city of Krakow at a
rate of 10,000 per week.  Schindler sees an angle and arranges to open
a manufacturing firm with unpaid Jews as labor.  With a Jewish
accountant (Ben Kingsley) handling the "nuts and bolts," Schindler's
company soon becomes a major supplier of cookware to the German army.
     But as the war progresses, the Jews in Krakow are relocated to a
labor camp outside of town.  Schindler is outraged at the treatment of
his workers and bargains with the base commander (Ralph Fiennes) to
bring his Jews back to the factory--a labor "sub camp" that has become
a haven for hundreds of Jews who are all but assured that they won't
die there.
     Seemingly a strict mercenary at heart, Oskar Schindler nonetheless
finds himself affected by his workers.  Which compels him to undertake
a series of dangerous actions to protect his Jews....
     Most of SCHINDLER'S LIST is unlike anything that Steven Spielberg
(or the rest of Hollywood) has done before.  Gone are the camera
tricks.  Gone are the special effects.  Gone are the swelling strings.
In its place is a new universe: a grim, black-and-white world where the
only rule is realism.
     In near-documentary fashion, Spielberg catalogs horror after
horror of the Nazi war machine.  His camera never turns away from even
the most monstrous of atrocities.  But he never stares, either.
     The effect is remarkable, to say the least, and SCHINDLER'S LIST
delivers a punch rarely felt in mainstream movies.
     Forget persecution, the indiscriminate murders, alone, are
numbing.  But then come the details: a conveyor belt dumping bodies
onto an enormous pyre.  Nurses scrambling to feed patients poison
before the Nazis reach the hospital.  The reaction of a Jewish jeweler
to a satchel full of human teeth.
     As overpowering as it sounds, the Holocaust is just a part of the
film's matter-of-fact background.  Spielberg isn't delivering any Big
Statement here.  Instead, he treats the horror as something that,
simply, happened.  Much as when Schindler himself states that "People
die--it's a fact of life."
     Move into the foreground and SCHINDLER'S LIST lightens up
considerably.
     Despite the sobering subject matter, there's plenty to enjoy about
this story of a rogue, reluctant hero.  SCHINDLER'S LIST contains
action, drama, insight, and humor.  And all in surprisingly equal
proportions.  Call it the balancing act of the year--director
Spielberg and writer Zaillian walk a tight line between too-little and
too-much.  And sometimes they trip.
     The three leads are excellent.  Liam Neeson is a polished but
shadowy presence.  His character is a cipher, though, but that doesn't
detract.  Much better realized is the role of Commandant Amon Goeth,
the labor camp commander brilliantly played by Ralph Fiennes.  He's a
complex study of evil that could find Fiennes friends at the Oscars.
     Mel Brooks notwithstanding, the screen Nazi may never be the same
again.
     The very important third player is Ben Kingsley as Itzhak Stern,
Schindler's accountant and later right-hand-man.  Stern spends most of
the film as the silent partner, wary of his employer--the enemy--but
no less dedicated.
     The supporting cast doesn't make as strong an impression.
Schindler's wife (Caroline Goodall) registers, as do several Nazi
officers.  And many of Schindler's Jews become familiar faces by the
end of the film.  The rest are mostly extras who provide the portraits
in a haunting hall of sad faces.
     Technical credits are exemplary.  Allan Starski's production
design, Janusz Kaminski's cinematography, and Michael Kahn's editing
are all outstanding.  Even John Williams comes through with an atypical
score that's a knock-out.
     SCHINDLER'S LIST lags in a couple spots.  An abused chamber maid
delivers a monologue that restates the obvious.  Some footage appears
to be missing after the Auschwitz incident.  And Schindler's final
speech fails, in spite of the director's obvious restraint. (Neeson
just plays it wrong.)

Title
Review for Cabin Boy (1994)
Exec. Producers: Denise Di Novi and Tim Burton (!!!)
Writer, director: Adam Resnick from a story with Chris Elliott
Cast: Chris Elliott        (GROUNDHOG DAY, THE ABYSS, TV's "Get a Life")
      Ritch Brinkley       (TV's "Murphy Brown")
      Brian Doyle-Murray   (GROUNDHOG DAY, WAYNE'S WORLD, JFK)
      Brion James          (THE PLAYER, ANOTHER 48 HRS., 48 HRS.)
      James Gammon         (LEAVING NORMAL, MAJOR LEAGUE)
      Melora Walters
      and a bizarre supporting cast including David Letterman (!),
        Andy Ritcher (!!), Ricki Lake, Russ Tamblyn (!!!), and Bob Elliott.
MPAA Rating: "PG-13" (but still full of *very* salty language :-)
Running Time: Approximately 90 minutes.
     David Letterman and Conan O'Brien TV sidekick Andy Ritcher
starring in a comedy produced by Tim Burton?
     Believe it or not, both appear in the goofy Chris Elliott vehicle
CABIN BOY.  Elliott, of course, is an old Letterman alumni who went on
"bigger things," including his show "Get a Life" on Fox.  Now, Bob
Elliott's boy has gone and got his own movie.  And, believe or it not,
it's actually kinda funny.
     Elliott stars as Nathaniel, the prim but quite obnoxious student
of a fine finishing school.  On graduation day, he's supposed to catch
a cruise ship to Hawaii where he'll work for his rich father (guess who
plays him? :)  But, true to slapstick convention, young Nathan goes to
the wrong seaport and boards the wrong boat.
     He hops onto a fetid fishing boat (called The Filthy Whore) and
joins its rag-tag, drunken crew of five thinking that he's booked on a
"theme cruise."  Only when he's several miles out to sea does our
not-very-intrepid hero learn the bitter truth.
     And, since he's a moron, he manages to steer the boat straight
into "Hell's Bucket"--an uncharted region populated by all manner of
supernatural creatures....
     CABIN BOY is a strange piece of work.  With a supporting cast
that includes a giant, a six-armed siren, and a half-man/half-shark,
the film feels like a lower budget version of Terry Jones' ERIK THE
VIKING.  That film, if you recall, successfully combined droll comedy
with strong fantasy.
     In CABIN BOY, both the comedy and fantasy are substantially
subdued, but no less enjoyable.  What other film this year is likely to
feature giant flying cupcakes that spit tobacco?  Or gusting winds that
are blown by clouds with human faces?
     The humor--like the film itself--is spotty in spots.  The jokes
vary in quality, but the cast gets off some good one-liners.  Make a
few provisions for the slower moments, mix in the fantasy, and you get
one very goofy movie.
     As expected, Chris Elliott plays Chris Elliott.  If you enjoy his
grating speech and effeminate mannerisms, then he'll amuse.  His
shipmates are a motley crew of familiar character actors.  They have a
whale of a time overacting and shouting nonsense like "Holy Christ in a
dump truck."  Newcomer Melora Walters is a waste as Elliott's "love
interest," but she gets good lines like "I'm always flattered when a
psychotic gets smitten on me."
     And, any casting deficiencies are overcome by the periodic
appearances of more-famous faces.  Blink and you'll miss Ricki Lake,
Russ Tamblyn, or Bob Elliott.
(Letterman shows up early--you can't miss him.)

Title
Review for Juror, The (1996)
(Columbia)
Directed by    Brian Gibson
Written by     Ted Tally, based on the book by George Dawes Green
Cast           Demi Moore, Alec Baldwin
MPAA Rating    "R" (presumably for violence, language, and badly
                    acted Italian mobsters)
Running Time   ~120 minutes
Reviewed at    General Cinemas at Pleasant Valley, Raleigh, NC (31JAN96)
      At last!  A movie that explains the O.J. verdict!  Well-endowed
literary revisionist Demi Moore stars in this thrill-less thriller, about
a juror-in-jeopardy who must convince her peers to acquit a mobster, or
else whispering bad guy Alec Baldwin will do something scary to her son. 
(Such as, say, forcing him to watch Mom strip on a late-night television
talk show?) Bad bad bad.  There's a fundamental wrongness to THE JUROR
that almost defies explanation.  Every possible dramatic convention is
ignored; every on-screen action has no meaning other than as an absurd,
immediate gratification.  Even the camp value is minimal.  The first
unwatchable movie of the year and, yet, people were clapping and cheering
to the end.  I can't explain it.  Perhaps, after viewing Demi's various
tight-fitting tops, they had formed the opinion that, for certain figures,
Moore is better. 
--
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
MOVIE HELL is on the Web!  http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Tin Cup (1996)
     We lasted forty minutes in this one.  The mood was right:  Friday
afternoon in a cool theater with a big screen and fully functioning
sound.  The seats were comfy, the attendance sparse, and even the floors
were only slightly sticky.  Thus, we were ready and waiting to enjoy
this already-acclaimed golfing comedy from writer/director Ron Shelton
(WHITE MEN CAN'T JUMP, BULL DURHAM).  And while the credit sequence was
amusing enough-- an armadillo wandering across a Texas highway and onto
a dilapidated and nearly-deserted driving range-- we just couldn't get
past the absurd second scene.  Here was an intelligent woman (Rene
Russo, whose character claims to be a doctor) who shows up for a golf
lesson (a.) alone (b.) at night and (c.) without even flinching at the
flirtatious gibberish that her instructor (Kevin Costner) starts
spouting.  Huh?  We gave this so-broad-it's-not-even-funny comedy
another thirty minutes and then left.  On the way out, we passed a
patron who was fast asleep in his plaid shirt and yellow pants.  *He*
knew that the best way to watch a boring golf game was with your eyes
closed.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Preacher's Wife, The (1996)
     Another long sit.  Director Penny Marshall's all-black, sometimes-
musical remake of THE BISHOP'S WIFE-- the 1947 Best Picture nominee that
starred Cary Grant as an angel who arrives on Earth to assist a man of
the cloth-- is a good twenty minutes too long.  Maybe thirty.  The
padding is obvious in the musical numbers, of which there are at least
eight.  (I lost count.) Most of the singing is done by Whitney Huston,
whose character commands a church choir.  (Her voice soars, but her
acting doesn't.  Neither she nor co-star Courtney B. Vance appear
excited about anything in this romantic holiday comedy.)  The forced
fuzzies are also overkill.  From foster homes to fidelity, every con-
ceivable crisis is confronted and given a cheery resolution.  The jokes
are funny, thank good- ness, and there's a Microsoft gag midway through
that's worth the price of admission.  Even with a nice performance by
Denzel Washington, who plays the visiting spirit, and some occasionally
impressive supporting work, I still wanted to go home and strangle my
Tickle Me Elmo.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC, USA, Earth
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
I'm also on the Web!  http://www.pagesz.net/~legeros/

Title
Review for Scream (1996)
     This splatter spoof from long-time genre director Wes Craven (A
NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET) wraps with a finale so uproarious and over-
the-top that I left the theater almost giddy.  The sequence, one of the
year's more-memorable and pure gold for anyone with a taste for blood,
is set at a Friday night slasher-movie marathon, with a trivia-testing
masked killer knifing everyone in the house, from the obligatory teenage
girl in the tight top to the wiseacre half-nerd horror-expert.  That guy
also gets the biggest laughs in the movie, both on-screen and off, when
he stands up to recite The Rules:  "Never have sex.  Never drink or do
drugs.  And, never, ever, say 'I'll be right back.'" And, of course they
do, and they are, and more than one person exits a room, never to
return.  You'll die, too, laughing as Craven recreates a scene from
HALLOWEEN, and then cross-cuts between it and the original, the latter
playing on a VCR.  If only the rest of the movie were as ingenious.  In
fact, the first hour so closely (cheaply?) resembles the source material
that you may just fall asleep.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC, USA, Earth
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
I'm also on the Web!  http://www.pagesz.net/~legeros/

Title
Review for Jing cha gu shi III: Chao ji jing cha (1992)
     Fresh from the success of New Line Cinema's release of RUMBLE IN
THE BRONX, Dimension Films has repackaged another Jackie Chan
action-comedy.  POLICE STORY III: SUPERCOP, a 1992 release, has been
dubbed into largely inflection-less English, re-cut with a new title
sequence, and re-scored with a hip soundtrack that includes Tom Jones
singing "Kung Fu Fighting" over the closing credits.  Groan.  The result
is a rather run-of-the-mill rouser about an affable Hong Kong police
detective and martial arts expert (Chan) who, along with his Interpol
side-kicking sidekick (Michelle Khan), infiltrates a Chinese drug ring.
     If released at any other time in the year, SUPERCOP might win some
raves.  However, when played alongside such sure-to-pleasers as
INDEPENDENCE DAY and A TIME TO KILL, the experience almost seems a waste
of adrenaline.  Chan's self-performed stunts are remarkable enough,
sure, but director Stanley Tong delivers nowhere near the amount
suggested by the ads.  The finale is a corker: an amazing helicopter and
train chase with Chan and Company kung-fu fighting on top of a moving
choo choo.  And then, when the bad guys are defeated and the Eastern
world is again safe, the customary outtake reel rolls to reveal how they
did all those scary-looking stunts.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Looking for Richard (1996)
     Al Pacino's labor-of-love documentary about William Shakespeare's
"Richard III" is delightful for, oh, about an hour.  Maybe less.
Pacino, desperate to communicate his love for the Bard, takes his camera
anywhere and everywhere, from the halls of academia right down to the
man on the street.  (In one memorable clip, a homeless man expresses
regret for the loss of feelings behind contemporary language.) Pacino
stages readings and rehearsals and, even, the occasional educational
aside.  (He provides an answer to "what is iambic pentameter?") For a
while, the whole thing is fascinating, funny, and even frank, as when
the many interviewed actors admit the brutal truths about speaking,
hearing, and understanding Bill S.  Unfortunately, when Al gets down to
the business of actually *staging* some scenes, LOOKING FOR RICHARD
begins to look lost.  Almost all of the serious stuff is filmed in that
same loose and leisurely style, which is great for capturing comments,
but not so hot when trying to do drama.  Of the costumed performers,
only two of the actors-- Estelle Parsons and Penelope Allen-- produce
any real fire.  The rest are a bit of a bore, including Al.  
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC, USA, Earth
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
I'm also on the Web!  http://www.pagesz.net/~legeros/

Title
Review for Batman: Mask of the Phantasm (1993)
     BATMAN: MASK OF THE PHANTASM belongs on the small screen. Based on
TV's acclaimed "Batman: the Animated Series," this modestly intriguing
film is undercut by second-rate animation that was clearly intended for
television viewing only.
     The plot introduces Phantasm, a fog-shrouded phantom who's preying
on key figures in Gotham City's underworld.  Dressed in a billowing
black shroud, the villain has the police thinking that "The Bat" is
behind the crimes.  The crooks, fearing for their lives, contact the
Joker to contract the Batman.  Soon, fights erupt on both fronts as
Batman battles both Phantasm and the Joker.
     Meanwhile, back at stately Wayne Manor, key subplots emerge which
include the reappearance of Bruce Wayne's one-time flame, Andrea
Beaumont, and, yes, the origin of the Caped Crusader....
     MASK OF THE PHANTASM proves that, in the case of cartoons, what
works on television doesn't always work in the movies.
     With the exception of a nifty computer-generated opening, the
animation in MASK OF THE PHANTASM is stiff and very awkward.  The
blending of foreground and background movement is lousy and there's far
two little detail hidden amid the simple but stylish backgrounds.  The
fight scenes are fluid and Gotham City looks the part, but that's about
it.
     The characters lack any expression, which makes watching any
non-action a virtual chore.  There's a load of lively dialogue in this
film--you just can't tell it from spying the speakers!  Only the
Joker, voiced by a surprisingly talented Mark Hamill, seems to get
around this problem.  With his grisly grin and gangly gait, he's the
only lively thing in the film.
     Plot holes frustrate as only comic-book creations can, a couple of
key settings are nearly indistinguishable from one another, and the
story relies way too heavily on flashback.

Title
Review for Dolores Claiborne (1995)
(Columbia)
Directed by     Taylor Hackford (AN OFFICER AND A GENTLEMAN)
Written by      Tony Gilroy, based on the novel by Stephen King
Cast            Kathy Bates, Jennifer Jason Leigh, David Strathairn,
                Christopher Plummer
MPAA Rating     "R" (presumably for language and violence)
Running Time    131 minutes
Reviewed at     General Cinema at Pleasant Valley, Raleigh (3/21)
     Since Brian DePalma first dumped a bucket of blood on Sissy Spacek
almost twenty years ago, filmmakers have been scrambling to adapt
Stephen King.  Thirty-five times they've tried, and thirty-five times
(by my count) they come up with only four words to describe their
results:  "very good" or "very bad."
     No middle ground has ever existed for the bestselling author, who,
in some circles, remains misunderstood because of those "very bad"
ones.  (He even directed one of them.  MAXIMUM OVERDRIVE.  Shudder.)
     DOLORES CLAIBORNE, thank goodness, is one of the "good" Stephen
King films.  The murder mystery--about a feisty New England woman
(Kathy Bates) facing her second accusation of murder--is also a fitting
companion piece to last year's THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION.  There's even
a script reference to the fictional prison.
     Director Taylor Hackford and writer Tony Gilroy have expanded the
bestseller.  They've both jettisoned the first-person narrative, and
introduced an adult daughter (Jennifer Jason Leigh) who doesn't appear
in the novel.  Purists may scoff, but the changes work.  The result is
a dark feminist fantasy--one that works better as a showcase for the
actors than as a statement of its politics.
     Kathy Bates is no stranger to misery.  She's a delight as the
harried heroine who may have just pushed her employer--that wealthy
invalid witch--right down the stairs.  Dolores is just as colorful as
described in the novel, even if the script omits some of her better
confrontations.
     Jennifer Jason Leigh, who is less fun, spends the entire movie
moping as Dolores' estranged daughter Selena.  The young actress broods
better than any actress her age, though she could stand to lay off the
cigarettes for a film or two.  Who would've thought she'd still have
her lungs after MRS. PARKER AND THE VICIOUS CIRCLE?
     The role of Dolores' late, abusive husband goes to David
Strathairn.  He plays it pretty broad.  More appealing is Christopher
Plummer who hams it up as the local detective.  Watch for bit parts
from Eric Bogosian (!) and Bob Gunton.  The latter starred in
SHAWSHANK.
     Told with a number of flashbacks, the narrative of DOLORES
CLAIBORNE is very easy to follow.  The photography (by Gabriel
Beristain) is great, the direction is smart, and the dialogue is
crisp.  If the ending's too tidy, it's no big deal.  The source
material still shines through.
BOTTOM LINE:  One of the "good" Stephen King films, Mr.  Man!

Title
Review for Space Jam (1996)
    An animated tribute to North Carolina's most famous native not
currently crusading against radical homer-sexual agendas, SPACE JAM is
both a surprise and a disappointment.  Who would've thought that such a
commercially crass premise (ninety minutes of Hare Jordan) would yield
such a fun family film?  While the brilliant colors, frenzied
characters, and pulse-pounding soundtrack are a dandy distraction for
the wee ones, Mom and Dad are guaranteed a good time by the many flashes
of adult humor, like a PULP FICTION gag here, a bit of sexual innuendo
there, and all of those gloriously exaggerated (and refreshingly
politically incorrect) speech impediments.  (Watch when Daffy coats the
lens after a particularly moist monologue.)
     Animation fans are also in for a treat, though they're likely to
lament the absence of any discernible edge.  Missing are the Toons' twin
trademarks:  rapid-fire wit and violent physical humor.  Sure, the final
reel breaks loose, but most of the gags (and the animated characters
themselves) are lamer, tamer versions of the originals.  Even a bigger
letdown is how... familiar the whole experience is.  What does SPACE JAM
say about our exposure to celebrities-- and the entertainment industry
as a whole-- when a well-attended, decently- reviewed blockbuster can be
built by simply casting a bunch of basketball stars, cartoon characters,
and one actor (Bill Murray) as themselves?  
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC, USA, Earth
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
I'm also on the Web!  http://www.pagesz.net/~legeros/

Title
Review for My Fellow Americans (1996)
(WB)
Directed by     Peter Segal
Written by      E. Jack Kaplan, Richard Chapman, and Peter Tolan 
Cast            Jack Lemmon, James Garner, Dan Aykroyd, John Heard, Sela
                Ward, Wilford Brimley, Everett McGill, Lauren Bacall
MPAA Rating     "PG-13"
Running Time    101 minutes
Reviewed at     Six Forks Station Cinemas, Raleigh, NC (07DEC96)
     This is crap, but, honestly, what older American audience is going
to be able to resist seeing Jack Lemmon and James Garner as bicker- ing
ex-Presidents?  Especially when their supporting players in- clude Dan
Aykroyd as the current Commander in Chief, Lauren Bacall as a former
First Lady, and John Heard as the Dan Quayle-ish Vice President.  Yup,
you're talkin' pre-sold property here and, for Warner Brothers, the
perfect fit into their now-ritual GRUMPY OLD MEN holiday slot.  For the
non-discriminating viewer, MY FELLOW AMERICANS is fine.  The raw star
power alone will have audiences applauding this atrocious political-
thriller road-comedy.  (They did in mine, heaven help us.)
    For the rest of us, the movie is immediately tiresome.  The tone is
terrible and the banter is worse.  Forget wit-- Lemmon and Garner merely
exchange profanities through most of the movie.  (Has anyone counted the
number of First Penis references?) Sure, some of the bits are absurdly
funny, including a men's room Macarena joke, the appearance of an Elvis
impersonator on a trainload of Tarheels, and an All Dorothy Marching
Band performing "Over the Rainbow" at a gay men's march.  The get there
from here, though, you have to submit to one of the most offensively
overbearing musical scores of all time.  Judas Priest, is there a single
moment of silence in this film?  Even the dialogue gets drowned out.
What a waste.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC, USA, Earth
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
I'm also on the Web!  http://www.pagesz.net/~legeros/

Title
Review for Terminal Velocity (1994)
Directed by  Deran Sarafain (GUNMEN, DEATH WARRANT)
Written by David Twohy (THE FUGITIVE, CRITTERS 2)
Cast            Charlie Sheen, Nastassja Kinski, and Christopher McDonald
MPAA Rating     "PG-13"
Running Time    Approx. 100 minutes.
     QUIZ SHOW's Christopher McDonald in a blond wig as a bad-guy!?
That's just one of the guilty pleasures of TERMINAL VELOCITY, a
harmless thriller starring Charlie Sheen as a thinks-with-his-ahem
skydiving instructor who gets wind of a conspiracy after his student
(Kinski) plays Wiley Coyote and lives.  Though slower than SPEED, the
last action sleeper, TERMINAL VELOCITY enough falling bodies and
semi-spectacular stunts to make this trip (almost) worth taking.
     The story is the weakest link, a silly mix of international
intrigue and airborne action.  David Twohy's script has more
liabilities than U.S. Air, but that doesn't deter director Deran
Sarafain.  He thinks he's Renny Harlin and pulls out all the stops,
from a gonzo mother-of-all-jumps jump to a gag stolen from DIE HARD 2.
     The scowling Sheen is always easy to watch, but his female co-star
could use some practice in self-parody.  The Arizona locales are good,
too.  Complementing the mise en scene are a windmill farm and a nifty
jet junkyard.  Too bad the plot poops so soon.  And what's with that
awful music direction?  Imitation Herrman and heavy-metal don't mix.

Title
Review for Out to Sea (1997)
A movie review by Michael J. Legeros
Copyright 1997 by Michael J. Legeros
     OUT TO SEA is a harmless reworking of GRUMPY/GRUMPIER OLD MEN,
with Jack Lemmon and Walter Matthau masquerading as dance hosts on a
Caribbean cruise ship.  In a clime considerably warmer than northern
Minnesota, they bicker less, romance more, and spend the rest of the
movie trying to avoid the cruise dictator (Brent Spiner, of STAR
TREK), a big-band singer who proclaims himself "their worst night-
mare, a song-and-dance man raised on a military base." Though the
LOL moments are few and far-between, the cheery cast and sunny
locales are all exceptionally easy on the eyes.  As is the sight of
sixty-year old Dyan Cannon's washboard abs.  Lemmon and Matthau can
sleepwalk through their schtick, so they're fine.  And Spiner really
can sing.  Be forewarned:  there *is* a finale involving a pontoon
plane.  This time, though, nothing explodes afterward.  Be sure to
stay for the outtakes, which appear late over the closing credits.

Title
Review for English Patient, The (1996)
     Cross LAWRENCE OF ARABIA with CASABLANCA and, say, THE BRIDGES OF
MADISON COUNTRY and you get this tedious, big-scale bodice-ripper about
a man (Ralph Finnes), a married woman (Kristin Scott Thomas), and their
adventurous romance in North Africa during World War II.  Director
Anthony Minghella (TRULY MADLY DEEPLY) adapts the prize-winning novel
that, in film form, begs the question:  how do you treat a movie fairly
that's so obviously overlong?  Especially one that's told in flashback,
meaning that the audience has way too much time to figure out what
happens before it happens.  There are *some* surprises to keep you
awake: an exciting sandstorm, a tense bomb-defusing sequence, and a very
cool airplane crash.  Ms. Thomas gives a passionate, bare-all (and I
mean, bare *all*) performance that miraculously resonates through the
entire almost-three-hour running time.  (Believing the early attraction
between her and Ralph Finnes is another matter.  But, hey, they do
generate some steam!)
     At the packed screening that I saw, butts were growing numb by the
second hour.  A steady stream of survivors knocked knees and sent beer
bottles barreling as they bee-lined for the lobby, or the bathroom, or
the nearest store selling No-Doze.  Oh, sure, there's probably a lean
masterpiece in here, somewhere.  A two-hour quickie that retains the
epic scope, exotic flavor, and big, boo-hoo pay-off.  (Or, perhaps, a
four-hour version with easy-to-follow time shifts and characters who
don't disappear five minutes after we meet them.) Bottom line, THE
ENGLISH PATIENT is a long sit.  The viewer has too much time to think
about other stuff, such as, say, why Willem Dafoe's character doesn't
have anything to do, or if Ralph Finnes might make a good Indiana Jones,
or how the filmmakers kept a straight face while recording those swel-
ling, smothering strings?
--
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC, USA, Earth
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
I'm also on the Web!  http://www.pagesz.net/~legeros/

Title
Review for Batman Forever (1995)
     In the supremely entertaining BATMAN FOREVER, director Joel
Schumacher serves up *story*.  Five stories, actually, as if he's
anxious to dispel the myth/truth that a BATMAN movie can only be about
atmosphere.  Working from a strong script that emphasizes the *humor*
of Gotham City, the veteran director presents a colorful grab bag of
"scarred psychoses."
     There's the Riddler (Jim Carrey), a nerdy scientist who's invented
a device to "read men's minds."  He's in cahoots with Two-Face (Tommy
Lee Jones), the scarred ex-District Attorney who is Gotham's villain du
jour.  Back at Stately Wayne Manor, the Big Guy (Val Kilmer, replacing
Michael Keaton) is thinking about retiring the cape, while his ward,
Dick Greyson (Chris O'Donnell), is itching to play dress-up.  And,
chasing everyone listed above, is a pin-up psychologist (Nicole Kidman)
who's on hand to diagnose dreams and reaffirm the lead character's
heterosexuality.
     Each character in BATMAN FOREVER gets their own story, which is
fair enough.  Unfortunately, only two of those stories really work.
The Riddler's is the most fun, with Jim Carrey in fine form as the
disgruntled Wayne Enterprises employee who wants his *own* revenge.
His Riddler is the life of the party, though we could stand to see more
of what his invention does.  The other fun one is Chris O'Donnell as
Robin.  He's the human side of BATMAN FOREVER, and he brings a fresh
vitality to a series that's always in danger of taking itself too
seriously.  He even gets to joyride in the Batmobile, though no one
bothers to explains why said vehicle has *two* tail fins in certain
scenes, instead of one.
     Val Kilmer makes an intriguing Caped Crusader, but he plays his
part too straight.  There's no edge to his character--nothing to
distinguish the fact that *he's* Batman.  He may be sturdier than his
predecessor, but, frankly, he's a bit of a bore as he spends the entire
film brooding over whether or not to be Batman.  To cowl, or not to
cowl?  (Here is where huge chunks of the story seem to be missing.
Bruce Wayne seeks help for his dreams, but we're never shown the scene
where he's supposedly "cured."  We see him *after* the fact, but the
scripted explanation involving a diary and a giant bat (!) has been
dropped.  Why?)
     There's enough energy around Kilmer to compensate for his flat
Bat, though, even if said superhero functions more like James Bond in a
cape than the Dark Knight detective of the comic books.  Case in point:
the unnecessary romance between Kilmer and Kidman.  They barely have
any screen time together!  Like most of the story, their "love
triangle" isn't given enough room to breathe.  For super-battles, quick
quick is fine; for romance it's a bust.
     Academy Award winner Tommy Lee Jones plays the other villain,
Harvey "Two-Face" Dent.  He's obsessed with justice, but he raves too
much for us to believe him.  The actor also gets quite a few good
lines, though much of his dialogue is muted, as if someone decided that
the audience would only laugh at Jim Carrey.  The jokes on
them--however broadly he's played, Two Face is still more amusing than
the one-dimensional Riddler.
     If this second villain seems to get lost in the shuffle, it's
because Two-Face is introduced immediately, with no background or
context for the audience.  The director must be counting on the
viewer's presold knowledge of the characters; something that isn't true
if you haven't been reading your Happy Meal.  The credits are rolled
over his bank robbery sequence, and it's a lousy to way to start a
movie.  It's too abrupt. They should've kept the originally scripted
opening scene of Two-Face's escape from Arkham Asylum.
     In fact, there are several places in BATMAN FOREVER where footage
seems to be missing.  Was Schumacher under pressure from Warner to
bring the film in under two hours?  The movie is missing about ten to
fifteen minutes of extra footage--small (or not so small) pieces that
could go a long way to explaining some of the action.  What exactly
does Batman's "sonar suit" do, for example?  The order of some scenes
could also be questioned.  For example, the director interrupts a
montage of Riddler robberies to show young Master Dick drying his
clothes like Jackie Chan.  It's a great a bit, but out of place at that
point in the film.
     BATMAN FOREVER is certainly more fun than the first films, due in
no small part to the numerous nods to the TV series.  The characters
spend more time joking than fighting, while the director lightens
nearly every scene with a skewered camera angle or two.  Holy homage!
There's also a ton of clever details, ranging from a beefcake shot of
the Bat Butt to a creatively coifed character affectionately titled
"Dr. Burton."  Catch some of these on the third and fourth viewing.
     The technical credits are all very good.  The art direction is
impeccable, with superb sets, costumes, and makeup.  The special
effects are good to very good--and rely a little too heavily on
the computer-generated sort, if you ask me.  The music is by Elliott
Goldenthal, who replaces Danny Elfman.  He's written a fine, loud score
that never once breaks into the familiar refrain of "na na na na na na
na na, BATMAN!"

Title
Review for Abyss, The (1989)
     Still making rounds around town is the director's cut of THE
ABYSS, a definite must-see for action fans and a perfect warm-up to the
July release of TRUE LIES.
     The story presses a team of oil-drilling divers (led by Ed Harris)
into the service of the Navy, who requests their aid to locate and
disarm a missing nuclear sub.  Along for the ride is one ex-wife (Mary
Elizabeth Mastrantonio), some less-than-playful SEALS (led by Michael
Biehn), and a handful of luminescent, underwater aliens.
     Director James Cameron's undersea adventure received a soggy
reception in 1989, despite grossing somewhere between $50 to $80
million in the States.  Critics couldn't accept the aliens and with good
reason.  The truncated film--cut by 27 minutes per the studio's
request--gave zero explanation for their existence.
     Now, with the footage restored, THE ABYSS is finally fathomable.
The ending is still way-too-literal, but Cameron was young when he made
this movie.  (Remember the awful editing in TERMINATOR 2?  The man is
still learning.  Let's talk after TRUE LIES.)
     If nothing else, THE ABYSS is a bonafide technical masterpiece.
The actors spent months underwater and did all of their own diving.
Their efforts helped to win the Oscar for Best Visual Effects.  (The
film was also nominated for best cinematography and best sound.)

Title
Review for Cowboy Way, The (1994)
     The former bartender of TV's "Cheers" is the *sole* reason to
watch this clunky action/comedy about a pair of rodeo-riders roaming
the Big Apple to find their missing friend. When they discover that
said friend is dead, they take their own approach to solving the
crime.
     COOGAN'S BLUFF it ain't, but this clunky caper comedy has about
forty-minutes of wit worth watching. The best bits have Harrelson
stealing scenes with lines like "I wouldn't throw a bucket of water on
your ass if it were drowning." The price of admission also buys the
viewer a chance to see (a) Woody with a crew cut and (b) Woody wearing
nothing but his hat.
     The rest of the rest is a lame-brain sweat-shop subplot that stops
making sense after about an hour. The finale is an absurd horse/subway
chase that's calmed by the sight of Harrelson and Sutherland riding
horseback through The City. Remember when they still made movies
there?
     Oddly, THE COWBOY WAY has much more cruelty than the rating (of
PG-13) suggests. The demise of the villain, in particular, is quite
disturbing and parents should be wary.

Title
Review for Color of Night (1994)
     Woof!  Too bad that LEAP OF FAITH was the title of a 1992 comedy
starring Steve Martin and Debra Winger, because that's what's required
to watch this incredulous howler starring Bruce Willis as--of all
things--a psychologist.  Not since the Reagan Administration has there
been an acting stretch of such magnitude!  Alas, Mickey Rourke, we
hardly knew ye.
     Story opens with a campy kick--Willis is treating a patient who
abruptly steps out of the window to take the best flying leap since
Charles Durning dove in THE HUDSUCKER PROXY.  She goes splat, he goes
ugh, and his character spends the rest of the film colorblind.
Really.  The good doctor then moves to sunny L.A., where he rooms with
an old college chum (Scott Bakula), a therapist who's getting death
threats from someone in his Monday evening group.
     Buddy bites it in the second reel (no surprise there) and Willis
agrees to take over both the group and the death threats.  For his
troubles as Therapy Man, Willis gets to share some cut-from-NC17 love
scenes with THE LOVER's Jane March while dodging nails, cars, and
rattlesnakes.
     COLOR OF NIGHT is the worst movie of the year.  Period.  Forget
NORTH, CLIFFORD, or, heaven help us, even ON DEADLY GROUND.  Here is a
movie misfire so audaciously awful that you can't help but wonder how
the actors all kept straight faces while filming.
     For starters, the "group" is a collection of mixed nuts better
suited to Bob Newhart than Bruce Willis.  These are realistic
portrayals of the mentally unhealthy?  Playing a prissy
obsessive/compulsive, CUCKOOS NEST alumni Brad Dourif, alone, may set
the psychology profession back ten years.
     The plot's a wreck with laughable dialogue, pointless POV shifts,
and the one Big Secret solvable in the first fifteen minutes.  Director
Richard Rush, who once helmed FREEBIE AND THE BEAN, doesn't seem to
mind.  Unfazed by the nincompoop plot and cuckoo characterizations, he
overfills the film with enough canny camera shots and zany set-pieces
to make the effort almost worth watching.  His token freeway chase is
OK, but the director has more fun with a vertiginous ending ala (most
recently) FATAL ANALYSIS.
     Acting credits are across-the-board awful.  Willis can be forgiven
because he's filming DIE HARD 3 as we speak.  But what about Ruben
Blades insulting presence as The Cop?  Or Lesley Ann Warren's
stereotypical sex addict?  Or Worst Offender Jane March as a
mystery-girl-who's-no-real-mystery?  Shudder.
     BOTTOM LINE:  How they all kept straight faces, I'll never know.

Title
Review for Up Close & Personal (1996)
     The nicest thing that you can say about this movie is that it's
*extremely* easy on the eyes.  Robert Redford plays a seasoned news
producer, Michelle Pfieffer is his ambitious young protege, and,
together, they lend a suitable star power to an otherwise lousy movie.
UP CLOSE AND PERSONAL is a grand failure because it's ultimately about
*nothing.* No social statement, no compelling drama, and not even a very
good love story.  We're in fairy-tale land, here, where a female
anchor's drive has less to do with her career than her co-dependency,
and where the biggest story surprise is guessing which hideous hairdo
that Pfieffer will wear next.  Ugh.
     Early in the movie, Redford says of his co-star's character: "She
eats the lens." This fact is also true for the actors as actors.  Sure,
they're too old for their happily-ever-after roles, but R.  and M. bring
an illusion of buoyancy to a steadily sinking ship.  With those two on
screen, who wants to leave early-- even in the middle of a movie as
meaningless as this?
     Unwatchable?  No.  Awful?  Often.  The low points lay like land
mines, ranging from a succession of stomach-turning love scenes to what
must be at least *four* different endings.  And what's with all those
early shots of Pfieffer bending over??  Somewhere in the middle of UP
CLOSE AND PERSONAL-- which was based on the life and times of Jessica
Savitch, until Disney got a hold of it.  Now it's merely "suggested
by"-- the two travel to the Florida Keys, over the highway bridge that
James Cameron destroyed in TRUE LIES.  I kept wishing for those Harrier
jets to return, to blow-up the bridge that would strand them there that
would stop the movie that would send us all home.  It didn't happen.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
MOVIE HELL is on the Web!  http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Waiting to Exhale (1995)
     Like the recent HOW TO MAKE AN AMERICAN QUILT, this is another 
one of those "you go girl" films; that harmless subgenre of "chick 
flicks" in which a group of women gather to piss and moan about the 
stupid men in their lives, while never acknowledging that *they* 
are the stupid ones for having stayed with them.  The message of 
"needing a man to make me happy" is inappropriate, sure, but no 
worse than, say, the legions of big-gun testosterone poisoners that 
teach violence as a method of problem-solving.
     Even as a feminist fantasy, WAITING TO EXHALE is tremendously 
watchable.  Director Forrest Whitaker, making his feature-film 
debut, evokes genuine emotion from this stellar cast of leading 
ladies.  Standout sequences include a hilariously frank sex scene 
and the early show-stopper of Angela Bassett torching her hubby's 
BMW.  You go girl!  Equally engaging are the *male* roles; a parade 
of liars and cheats that could rival the entire rogues gallery of 
any DIE HARD, James Bond, or Batman movie.
     Writers Ronald Bass and Terry McMillan (from her novel) 
deliver a staggering number of mixed messages.  Only one of the 
characters (Loretta Devine) consistently acts responsible, and 
she's the least-glamorous of the lot.  More women are likely to 
identify with Bassett's character, a devoted wife whose husband has 
left her for a younger, whiter woman.  How does she react?  By 
having a "quick one" herself.  Sigh.  Ladies, go and enjoy this 
movie.  Laugh, cry, and talk back to the screen.  Get your 
catharsis and then go pay a counselor for some *real* advice. 
(Rated "R"/124 min.)
--
Michael J. Legeros - Raleigh, NC        
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Check triangle.movies for weekly reviews from MOVIE HELL

Title
Review for Chacun cherche son chat (1996)
A movie review by Michael J. Legeros
Copyright 1997 by Michael J. Legeros
     WHEN THE CAT'S AWAY is about a young Parisian woman (Garance Cla-
vel) who loses her cat.  She leaves it with an old lady (Renee Le Calm)
before going on vacation and returns to learn that puss has popped out
the window and so she organizes a search party and they scour the
neighborhood and her gay roommate (Oliver Py) helps and the old lady
helps and the young woman makes new friends and visits new places and
still hasn't found her cat and so she lays awake at night while her
roomie bangs away in the next room and all of this was so damn exciting
that I decided to forgo what promised to be a *very* relaxing nap and,
instead, agreed with my companion that walking out was, indeed, the best
way to appreciate this so-called "charming French film." Needless to
say, returning to the real world and our really ordinary lives was one
Hell of an exciting proposition, by that point.  In French, with English
subtitles. 

Title
Review for George of the Jungle (1997)
A movie review by Michael J. Legeros
Copyright 1997 by Michael J. Legeros
     Watch out for that theme!  George, George, George of the Jungle
will play in your head for a *week* after watching this agreeable
adaptation of Jay Ward's classic 'toon.  Brendan Fraiser (ENCINO MAN,
AIRHEADS) is a dead-on delight as the butt-flapped tree knocker.  I
can't recall a comic performance this...  rich since Eddie Murphy's
nutty professor.  He's backed by a surprisingly spry supporting cast:
Anne Heche lookalike Leslie Mann as that funny-looking fella Ursula
(envisioned here as an heiress on safari), Thomas Haden Church as her
finicky fiancee, Keith Scott as the wisecracking narrator ("Meanwhile,
at a very big and expensive waterfall set"), and John Cleese as the
voice of George's tree house companion, a hyper-intelligent ape named
Ape.  Oh, and Richard Roundtree also appears as an African trail guide,
though I believe even *he* has more screen time than the woefully under-
utilized Cleese.  (Ape *does* get his due in the film's final scene,
however, which may be the wackiest bit in the entire movie.) Director
Sam Weisman (BYE BYE, LOVE, D2: THE MIGHTY DUCKS) has the tone down pat,
but his pacing leaves a lot to be desired.  That GEORGE OF THE JUNGLE
isn't frantic through and through is probably a good thing for the
smaller kids in the audience.  And their slower-witted parents.

Title
Review for Grace of My Heart (1996)
     Illeana Douglas (TO DIE FOR) gives a command performance as Denise
Waverly, a singer-songwriter trying to launch a musical career in the
late '50's, when such combinations were unheard of.  After an aspiring
producer (John Turturro) pitches the prospect of putting her words in
other people's mouths, she's soon churning out the hits in Broadway's
fabled Brill Building.  Director Allison Anders (GAS FOOD LODGING and
one of the more-dreadful segments of FOUR ROOMS) piles on the drama.
Her slick, surface-level approach also keeps us from getting close to
the characters, even the one played by the marvelous Ms. Douglas.  (You
name the fate and it happens to Denise Waverly.  And then she writes a
song about it.)  What really reeks, though, is a sound recording that 
you can't believe is real for a minute.  Each singer seems dubbed and 
each song sounds like a track from a freshly pressed compact disc.  
Just terrible.  Sure, Phil Spector might appreciate this "wall of clean
noise," but, for the sensitive ear, it's a distraction that's all but
unlistenable.  Not good in a movie about music.  
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Money Talks (1997)
     Oh, what they've tried in the fifteen years since 48 HRS:  young
cop/old cop (STAKEOUT), young cop/really old cop (THE ROOKIE), young
cop/old cop/district attorney (ANOTHER STAKEOUT), good cop/ crazy cop
(LETHAL WEAPON), good cop/crazy cop/witness (LETHAL WEAPON 2), good
cop/crazy cop/she cop (LETHAL WEAPON 3), American cop/Russian cop (RED
HEAT), American cop/Japanese cop (COLLISON COURSE), hungover cop/hapless
citizen (DIE HARD WITH A VENGEANCE), smart cop/slob cop (TANGO AND
CASH), real cop/fake cop (THE HARD WAY), real cop/alien cop (ALIEN
NATION), tall cop/short cop (BAD BOYS), silly cop/sillier cop (NATIONAL
LAMPOON'S LOADED WEAPON I), young cop/old convict (THE ROCK), old cop/
young convict again (ANOTHER 48 HRS.), young cop/young convict (BULLET-
PROOF), bail bondsman/convict (MIDNIGHT RUN), convict/convict (FLED),
and, now, convict/reporter, with Chris Tucker and Charlie Sheen as the
respective abrasive personalities thrown together for the duration of a
weekend.  Or maybe longer, but I can't be sure, because I walked out
after about a half-hour.  Mr. Tucker, so good in THE FIFTH ELEMENT, has
enough energy for *four* films, but his limitless enthusiasm is really
no match for a cliched plot, witless profanity, and a co-star who won't
stop scowling.  And what's David Warner doing here? 

Title
Review for Othello (1995)
(Columbia)
Directed by   Oliver Parker
Written by    Oliver Parker, from the play by William Shakespeare
Cast          Laurence Fishburn, Irene Jacob, Kenneth Branagh
MPAA Rating   "R" (presumably for sex, violence, and nudity)
Running Time  124 minutes
Reviewed at   The Rialto, Raleigh, NC (18JAN96)
     Moor is less in this new adaptation of the "Bill" Shakespeare
classic.  Veteran stage actor Oliver Parker, who's making his feature
film debut, is aiming for mass appeal.  He's excised almost half of the
original text, included plenty of sex and violence, and recorded the
whole thing in big, booming stereo sound.  For the leads, he's cast a
few good faces:  Laurence Fishburne as the Big Guy, French actress Irene
Jacob (RED) as Desdemona, and Kenneth Branagh as Iago.  It all sounds
good on paper, and, for the first few scenes, it almost works.
     The biggest problem is Fishburne, who's flat.  He has the look and
can deliver the lines, but he never burns with the fire that the role
requires.  Jacob, a lovely presence, stumbles a bit through her Eliz-
abethan English, while Branagh has a jolly olde time talking to and
winking at the camera.  The artist formerly known as Mr. Emma Thompson
is clearly in his element, even if he has about twelve too many asides.
(Parker's loose direction doesn't help, especially when we can't tell if
Branagh is talking to himself, to us, or to someone off-screen.) If you
really want to brush up your Shakespeare, go rent Orson Welles' superior
1952 version.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit the MOVIE HELL site http://www-nvision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Romy and Michele's High School Reunion (1997)
     ROMY AND MICHELE'S HIGH SCHOOL REUNION makes more missteps than I
care to count.  Mira Sorvino and Lisa Kudrow are, indeed, a winning pair
as the Venice Beach space cases, pretending to be successful, self-
employed inventors at their ten-year reunion.  (Their claimed claim to
fame:  Post-It notes.) Alas, the movie, a cross between CLUELESS and
DUMB AND DUMBER, lets them down at almost every turn.  Flashbacks dispel
the momentum of the first thirty minutes, while an extended dream
sequence serves little purpose in hour two.  At least the movie is
watchable up to that point.  The finale-- where things get serious and
the reunited characters begin confessing to this, that, and the other--
sent me straight for the door.  Trust me, the final reel is best viewed
from underneath the Exit sign.  (Rated "PG"/95 min.)

Title
Review for Tommy Boy (1995)
     Look for some inspired casting in two of this week's new
releases.  The action/adventure/buddy-comedy/everybody-gets-shot BAD
BOYS pairs television comics Will Smith and Martin Lawrence, while the
romantic comedy DON JUAN DEMARCO teams Johnny Depp with Marlon Brando.
(Hey, look what it did for Martin Landau!) The latter also stars Faye
Dunaway.  Other new releases:  BOY'S LIFE, A GOOFY MOVIE, and SEX,
DRUGS, AND DEMOCRACY.
     The mysterious, monotonous world of a Toronto strip club is
explored in this mysterious, monotonous movie from Canadian director
Atom Egoyan (FAMILY VIEWING, THE ADJUSTER).  The layers of the story
are peeled away every-so-slowly, as the film discreetly expands upon
the relationships between a patron, a dancer, and a deejay.  The
mystery--and the promise of a payoff--is good for about an hour,
after which point the evidence begins to mount that there's really
nothing waiting at the center.
     Spring must be the time for wedding movies.  Last year it was Hugh
Grant attending FOUR WEDDINGS AND A FUNERAL.  This year it's newcomer
Toni Collette in the crowd-pleasing MURIEL'S WEDDING.  Though billed as
a comedy, this Aussie import is really a revenge fantasy.  Don't look
for any role models in these shallow, callow characters who seem better
suited to real-life than romantic comedy.
     Thank goodness, then, for Toni Collette.  With her ill-fitting
clothes and some forty-odd pounds of extra weight, she the ungainly
starlett that we've been waiting for.  Her brain may be vacant--Muriel
knows nothing more than a want to get married--but she's a joy to
watch.  Whether singing along to ABBA, or beaming at the altar, she
radiates more charm than Andie MacDowell has ever known.
     Badly edited, and played way too far over-the-top, MURIEL'S
WEDDING still delivers the laughs.  The film is overlong, though, with
thirty minutes of unnecessary drama that's almost too much for this
little film to have to bear.
     Quite the racy love story, QUEEN MARGOT is dressed-up as a 16th
Century period piece involving French Catholics, Protestants, and the
entire court of King Charles XI.  At the center is Margot (Isabelle
Adjani), the King's Catholic sister, who would like nothing more than
to forget her marriage of convenience to Henri of Navarre (Daniel
Auteuil), also a Protestant.  They were wed for peace, or so they
thought, until most of Henri's guests (1000+) are slaughtered at the
Saint Bartholomew's Day Massacre.
     This is strong stuff, and certainly not for the squeamish.  It's
also quite confusing, thanks to the subtitles and the continuous stream
of new characters.  Have no fear, as all becomes clear in due time.
After about ninety minutes, the actors take over and help transform
QUEEN MARGOT into a simple--though quite twisted--love story that just
*looks* like a big historical drama.
     The first comic-book film of the year stars Lori Petty (FREE
WILLY) as an impulsive, wise-cracking punkster who roams the wastelands
of 2033 for the seemingly sole purpose of fighting the Water and Power
Police.  The latter is led by Malcolm McDowell, who did us all a big
favor by killing Captain Kirk in STAR TREK GENERATIONS.  She also
steals a tank, hence the name, and, later, hooks up with some mutant
Kangaroos, one of whom is played by rapper Ice-T.
     TANK GIRL benefits from a hot soundtrack (supervised by Courtney
Love) and a good production design.  Of course, neither is enough to
sustain viewer interest into the second hour.  This poor film doesn't
know what it wants to be, and so the narrative veers wildly in every
direction.  Don't be surprised when the characters break into a
song-and-dance routine.  You have been warned.
Next up: BATMAN FOREVER, then JUDGE DREDD.
     The rules must go something like this:  if you're a current cast
member of "Saturday Night Live," then you get your own movie.  No
questions asked.  Now it's Chris Farley's turn.  He plays the no-brain
son of an auto parts manufacturer (Brian Dehenney), who's forced to go
on the road to save the company.  His travel companion:  David Spade,
also of SNL.
     As expected, Farley makes an easy target for Spade's sarcastic
barbs.  It's "stupid" this, and "fat" that--inoffensive routines that
fall somewhere between the material in DUMB AND DUMBER and PLANES,
TRAINS, AND AUTOMOBILES.  The physical gags aren't bad either.  The
scene of Farley trying to change clothes in an airplane restroom is
easily worth the price of admission.  With Bo Derek, Rob Lowe, Julie
Warner, and Dan Aykroyd.
Next up: STUART SAVES HIS FAMILY (with Al Franken).

Title
Review for Beavis and Butt-head Do America (1996)
    Doesn't suck, but isn't entirely cool, either.  The MTV morons go in
search of their stolen television set and end up at a flea-bag motel,
where some sleaze thinks they're a pair of hitmen (!) and offers them
ten grand to "do" his wife.  Believing that they'll finally score-- the
only action that these two see is of the, uh, self-inflicted variety--
Beavis and Butt-head accept the offer, which lands them on cross-country
chase involving international terrorists, biological weapons, and
full-body cavity searches by rubber-gloved ATF agents.  (After one of
which Butt-head admits "I think I just scored.") As expected, there's
enough concentrated juvenile humor here to keep any audience giggling,
and not just those fans of the show.  (The bits are, at times,
priceless.  While touring the Hoover Dam, Butt-head asks "Is this a God
dam?" And don't miss what they say after spotting a defecating donkey at
the Grand Canyon.)
     Unlike the television series, no music videos are played, except
for a psychedelic sequence set to White Zombie (one of many rockin'
bands on the soundtrack) and inspired by the designs of those old Rat
Fink cars.  (More amusing is a Vegas montage set to a Red Hot Chili
Peppers cover of "Love Rollercoaster.") BEAVIS AND BUTT-HEAD DO AMERICA
is only eighty minutes long, but the last twenty are tiresome.  By then,
the hilarity has largely petered out.  Uh huh huh huh huh, I said peter.
Great voice work, though.  In addition to director/co-writer/series
creator Mike Judge, who voices several characters including the Two Cool
Guys, listen for Robert Stack, Cloris Leachman, someone who sounds like
Bruce Willis, and another person who sounds an awful lot like Demi
Moore.  And, yes, I believe that's the voice of Mr. Letterman in one of
the more, uh, explosive scenes. 
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC, USA, Earth
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
I'm also on the Web!  http://www.pagesz.net/~legeros/

Title
Review for You So Crazy (1994)
     Martin Lawrence wants to be heard.  But the comedian's
black-and-blue banter only goes so far in this concert film from the
star of TV's "Martin."
     When he's raging on such social ills as racism, Lawrence lacks the
fire to be believable.  Remember how angry Richard Pryor used to get on
this stuff?  Martin's methods are also less impressive--the comedian
follows up pleas for racial harmony with racial jokes.  Does he think
he's making racial-joke jokes?
     But when Martin gets blue, he beats his betters hands down.  YOU
SO CRAZY is unrated for a reason and, as his status as persona non
grata on "Saturday Night Live" can attest, Lawrence's off-color comedy
could drain anyone's color.  The finale, which includes topics that
will go unmentioned here, is a tour de force of tastelessness that
should be delved with discretion.
BOTTOM LINE:  Is he funny?  Some of the time.

Title
Review for Dead Man Walking (1995)
(Gramercy)
Directed by    Tim Robbins
Written by     Tim Robbins, from the book by Sister Helen Prejean
Cast           Susan Sarandon, Sean Penn, Robert Prosky, Raymond J. Barry
MPAA Rating    "R" (presumably for language, violence, and rape)
Running Time   122 minutes
Reviewed at    Movies at Mt. Pleasant, Mt. Pleasant, SC (3FEB96)
     The set-up is deceptively simple in this much-acclaimed Southern
drama from writer/director Tim Robbins (BOB ROBERTS).  Susan Sarandon
plays a nun on a last-minute mission to save the soul of Sean Penn's
convicted murderer on death row.  It's a straight-forward set-up that
firmly holds our attention through the various preachy, predictable, and
downright tedious turns taken by the story.  The subtext is capital
punishment and Robbins-- adapting from Sister Helen Prejean's best
seller-- lays it on a bit thick.  To the director's credit, his
in-your-face exploration of the issue is (reasonably) balanced on both
sides of the argument.  He also keeps the theatrics to a considerable
minimum.  (The Christ allusions at the end do get a bit tiresome,
though.) Both Penn and Sarandon do impossibly good work here and will be
likely contenders at Oscar time.  Also worth noting is supporting actor
Robert Prosky, usually just another familiar face and who, for a change,
actually finds some flavor.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
MOVIE HELL is on the Web!  http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Barb Wire (1996)
     It's not every day that we get to see a reworking of CASABLANCA,
much less one that (a.) is adapted from a comic book and (b.) stars
Pamela Anderson Lee.  Ms. Lee, a.k.a. "the Baywatch babe," a.k.a.
"you're looking rather buoyant this evening," plays the title character,
a bounty-hunting bar owner who lives in a (near) future where civil war
is being waged between the Nazi-looking Congressionals and the
underground Resistance.  They all come to Barb's place, though, because
she doesn't take sides.  That is, until a former lover-- and Resistance
alley-- steps out of the past and into her bar.  Sound familiar?
     There's more, of course, including a fat man who rides in a bucket
loader, a pair of contact lenses that fool retina scans, and, oh yeah, a
rocket-firing motorcycle.  (Trust me: it sounds more exciting than it
is.) BARB WIRE has a great "look," but director David Hogan doesn't
deliver a decent action sequence until the end.  And don't expect any
Bogarts or Bergmans, either; most of the cast appears to have been hired
for "assets" other than their acting abilities.  (Calm down guys, this
stuff doesn't even qualify as *soft*-core porn.  Just cleavage cleavage
cleavage and only the *occasional* peek behind curtains number one and
two.) No, there isn't much to this movie beyond the, uh, obvious, but if
you love CASABLANCA, and you can stomach Pamela Lee's hissed-through-
clinched-teeth line readings, then this may be the matinee for you.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Shadowlands (1993)
     Richard Attenborough had a good year in '93.  He breezed his way
through JURASSIC PARK with a warm performance as the didn't-mean-to-
be-evil scientist.  And, in December, he served up his own movie magic
with SHADOWLANDS, the touching, true-life story of how author
C. S. Lewis discovered love very late in his life.
     The story opens in 1952 at Oxford University.  Lewis is already a
world-renowned children's author, much to the bemusement of his friends
and fellow faculty members.  They chide "Jack," as he's called, because
they know all too well of his controlled, insulated world --a world
with no seeming accommodation for children or child-like behavior.
     Into that world steps Joy Gresham, an American poet who has been
corresponding with Lewis.  Her letters hint of a special awareness into
his character.  And when she travels to England with her son, Joy
discovers a common bond with her favorite author--a bond that is
tested by friendship, love, and illness....
SHADOWLANDS is a delightfully unobtrusive film.
     Director Attenborough lets his actors act with an uncommon
sparsity of intrusive technique.  Given the very melodramatic nature of
the story, the film's plain-vanilla wrapper is almost staggering. And
yet, with hardly any overt manipulation from the filmmaker, the story
still makes quite an impact.
     (If nothing else, see it for the background music that stays in
the background! :-)
     Structurally, SHADOWLANDS weakens somewhere in the last third.
     The story wanders off-course for a bit as the characters grapple
with a host of "heavier" themes.  The saturating solemnity--coupled
with an already strained running time--results in a story that seems
to lose steam before galloping onward to its fine finish.
     Despite the weakened final act, SHADOWLANDS is still a very
rewarding experience.  Credit the combined efforts of a talented cast
and an excellent writer.
     Playing his second repressed-but-I-like-it character since THE
REMAINS OF THE DAY, Hopkins glides through with his role with magical
ease.  His part is much more expressive, though no more interesting,
than his last role of Stevens the Butler.  He'll be a front-runner for
Best Actor.
     Winger pulls off an equally fine performance--her first in quite
some time.  She walks and talks American, but her eyes flash with
unexpected intelligence.  She's the perfect foil for the stately actor.
     The supporting players are tremendous.  Standouts include John
Wood, Peter Firth, and Edward Hardwicke as "Jack's" droll brother
Warnie.
     Writer William Nicholson helps the actors along with line after
line of quotable dialogue.  Though his script is heavy on the meanings
of life, love, and loss, humor wins the day for most of the movie.  Some
of the better bits include Winger's first appearance in a British tea
room, a hilarious roundtable discussion on Christmas, and a classic bit
of Hopkins ordering room service.

Title
Review for Dead Man (1995)
     Not to be confused with DEAD MAN WALKING, this tedious, episodic
anti-western stars a bespectacled Johnny Depp as William Blake, a timid
accountant from Cleveland whose first day in the muddy frontier town of
Machine is a busy one.  In order, he loses a job that he didn't have,
has a gun pointed at him by the plant owner (Robert Mitchum), beds a
friendly flower girl (Mili Avital), kills her ex-boyfriend (Gabriel
Byrne), rides off into the woods wounded, and is mistaken as the famous
dead poet by the frank-speaking, world-traveled Indian (Gary Farmer) who
rescues him.  There's also trio of bickering bounty hunters (Lance
Henriksen, Michael Wincott, and Eugene Byrd) on the trail, as the dead
man courting was also the plant owner's son.
     Long on interesting characters, but short on interesting action,
DEAD MAN is engaging for, oh, about an hour.  Robby Muller's crisp
black-and-white photography adds a welcome layer of grit to several
sights not normally seen in a western.  As Depp mucks his way down Main
Street, for example, we see a prostitute performing a sex act here and a
horse urinating over there.  The realism is refreshing and goes a long
way toward balancing the more-absurd moments, like Robert Mitchum
speaking to a stuffed bear, Iggy Pop appearing in drag, and Lance
Henriksen feasting on human flesh.  (Need a hand?  No thanks, got one!)
And how about that wild, weird guitar-only score by Neil Young?  Written
and directed by Jim Jarmusch (NIGHT ON EARTH). 
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Renaissance Man (1994)
     This is the Army?  Clean-talking, soft-spoken drill sergeants?
Cadence calling to the tune of "Tiny Bubbles?"  Has Disney transformed
our nation's fighting force into a pack of PC professionals?
     Or, in the case of RENAISSANCE MAN, not-so-professionals.
     The eight recruits assigned to ad-man-turned-teacher Bill Rago
(Devito) are bottom-of-the-barrel at best.  They can't even think on
their feet and won't complete basic training without some much-needed
brain food.  In comes Rago, a civilian instructor who discovers in his
students a hankering for "Hamlet."
     Think DEAD POETS SOCIETY-in-fatigues.  Director Penny Marshall--
who specializes in these squishy, celluloid hugs--serves up sterile
soldiers in a super-safe story with a happy happy ending for everyone.
Suspense?  At ease.  Even DeVito gets a late-entry love-interest in
this one.  Puh-lease.
     Sugar content notwithstanding, RENAISSANCE MAN *is* watchable.
The humor is good and anyone with a military background can savor such
succulent bits as DeVito getting directions from a base guard.  Of
course, *any* Army-as-a-way-of-life film is amusing when poking fun at
the retentive rigidity of military command.
     The film's characterizations are comfortably callow.  Writer Jim
Burnstein never fleshes out the role of Bill Rago.  Nor is the
diminutive director the best person for the part. (He never comes as
alive as the role requires.) But DeVito's a lovable lout and he carries
the film.
     Rago's roster of students include TV actor Kadeem Hardison and
rapper Marky Mark.  They and the other recruits are all engaging,
despite their cliched characterizations.  Other strong supporters
include Gregory Hines, James Remar, and, for two scenes, Cliff
Robertson.
     Running right at two-hours-plus-change, RENAISSANCE MAN is a
long-sit.  There are *some* rewards, such as the curious sight of
DeVito rappelling from a training tower.  The comedy is okay, but the
feel-good drama doesn't wash with the subject matter.  Come on, these
are guys who are training to kill each other!
     Then again, how can you trash a film that tries to bring "Hamlet"
to the masses?  To gripe or not to gripe, that is the question.

Title
Review for Mimic (1997)
     Yet another sucky sci-fi spook-fest, this one stars Mira Sorvino,
bless her heart, as a Big Apple entomologist who creates a hybrid insect
to combat a cockroach-borne epidemic-in-the-making.  Her supposedly
sterile solution works wonders until, three years later, the bugs
return, having mutated into human-sized, human-mimicking monsters.  For
the first hour, while we wait for a good glimpse of the creatures, the
various characters (Sorvino's, her character's husband, her character's
husband's partner, a couple of kids, a shoe shine man, the shoe shine
man's autistic son, and a feisty transit worker) poke around the city's
subway tunnels, unafraid of any dark, damp, obviously creature-infested
corners.  (Don't these people watch horror movies?) When the bugs
finally *do* appear, believability gets zapped-- rewiring decades-old
subway circuitry on the fly?-- but we finally get some action and a
little blood and an adorably grimy Sorvino, whose deadpan reaction to
the appearance of a particular creature may be the single best howler of
the summer:  "Ohmigod, it's the male."  Stylishly directed by Guillermo
Del Toro (CRONOS).

Title
Review for Fear (1996)
     This howler of a thriller stars the Artist Formerly Known as Marky
Mark as a young psycho who seduces and later terrorizes a 16-year-old
high-schooler (Reese Witherspoon).  She's a nice girl from a nice family
who learns too much too late about her seemingly sane boyfriend.  Good
afternoon, Mrs. Cleaver.  With better casting, director James Foley
(GLENGARRY GLEN ROSS) might've had something here.  He picked a good
pair for the parents-- Amy Brenneman (HEAT) and the always reliable
William Petersen-- and that's about as far as he got.  Ms. Witherspoon
has no screen presence to speak of, while Underwear Boy is a hollow
creeper, at best.  (And he looks a good ten-years older than his
character!  Oh, how we could've ended things early if Dad had just
spoken up and said "for Christsake, Nicole, he looks like he's thirty!")
Completing the terrible triumvirate is Alyssa Milano, wildly overacting
as Nichole's slut girlfriend (a.k.a. the Bad Influence).  Yes, they're
unwatchable, but the story is so mercifully straight-forward that you
may find yourself getting caught up in the camp.  A surprisingly
engaging ending also keeps the film from collapsing on itself.  If
there's a single redeeming feature to speak of, it's that the story is a
virtual primer for teenage girls on how to identify a predator.  Of
course, they *could* just listen to their dads... 
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Mars Attacks! (1996)
     Tim Burton's new movie is strangely sedate, which is a polite way
of saying that it's boring even though it's not supposed to be.  His
elaborate (but never engaging) sci-fi/monster/disaster-movie spoof,
adapted from the vintage (and violent) trading card set, has two things
going for it:  fabulous art direction and the director's gleefully
grotesque sense of humor.  The latter, with its many playful sequences
of torture and gore, is almost certain to be lost on the masses.
Audiences may have cheered INDEPENDENCE DAY, but scenes of burning
cattle and other crispy critters are sure to send them in the direction
of other holiday movies.  Obviously Mr. B.  doesn't care.  He appears
willing to do almost anything for a sick laugh, including killing off
most of his cast.  Almost two-dozen stars appear in this one, from Jack
Nicholson (in two roles) to Sara Jessica Parker to Jim Brown.  Most of
their characters are so boring, though, that you won't even mind when
they're turned into toast.  Ack ack ack ack! 
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC, USA, Earth
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
I'm also on the Web!  http://www.pagesz.net/~legeros/

Title
Review for Bean (1997)
    BEAN is bad, maybe unwatchable, as Rowan Atkinson's beloved Brit is
shoehorned into a pedestrian, poorly executed plot involving a famous
painting, a Los Angeles art gallery, and a classic case of mistaken
identity.  (You Know Who is believed to be... an art expert.)  The "Bean
bits"-- tampering with an amusement ride, pretending to have a firearm
in an airport, drying the front of his trousers with a restroom blow-
dryer, etc.-- arrive at infrequent intervals and too often consist en-
tirely of reaction shots.  Instead of just pointing the camera at Bean
and letting him do his thing, the filmmakers shift the focus to the
supporting stars and, by in large, that's a mistake.  (Okay, it *is*
pretty funny when Peter MacNicol's art curator goes nuts, after Mr. Bean
has his way with Whistler's Mother.) Worse is how Bean's scenes always
seem rushed.  He never gets to do more than three minutes of anything,
if that.  Even his most-elaborate routine-- a nighttime, commando-style
raid on the museum-- flies by at about four times the pace that it
should.  With Harris Yulin, Pamela Reed, and in a late and largely use-
less cameo, Burt Reynolds.

Title
Review for Arabian Knight (1995)
     Striking artwork is the reason to see ARABIAN KNIGHT, the
elaborate animated feature from director Richard Williams (WHO FRAMED
ROGER RABBIT).  Though appearing in the guise of a cheap ALADDIN
clone--and not helped by a lousy late-summer release date--ARABIAN
KNIGHT was actually started *way* before Walt's heirs ever hired a guy
names Williams to do voice-overs.  Now, decades later, the finished
product makes for an eye-popping bauble of modest value.  The story
could be stronger--and there's only one good song--but the visuals
have a wit all their own.
     Writer/director Edward Burns also stars in this raunchy compendium
of male commitment fears, as seen through the lives of three
Irish-American brothers.  Burns plays Barry, the middle one, and the
least Catholic of the three.  They live under the same roof on Long
Island, thanks to the oldest, Jack, who's married and has an attic room
to spare.  Though, uh, "technically challenged"--the handmade film is
blown up from 16mm--the acting is relaxed, and the dialogue is
natural.  Very natural.  The plot is harder to take.  I don't buy any
of the story situations that are presented here.
     Writer/director Tom DiCillo's behind-the-scenes comedy-of-errors
is good for a few laughs, especially whenever James LeGros (no
relation) is on screen.  He plays a preening, blonde up-and-comer who
bears no small resemblance to Brad Pitt (who starred in DiCillo's 1992
film "Johnny Suede").  The rest of the appealing cast includes Steve
Buscemi, Catherine Keener, and Dermon Mulroney.  They do well in this
extended inside-joke that's perpetually undermined by a shaggy-dog
story structure.
     Hip-hop gets an honest rap in this intriguing documentary from
director Brian Robbins.  No judgments are passed on the popular music
form, as Robbins examines the genre from *both* sides of the fence, or
prison fence, if you will.  THE SHOW opens with a visit to Ryker's
Island prison, to meet convicted rapper Slick Rick.  The short film
feels longer, thanks to an overabundance of mush-mouthed jive from the
rap stars themselves.  A better balance would include footage related
to the "experiences" that all the musicians claim are reflected in
their works.
     Fashion-photograph-turned-documentary-directory Douglas Keeve does
in 76 minutes what Robert Altman (READY TO WEAR) couldn't do in 132.
This hip, enjoyable Sundance Film Festival award-winner presents a year
in the life of New York fashion designer Isaac Mizrahi.  From concept
to presentation, with all the fears, fervor, and free-associating in
between.  Mizrahi narrates with a playful perspective of how pop
culture fuels his inspiration.  He even sings the "Mary Tyler Moore"
theme.

Title
Review for Event Horizon (1997)
A movie review by Michael J. Legeros
Copyright 1997 by Michael J. Legeros
     The title refers to the name of a derelict spaceship that is dis-
covered in 2047, some years after it disappeared on its maiden voyage.
Laurence Fishburne, Kathleen Quinlan, Richard T. Jones, Joely Richard-
son, Jack Noseworthy, Jason Isaacs, Sean Pertwee, and Sam Neill play the
search and rescue team that investigates the vessel, and to whom bad
things begin to happen.  Without revealing too many plot particulars,
think of EVENT HORIZON as a big boo-house with some splatter movie
tendencies.  (ALIEN meets HELLRAISER, if you will.) Jolts a-plenty
(strobes, sound effects, dream sequences, etc.) plus buckets of blood,
ranging from clawed-out eyes to the gleefully grisly sight of a fully
disemboweled human body.  (You'll laugh, you'll heave.) The art
direction and special effects are breathtaking and certainly a world
more impressive than anything having to do with plot, dialogue, or
character.  (You *do* get to see the ship's navigator, the lovely Ms.
Richardson, emerge from a "gravity immersion tank" wearing nothing but
shorts and a jogging bra.  Does that count as character development?)
Directed by Paul Anderson (MORTAL KOMBAT), who pulls one or two memor-
able sequences out of his butt:  a hull breach, the restoration of
gravity in zero-G, and a very cool example of how to rescue someone who
isn't wearing a space suit when the airlock opens.  Magnetic boots on.

Title
Review for War, The (1994)
Directed by     Jon Avnet (FRIED GREEN TOMATOES)
Written by      Kathy McWorter
Cast            Elijah Wood, Kevin Costner, Mare Winningham, and Lexi Randall
MPAA Rating     PG-13
Running Time    Approx. 120 minutes
     Kevin Costner takes a surprise second billing in THE WAR, a
heavy-handed "message movie" about a father trying to teach his son
about the consequences of violent action.  Though not quite as cloying
as a rabid romance, this lead-footed film is still way too literal to
be taken seriously.
     The year is 1970, and Stu and Lidia Simmons (Wood and Randall)
have just welcomed their dad Stephen (Costner) home from the war.  He's
wearing scars both inside and out, and he can't hold a job to save his
life, but they still love him.  They even stand by him when he acts
nice to the Lipnickis--a pack of neighborhood children who don't like
either of the Simmons kids.  Said dislike leads to a turf war, which
leads to fighting, which leads to [insert eye-rolling] a valuable
lesson on tolerance and understanding.
     There's a pretty good story here, but you'd never know it by the
way director Jon Avent literalizes every Important Idea in sight.  Take
the first flashback, where Stephen tries to tell his son about what
happened in Vietnam.  Instead of letting Costner chew on a meaty
monologue--a la, say, Robert Shaw in JAWS--Avent cuts to an exploding
jungle with bullets and bodies and all those things that have no place
in a dialogue-driven drama.
     And Avent does this over and over and over again, straight through
the ending where the "big message" is symbolized by a battle over a
treehouse (don't ask).  Granted the whole thing is kinda cute--think
APOCALYPSE NOW meets HOME ALONE meets LORD OF THE FLIES--but what's
left over (in silly speeches) is pretty pathetic.

Title
Review for Devil's Advocate, The (1997)
     Apart from the enormously entertaining finale, THE DEVIL'S ADVOCATE
is one Hell of a long sit.  Keanu "Now you know why I avoid ocean lin-
ers" Reeves plays a hotshot Florida attorney with an unbroken winning
streak and one small problem to go along with it:  he's increasing
sickened by the scum that he's chosen to defend.  Before he can reflect
on the matter-- or at least give a call to Dr.  Laura-- he's offered a
dream job in New York City, at a high-powered law firm, where he and his
doting wife (Charlize Theron) are given personal attention by the found-
er, John "Paradise Lost" Milton (Al Pacino), a cackling, charismatic
character who keeps a fire burning in every room, prefers to travel
underground, and seems willing to grant their each and every imaginable
desire.  Hmmmm, could this be... Satan?
     If you didn't catch the tell-all trailer, director Taylor Hackford
(DOLORES CLAIBORNE) flashes the secret sign at least a double-dozen
times.  All the usual tricks are trotted out-- quoted scripture,
religious imagery, exaggerated sound effects, and, even, a handful of
mighty morphin' power demons.  (The latter are first imagined/ actually
seen by the wife, whose sanity starts to go the moment that she sets
foot into their enormous Park Avenue apartment.) The director doesn't
sustain that sinister sense of dread, though, and that's one of the
fundamental problems right there.  The other is an imbalance in plot:
we get too much of Reeve's character and not enough of the wife.  She
descends into madness much too quickly, while it takes forever and a day
for him to come back to the moral crisis that got him into trouble in
the first place.  (Of course, it doesn't help that Reeves is entirely
wrong for the role.  He doesn't have the swagger that the role requires.
Hell, he isn't even fully awake in every scene.)
     Damned by a flabby midsection and a stiff leading man, THE DEVIL'S
ADVOCATE is saved by a strong supporting cast (Heather Matarazzo, Craig
T. Nelson, Don King, etc.), sumptuous set design (by Bruno Rubeo), and
Pacino's command performance as ol' Scratch.  Al plays it cool for most
of the movie-- a leer here, a flickered tongue there.  For the grand
finale, though, he throws the door wide open.  You can almost hear the
director yelling "more!  more!" as Pacino abandons any remaining notion
of restraint, tearing into a priceless monologue that allows us to
finally hear what the Big L. has to say on the subjects of God ("he's a
sadist"), love ("biochemically, it's no different than eating large
quantities of chocolate"), and man ("guilt is like a bag of fucking
bricks.  All you gotta do is set it down").  Even Reeve's mush-mouthed,
come-and-go Southern accent can't ruin the moment.  I haven't been this
grandly entertained in months.

Title
Review for Iron Will (1994)
Directed by Charles Haid (the TV actor from "Hill Street Blues")
Written by John Michael Hayes and Djordje Milicevia and Jeff Archer
Starring Mackenzie Astin, Kevin Spacey, August Schellenberg, and David
Odgen Stiers.
MPAA Rating: "PG"
Running Time: Approx. 100 minutes
     Corn doesn't come any fresher than Disney's IRON WILL, an
old-fashioned crowd-pleaser about a boy and his dogs and a 522-mile
winter race.  Perfect for kids and not-bad for adults, IRON WILL is a
pleasing, hokey alternative to the dreck that passes as current "family
fare."
     Inspired by a true story, Mackenzie Astin plays "Iron" Will
Stoneman, a spirited South Dakota lad who signs up for a marathon
dog-sled race in 1917.  The first to reach St. Paul, Minnesota from
Winnipeg, Canada, wins $10,000--a sum that will go far to help the
strapped Stonemans.  They're in straits since Dad died during--what
else?--a dog-sled drive.
     So, filled with both grim determination and his mother's fruitcake
(don't ask), Will rides for his father, his family, and his (college)
future....
     IRON WILL is, simply, the kind of movie they don't make anymore.
     The story is simple and straight-forward: it's about a race.  And
when the race ends, the film ends--a rather jarring effect in this era
of padded running-times.  Other than the drama, nothing else in IRON
WILL is inflated.  It's all scene after scene of Will racing onward to
face increasingly difficult odds.
     (Oddly, one the film's weakest moments occurs when the filmmaker's
take something OUT.  The sole incongruity is a 90's-style training
montage that makes no narrative sense other than to condense a few
extra minutes of screen time.)
     Corny as it comes, there's alot to like about IRON WILL.  The cast
goes down easy AND manages to keep a straight-face when delivering
drippy dialogue like "Don't let your fears stand in the way of your
dreams, son." The action is great, the dogs look good, and, in the wake
of recent wicked weather, the locales looks especially uninviting.
     And the audacity that the director exhibits in manipulating his
audience is almost worth the price of admission.  From the early death
of Will's dad to a championship cloying finale, Haid pulls every string
he can lay his hands on.  It's hilarious.
     IRON WILL is also good will.  For audiences who are weary from
endless product tie-ins and strong social commentary, the film's
near-lack of cynicism is a welcome relief.

Title
Review for Men in Black (1997)
A movie review by Michael J. Legeros
Copyright 1997 by Michael J. Legeros
     The de facto best of the June and early-July action comedies, MEN
IN BLACK has everything that you could want in yet another $100M adap-
tation of a comic-book:  a wise-cracking lead (Will Smith), his crusty
partner (Tommy Lee Jones, all deadpan), a bugged-out villain (Vincent
D'Onofrio, with a hefty assist from make-up artist Rick Baker), a pop-
reference friendly premise (GHOSTBUSTERS meets "The X-Files" meets
"Dragnet" meets THE BLUES BROTHERS), cool sets and cooler gadgets (prod-
uction design by Bo Welch), good music (by Danny Elfman), great loca-
tions (in and around New York City), and a director (Barry Sonnenfield,
of GET SHORTY and ADDAMS FAMILY fame) who happens to have the most
macabre sense of humor this side of Tim Burton.  And all of it rendered
in such a disarmingly unpretentious and almost... throwaway fashion,
that you can't *help* but like it.  By the second hour, however, the
seams begin to show.  There's not nearly enough plot or character de-
velopment to offset the sight gags or special effects, both of which are
*also* in short supply.  MEN IN BLACK holds back on everything and the
result is a cycle as vicious as Mike Tyson's appetite for flesh.  There
isn't enough story to keep the characters interesting when the gags go
flat, nor are there enough gags to keep the characters interesting when
the *story* goes flat.  Maybe the sequel will be a bit better.

Title
Review for Nixon (1995)
(Hollywood)
Directed by    Oliver Stone
Written by     Clayton Townsend, Andrew G. Vanja, and Oliver Stone
Cast           Anthony Hopkins, James Woods, Paul Sorvino, Joan Allen,
               Powers Boothe, Ed Harris, Bob Hoskins, J.T. Walsh, E.G.
               Marshall, David Paymer, David Hyde Pierce
MPAA Rating    "R" (presumably for language)
Running Time   190 minutes
Reviewed at    Six Forks Station Cinemas (ugh), Raleigh, NC (5JAN96)
     The success of this long, laborious drama hinges on one thing:  
how well we believe Anthony Hopkins as President Richard Milhous 
Nixon.  As it turns out, the Welsh actor is a mixed blessing for the 
film.  Hopkins *interprets* Nixon, instead of impersonating him, and 
it's a performance that's both fascinating and distracting to watch.  
He captures the fiery gloom of a man who is (presented here as) 
obsessed with death, dying, and loss.  Physically, though, he's all 
wrong for the role.  His accent waivers and his round face and 
stature too easily blends in with the other actors.  And Nixon is 
not a man who should blend in.  
     Hopkin's half-success could've worked in a film with a strong-
er momentum.  NIXON drags, due in no small part to director Oliver 
Stone (NATURAL BORN KILLERS).  His constant cutting between film 
stocks and time periods dilutes more than it enhances.  Even his 
trademark blending of fact and fiction-- such as a gonzo scene 
supposing a link between Nixon, a herd of Texas fat cats (led by 
Larry Hagman, no less!), and the JFK assassination-- is less 
distracting than his presumption that the audience is already 
familiar with these events.  NIXON is not a story that should be 
confusing.
     That said, there are pleasures to be had.  Hopkins is great in, 
oh, about half of his scenes.  And he gets to play off an array of 
incredible actors, including Joan Allen, James Woods, J.T. Walsh, 
Powers Boothe, and Paul Sorvino, whose Henry Kissinger looks a 
little too much like Dr. Strangelove to be completely comfortable 
with.  Mein Fuhrer!  Certainly more substantive than the bulk of 
last year's crop-- and a great antidote to the apple-pie patriotism 
of APOLLO 13-- NIXON still lacks the clarity and coherence of a 
great film.  Stone has envisioned Richard Nixon as a tragic figure 
of Shakespearean proportions.  Unfortunately, neither the film, nor 
the central casting, can realize that vision. (Rated "R"/195 min.)
--
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit the MOVIE HELL site http://www-nvision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Dragonheart (1996)
      An 18-foot-high, 43-foot-long dragon is the computer-generated co-
star of this strictly-by-the-numbers sword 'n' sorcery flick.  As voiced
by Sean Connery, "Draco" is a surprisingly expressive creation who is
well-deserving of his 23 minutes of screen time.  He walks, talks,
flies, fries, and even fakes his own death, all with the help of 96
computer-aided animators.  Too bad that ILM (Industrial Light and Magic)
couldn't spare some special effects for DRAGONHEART's *human* co-stars.
A bearded black hole exists where Dennis Quaid should be.  He's a
near-total loss as he growls glumly through his role of a disillusioned
knight.  David Thewlis' evil king has a high Hiss Factor (HF), though
he's more of a mumbling oddity than anything else.  Oh, and there's some
redhead in a '90's wig, who runs around either screaming or scowling,
depending upon if the particular scene has her playing the Woman in
Peril or the Put Upon Peasant.
     The fringe flourishes include Pete Postlethwaite as a wandering
monk with literary ambitions, Julie Christie (!) as the good Queen
Mother, a band of mercenaries that appear dressed for ye olde
heavy-metal concert, and, believe or it not, the speaking spirit of King
Arthur.  Bring out your dead!  Unfortunately, when we add it all
together (Draco + Fringe Bits - Quaid - Thewlis), the sum total amounts
to zero.  DRAGONHEART is, well, too much of too little.  Director Rob
Cohen (DRAGON: THE BRUCE LEE STORY) has made a big, expensive movie
that, while ambitiously plotted, is both murky and predictable.  And
overscored.  And self-important.  And the list goes on.  (I must ask:
did screenwriter Charles Edward Pogue intend that *every* character be
stabbed, lanced, or sliced at least once?  Keep that man away from the
knife drawer!) The last five minutes of this movie are the worst, with
some silly celestial nonsense that would be laughed out of any
planetarium light show, much less a summer movie.  Save your money.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Blue in the Face (1995)
     Why are the trailers giving away so much plot, these days?  I've
seen *far* more of NICK OF TIME, FATHER OF THE BRIDE II, and MR.
HOLLAND'S OPUS that I ever necessarily needed to.  The ads for OTHELLO
look good, though, and wisely avoid overdoing the dialogue.  (Here's a
thought: how about Demi as Desdemona?  Moor versus Moore?  Iago-a-
go-go?  Imagine the ending to *that* one!)  The new Woody Allen, MIGHTY
APHRODITE, is in limited release and doesn't open in our area until
November 10th.  Grrr.  The same weekend as ACE VENTURA 2.  The other
big dates:  November 17th, for AMERICAN PRESIDENT and GOLDENEYE, and
November 22nd, for FOUR ROOMS, CASINO, TOY STORY, and, maybe, MONEY
TRAIN, NICK OF TIME, and WAITING TO EXHALE.  Phew.
     I walked out of SMOKE; I stayed for BLUE IN THE FACE.  Paul Auster
and Wayne Wang's improvised, quasi-sequel to SMOKE is a mildly
diverting, occasionally hilarious love-letter to the borough with an
attitude.  Short sketches, star testimonials, and man-on-the-street
interviews make for an amusing, if slight, exploration of all things
that are Brooklyn.  So, in addition to cameos by Madonna, Lou Reed, Jim
Jarmusch, Lily Tomlin, Mira Sorvino, and Michael J. Fox, expect plenty
of talk about the Dodgers, Belgian waffles, and plastic bags in the
trees.
     Three movies in one.  A coming-of-age tale set in the South Bronx,
a tour of duty in Vietnam, and an armored car heist.  The last is the
one that they show in all the ads, and the least successful segment in
this well-intentioned period drama from Albert and Allen Hughes (MENACE
II SOCIETY).  Good humor and honest performances in the first segment
lead into a stunning war sequence that's not for the faint- hearted.
(Severed heads and strewn intestines, anyone?)  The Big Heist, at the
end, is where the narrative becomes choppy.  Huge chunks of the story
seem to be missing, perhaps to trim an already- healthy running time?
By the end, nothing makes sense.  If there's an overt social statement
lurking about, it's buried under a mound of other, unresolved issues.
     The polite chemistry between Edward Fox and Vanessa Redgrave is
the reason to watch this frothy, light comedy about a pair of Britons
vacationing at a lakeside resort in Italy.   The veteran actors are a
joy to behold, despite director John Irvin's incessant close-ups and a
story that sags toward the end.  Uma Thurman co-stars as an American
nanny whose disposable flirting with Fox gets taken far more seriously
than it should be.  She's also a bit of a sore thumb, here, in
comparison to the more-distinguished acting styles of the others.
>From the novella by H. E. Bates.
     Eddie Murphy sucks.  Authentic horror director Wes Craven
(NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET) tries in vain (vein?) to strike a balance
between the jugular and the funny bone.  He fails at almost every
cross.  Eddie sleepwalks through his undead performance as a Caribbean
Count, scouting the borough for his half-vampire mate (Angela Bassett,
who has seen stranger days).  The laughs are few, the set design is
lousy, and there isn't one single campy cameo to speak of.  Even John
Landis did better with his half-baked INNOCENT BLOOD.

Title
Review for Beautiful Girls (1996)
     The tag line on the poster read "the best date movie of the '90's"
and, so, I was expecting YACF (Yet Another Chick Flick) for my Sunday
matinee.  Imagine my surprise, then, upon discovering that BEAUTIFUL
GIRLS is actually a *guys* movie.  (Yet Another Dick Flick?) Beauty, and
the male illusion thereof, is the subject of this often-funny ensemble
comedy from director Ted Demme (THE REF).  Matt Dillon, Michael
Rapaport, and Max Perlich are the sad sack snowplow operators of
Knight's Ridge, "MA", who wax poetic on the subjects of marriage ("the
Big Fade"), models ("bottled dreams"), and the brotherhood of men
("never let them see the little man behind the curtain").  The Fourth
Musketeer is Willie (Timothy Hutton), an old school chum who has return-
ed on the eve of their 10-year reunion, to ponder the future of a girl-
friend Back Home.
     Balancing the boys club is an appealing cast of ladies/victims,
which includes Annabeth Gish, Martha Plimpton, and Mira Sorvino.  Rosie
O'Donnell is also on hand, as a Greek Chorus of wisdom who delivers a
side-splitting monologue on the grim realities of "real women." But,
alas, even the luminous Uma Thurman-- as somebody's cousin-- can't
compete with the charms of 14-year-old Natalie Portman (HEAT, THE
PROFESSIONAL).  She's a scene-stealer as the too-smart, too-young
neighbor that Hutton inevitably develops a crush on.  [ And thank
goodness it's platonic!  I'd hate to break any laws by describing
anything otherwise!  ]
     I'm not sure how women will react to this movie.  As an ensemble
comedy, it's okay; the momentum comes and goes, as do the laughs.  The
big cast is underused, but they have their moments, such as an amusing
barroom rendition of "Sweet Caroline" with Hutton and Perlich at the
piano.  Most viewers will react favorably, though, to the faux happy
endings-- there seem to be about four of them-- which give the appear-
ance of resolution and are the likely reasons why somebody labeled this
a "date movie." Don't you be fooled-- the endings are just as phony as
what we saw in WAITING TO EXHALE.
     Writer Scott Rosenberg makes a critical error by letting too many
of the male characters *exhibit* the very behaviors that they (and the
film) are attempting to reflect upon.  Pining for a high-school
sweetheart is one thing; committing adultery is another.  Getting away
from your girlfriend to think things over is fine; getting away to get
drunk or get laid is something else entirely.  So, guys, go see
BEAUTIFUL GIRLS.  Take a date, laugh in recognition, and continue to
think that real people actually get *rewarded* for such behaviors.  The
rest of us will be working very hard toward living happily ever after,
in the meantime. 
--
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
MOVIE HELL is on the Web!  http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Die Hard: With a Vengeance (1995)
     Time has worked in favor of DIE HARD WITH A VENGEANCE, the first gas- 
guzzling action sequel of the summer.  We've had over five years to 
forget the formulas of both DIE HARD (1988) and DIE HARDER (1990), so we 
don't really notice that the new film isn't set at Christmastime, and 
that it doesn't involve the character of McClane's wife.  We've also 
forgotten the *follies* of the first films-- such as continuity errors 
and tone problems.  (Remember the Pacific Bell telephones in DIE HARD 
2?) So, even with the original DIE HARD director John McTiernan back at 
the helm, the new DIE HARD WITH A VENGEANCE feels different-- like a 
second-cousin to the source material.  And it feels fresh, thanks to a 
strong cast, a great plot, and the best location for filming on the face 
of the earth.
     Bruce Willis is back as John McClane, the New York cop known for ending 
up in the wrong place at the wrong time.  These days he's not doing too 
well-- he's on suspension, estranged from his wife, and suffering from a 
hangover that lasts the entire film.  His salvation from self-destruct- 
ion is a Harlem repair-shop owner (Samuel L.  Jackson), who becomes 
McClane's reluctant partner in a battle of wits against a riddle-toting 
bomber (Jeremy Irons).  Jackson's character seems to be written as 
McClane's "human side," but their relationship is never adequately 
fleshed-out.  They don't bond.  The casting of aristocratic actor Jeremy 
Irons as the villain is a nice touch, though.  He has a grand old time 
hacking his way through a bad German accent, even if he isn't terribly, 
ahem, animated.
     The plot of DIE HARD WITH A VENGEANCE plays more like a caper-film than 
anything else.  The superbly staged action sequences are little more 
than bookends to a marvelously intricate heist that recalls a certain 
1964 James Bond film.  The car chases and subway explosions are a gas, 
to be sure, but what's really neat is watching the bad guys march right 
through Wall Street in an audacious daylight robbery.  (The rest of the 
plot has Willis et al tracking down chemical bombs.  Its an amusing 
division.)
     Not surprisingly, DIE HARD WITH A VENGEANCE runs low on steam at the 
end.  When the caper concludes, all that's left is for the bad guys to 
get theirs.  Unfortunately, the last two sequences, involving a ship and 
a helicopter, are rushed and they don't deliver the expected emotional 
payoff.  Instead of flash, its a fizzle.  The movie just ends.  There 
are other examples of bad editing, such as the many small plot details 
that need more explanation.  For example, just how *does* McClane manage 
to muster cross-jurisdictional support at the very end of the story?  A 
tighter film (ala SPEED) wouldn't care, but DIE HARD WITH A VENGEANCE is 
too big for that sort of nonsense. Blame the rushed production schedule.
     The most enjoyable aspect of DIE HARD WITH A VENGEANCE is, of course, 
New York City.  The villains blow up Wall Street, the heroes careen 
through Central Park, and everyone keeps asking about last night's 
lotto.  There's flourish after flourish, from spectators gawking at fire 
engines to dump-truck drivers who know obscure presidential trivia.  For 
a good ninety minutes, Bruce, Sam, and Jeremy play opposite the film's 
most colorful character, the City.  Who can say what's more exciting, 
subway trains exploding, or *New York* subway trains exploding?

Title
Review for When a Man Loves a Woman (1994)
MPAA Rating  "R" (presumably for language and, I guess, adult themes) 
     What do you do if your wife is a drunk?  That is the question posed  
by WHEN A MAN LOVES A WOMAN, a middle-of-the-road movie-of-the-week  
that's neither gritty enough nor sappy enough to be completely  
interesting. 
     Michael (Andy Garcia) and Alice Green (Meg Ryan) are the model  
yuppie couple. He's an airplane pilot and she's a guidance counselor.  
Together they live in a comfortable San Franciso home and have two  
adorable pre-teen girls (Tina Majorino and Mae Whitman) and one dedicated  
babysitter (Lauren Tom). But something's amiss in Wonderland as Alice is  
imbibing increasing amounts of alcohol.  Her hubby doesn't smell the  
signs until after an accident on a Mexican vacation. She vows change, he  
accepts change and, of course, the problem stays a problem.. 
     On the Squish Scale, WHEN A MAN LOVES A WOMAN is surprisingly  
tolerable. The standard teary tricks-- such as the obligatory musical  
montage-- are all very tasteful and the director doesn't try to pull too  
many strings at once.  That is, with two exceptions. 
     The more sensitive viewers will gasp when Alice drunkenly strikes at  
her child. (Listen to the audience!) And all able-bodied attendees should  
probably leave five minutes before the film finishes to avoid any  
accidents on tear-soaked surfaces. :) 
     WHEN A MAN LOVES A WOMAN doesn't have much of an edge, either, and  
never elaborates on the hows and whys of drug addiction.  But who cares?   
The leads are attractive and, despite a pace that leaves way too much  
room for second-guessing, deliver a reasonably believable story. 
     You can't beat Meg Ryan and Andy Garcia for star power. The  
criminally cute Ryan has a good roller-coaster role, even if her  
character isn't completely lived-in.  Garcia has the harder part to play.  
His character is *so* adorably concerned and *so* far off-base from  
knowing how to help his wife.  He's a marvel of male misunderstanding and  
helps drive home the message that recovery requires work on *both* sides  
of the equation. 
     Technical credits are all very good, with the exception of whoever  
came up with that terrible title. There is a reason that certain states  
have laws prohibiting the naming of a film after any song covered by  
Michael Bolton. :) 

Title
Review for Fantastic Four, The (1994/II)
     Sitting on a shelf, somewhere in Hollywood, is Roger Corman's
low-budget adaptation of "The Fantastic Four."  Produced last year, the
film was thrown into limbo after a certain Major Studio decided to
explore a bigger-budget version of the popular Marvel Comics comic
book.  Someday, maybe, the film will be released and that would both
delight and disappoint fans who have long known that decent adaptations
of Marvel Comics characters are few and far between.
     As any boy under sixty knows, the Fantastic Four are
super-scientist Reed Richards, his best-friend and former test-pilot
Ben Grimm, Reed's girlfriend Sue Storm, and her younger brother
Johnny.  Together, they take a ride in Reed's spaceship (don't ask)
until something goes wrong and they all get exposed to "mysterious
energies" before crashing back to Earth.
     Once on the ground, they discover they have "super powers." Reed
can stretch like, uh, Plastic Man, Sue can turn herself invisible, and
Johnny can fire fireballs.  Only Grimm gets the raw deal--he turns
into a super-strong, rocky-skinned creature affectionately known as The
Thing.
     Corman's film faithfully recounts their origin, as described
above, and even issues them costumes!  Finale has the FF battling
Dr. Doom, an armored villain threatening to destroy New York with
[insert eye-rolling] a giant laser.  Also on display is The Jeweler, a
Mole Man knockoff, whose presence has something to do with a
super-sized diamond that Reed has and Doom wants.
     With a few exceptions--such as Doom faking his own death after a
failed experiment with Reed!--the story rarely strays from the source
material.  Present and accounted-for include Alicia Masters, the Baxter
Building, and, yes, the Fantasticar.  (But where's Willie Lumpkin?)
     Credit writers Craig J. Nevius and Kevin Rock for a spartan
set-up that introduces each character without having to resort to an
overlong exposition.  They do err, though, in the origin of Doctor
Doom.  There is none.
     Director Oley Sassone (who?) keeps the superheroics to a bare
minimum.  Johnny throws a couple neat fireballs and "flames on" once.
Sue's invisibility "trick" is pretty cheesy--but she projects a
pretty-cool force field.  Reed is a bust; his "super stretching" is
used for a couple *really* long punches and that's about it.  And The
Thing gets to walk through a few walls.  Whoopee.
     With almost zero-budget for EFX, the burden of proof rests
squarely on the shoulders of the actors and, to their credit, they
perform their parts handsomely.  Only Joesph Culp is a wash--he's okay
as the pre-Doctor Doom Doom, but he doesn't have much to do after
getting encased in armor.  Bad speeches and overgesticulating do not a
character make.
     Too bad that the production design can't match the enthusiasm of
the actors.  The throne room of Castle Doom is bad, the interiors of
the Baxter Building are worse, and the inside of Reed's spaceship is
just plain awful.  Even bad sci-fi looks better than this stuff.
NOTE:   Film is neither available on video nor in the theaters.

Title
Review for Interview with the Vampire: The Vampire Chronicles (1994)
Geffen Pictures
Directed by     Neil Jordan
Written by      Anne Rice, from her novel
Cast            Tom Cruise, Brad Pitt, Antonio Banderas, Stephen Rea,
                Kirsten Dunst, Christian Slater
MPAA Rating     "R" (presumably for excessive gore and violence)
Running Time    122 minutes
Reviewed at     General Cinema, Raleigh (11NOV94)
     INTERVIEW WITH THE VAMPIRE is a triumph of tone--a masterpiece of
mood where atmosphere is everything.  Like, say, Tim Burton's BATMAN,
the sum here is more impressive than the parts.  Forget the
scavenger-hunt story and the lethargic line readings of Brad Pitt, Neil
Jordan's follow-up to THE CRYING GAME oozes with enough malice to send
even the toughest talk show host screaming.
     Anne Rice adapts her 1976 novel about a pair of 18th Century
vampires to questionable effect.  Her dialogue is rich, but cumbersome,
and the actors stumble through it better than they should.  Best of the
bunch is Kirsten Dunst, playing an Orleans orphan taken under the wing
of the vampires. She'll get a nomination.  Brad Pitt's a loss as Louis
(Vampire #1), but Tom Cruise is toothy fun as his amoral, arrogant
mentor, Lestat.  Too bad he disappears in the second hour, though.  His
replacement (the smoldering Antonio Banderas) barely registers as a
character.
     The hide-and-seek story doesn't explain all of what's happening
on-screen, suggesting that an earlier cut of the film was more coherent
than what's presented here.  Someone in the producer's chair probably
pruned this baby in the interest of streamlining.  INTERVIEW WITH THE
VAMPIRE feels rushed at 122 minutes and forces the viewer to
extrapolate the finer plot plots.  Not good.
     Condensing the story kills most of the visceral kicks, as well.
In the second hour, for example, there's no build-up to the fiery
finale; what should be a potent climax is little more than an amusing
set piece.
     Dante Ferretti's production design is a feast for the eyes; he's
just one of the many top technicians who expertly drain the life from
this story of death.  One question: who's responsible for all the
muted dialogue?  Don't be surprised if you miss half of what's said.

Title
Review for Broken Arrow (1996)
     The first Big Action Movie of the year opens, appropriately enough,
in a boxing ring.  In this corner is John Travolta, a test-pilot-gone-
bad who's stealing nukes and demanding ransom.  His challenger is
Christian Slater, his copilot and supposed friend.  Their playpen is the
Utah Canyonlands, where Travolta has ditched their B-3 Stealth bomber
and is planning Bad Things if Uncle Sam doesn't pay.  Assisting Mr.
Slater is his PUMP UP THE VOLUME costar Samantha Mathis as a feisty Park
Ranger.  Together, they chase the Comeback Kid via plane, train, boat,
moat, and Humvie, as only SPEED scribe Graham Yost could imagine.
     Behind the lens is legendary action director John Woo (HARD BOILED,
HARD TARGET), who seems a mere shadow of his usual self.  Sure, he
brings a unique rhythm to an already too-familiar formula, but his
action sequences lack the fluid finesse that Woo is world-renowned for.
No bone breaking ballet here, just the occasional over-the-top thrill.
Such as Mathis and Slater evading a crashing helicopter's tail rotor.
Or the film's final twenty minutes, set aboard a hijacked freight train.
     All told, BROKEN ARROW is entertaining enough.  The script is
lively, Travolta is a blast as a badass, and John Woo is effective
enough, even at quarter-speed.  Unfortunately, there's not much that
*anyone* can do with the more, uh, erroneous casting choices.  Christian
Slater is hardly larger-than-life, but some viewers will probably accept
him as an action hero.  Samantha Mathis, however, is just plain awful.
What's she doing here?  The inclusion of, say, Travolta's GET SHORTY
costar Delroy Lindo we can understand.  Even former NFL player Howie
Long is an acceptable addition.  But looks-all-of-twenty-years-old Frank
Whaley as a Pentagon "suit?" Maybe the casting director was thinking
John *Hughes*.
--
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
MOVIE HELL is on the Web!  http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Home Alone 3 (1997)
     Though I was prepared and, perhaps, even hoping for something far,
far, *far* worse, the year's most dreaded sequel, HOME ALONE 3, is sur-
prisingly inoffensive.  Series writer/producer John Hughes has reworked
the wish-fulfillment franchise into an agreeable (albeit juvenile) var-
iation on the Boy Who Cried Wolf.  Alex D. Linz (ONE FINE DAY) is the
new kid on the block, with a new family and a new predicament:  he's
home alone with the Pox, has unwitting possession of a military micro-
chip, and is increasingly disbelieved by both his parents and the
police, each time he reports a burglar in a different neighboring home.
So what's a kid to do, when a quartet of Euro-criminals comes a-callin'?
Why, booby-trap the house, of course.  As expected, the final reel is
yet another trademark Hughes medley of falling objects, colliding bod-
ies, crotch blows, head bumps, and, of course, the obligatory electro-
cutions.  Plural.  Some of the bits are funny, but not tear-inducing,
the way they were in the first (and second) go-around.  (Every *kid* in
the theater laughed heartily, however.  And, oh, did they love that
radio-controlled car...) The bad guys (and one girl) take their lumps
with aplomb, but it's hard not to miss the simpler charms of Daniel
Stern and Joe Pesci.  Or the brighter colors and softer music that
sugar-coated the first films.  The kid's a natural, though.  Directed by
Raja R. Gosnell, who edited both HOME ALONE and HOME ALONE 2: LOST IN
NEW YORK.

Title
Review for City Slickers II: The Legend of Curly's Gold (1994)
Directed by Paul Weiland
Written by Billy Crystal and Lowell Ganz and Babaloo Mandel
Cast Crystal, Daniel Stern, Jon Lovitz, and Jack Palance
MPAA Rating PG
Running Time Approx. 110 minutes
     Blame Francis Ford Coppola.  If his GODFATHER II hadn't been so
gosh-darned good, the American moviegoing public may have never known
the ill-effects of terminal sequelitis (JAWS 2, ARTHUR 2, ROBOCOP
2 ... shudder).  Of course, then we wouldn't get to see Jon Lovitz
recite Fredo's dialogue in CITY SLICKERS 2: THE LEGEND OF CURLY'S
GOLD.
     Lovitz replaces Bruno Kirby as obligatory third-wheel to Billy
Crystal and Daniel Stern, those cow-pokin' city folk who tamed the
not-so-wild-west in the smash 1991 original.  One year has passed (in
movie time) and Mitch (Crystal) is haunted by the fear that he may have
buried Curly (Palance) alive.  Remember Curly, the grizzled trail-boss
who knew one thing?
     Guilt gives way to gold-fever, though, when Mitch find a map to
buried treasure inside Curly's old hat.  Before you can say "Walter
Huston," the boys--Crystal, Stern, and Lovitz, as Mitch's
ne'er-do-anything brother--are saddled up and ready for another ride.
Whereupon they run into everything from rattlesnakes to Curly's twin
brother Duke. (Those are different?)
     THE TREASURE OF THE SIERRA MADRE it ain't, but, to use the best
excuse in "the business," hey, it's a sequel.
     Watching CITY SLICKERS 2 is like, er, watching CITY SLICKERS 1.
Once again, Billy Crystal bee-bops around a less-than-thrilled Jack
Palance.  Once again, a serious theme is weighing on the conscience of
the characters.  Once again, rousing music meets vibrant vistas.
SSDM.
     The trouble is that the original wasn't *that* great of a film to
begin with.  CITY SLICKERS was overlong and--surprise!--so is the
sequel.
     For about eighty minutes, CURLY'S GOLD is the sequel it should
be.  The gags are fresh, the situations are new, and Lovitz even nails
a couple zingers on the head.  But once out west, the film begins to
make the same mistakes as the original.  Mistake #1: the jokes stop
coming.  Mistake #2: the men start bonding.  The whole thing wraps with
great plot twist that's too little, too late.
     Though the handsome production values are certainly worth noting,
the cast is the selling point and, this time, they're a surprisingly
mixed bag.
     Freed of his character's middle-aged angst, Crystal is a
chatterbox of commentary.  He's not quite grating, but close.  Lovitz
doesn't have more than a handful of lines and the deficency shows.
(Heck, he was funnier in 1993 an Oscar presenter!) Neither actor acts
as goofy as Stern, the strongest and most believable of the three.
Jack Palance doesn't show until the hour mark and, of course, steals
every scene he's in.

Title
Review for Young Poisoner's Handbook, The (1995)
     I may have laughed twice in this supposed black comedy about a
suburban London lad who conducted chemistry experiments on his friends
and family in the late '60's.  Based on one of Britain's most notorious
true crime stories, Graham Young (Hugh O'Conor, who played the young
Christy Brown in MY LEFT FOOT) fatally poisoned his step-mum.  He was
sent to a mental institution, where he was supposedly rehabilitated,
until the young sociopath was caught, again, this time "preparing the
tea" for his co-workers at an optical lab.  As directed (and co-written)
by first-timer Benjamin Ross, THE YOUNG POISONER'S HANDBOOK is a
meticulous study in detail.  We watch, patiently, as Mr. Young varies
the dosage of thallium, a "heavy metal" more toxic than anything Black
Sabbath was creating at the time.  He carefully charts the progress of
his various subjects, noting when they begin exhibiting such symptoms as
vomiting or hair loss.  The whole story is rendered in a very cold and
calculated fashion that, I suppose, might be amusing to prospective
science students. 
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Midnight in the Garden of Good and Evil (1997)
(WB)
Directed by     Clint Eastwood
Written by      John Lee Hancock, based on the novel by John Berendt
Cast            John Cusack, Kevin Spacey, Jack Thompson, Lady Chablis,
                Alison Eastwood, Irma P. Hall, Paul Hipp, Jude Law
MPAA Rating     "R" (presumably for language and violence)
Running Time    154 minutes
Reviewed at     The Carmike 7, Raleigh, NC (21NOV97)
     This one gets my vote for the year's most boring movie.  Taking his
twentieth (!) turn behind the camera, Clint Eastwood directs this
ambling, aimless adaptation of John Berendt's non-fiction bestseller,
about a Manhattan writer (John Cusack) covering the trial of a wealthy
Savannah socialite (Kevin Spacey) accused of murdering his gay lover
(Jude Law).  In the process of uncovering information for what he
decides will be a book, the journalist crosses paths with several
eccentrics, including a cackling voodoo priestess (Irma P.  Hall) and
the real-life drag queen Lady Chablis (played by herself).  While the
core story is certainly compelling, MIDNIGHT has nary a whiff of
dramatic urgency during it's long, long, *long* 154-minute running time.
(Shit, even the trial sequences are tame.  Have you ever seen such
polite proceedings?) On the up side, however, the locales are lush and
the accents authentic.  Making her acting debut (and scoring her fair
share of scenes), Ms. Chablis is remarkably unremarkable.  As is Spacey,
who underplays to the point of near disinterest.  Jack Thompson is a
stronger presence as the defending lawyer, as is Clint's daughter
Alison, as a love interest to the reporter.  She's a cutie.  Cusack,
however, is a loss-- a non-presence who wears the same slack-jawed
expression is every single scene.  Heaven help the straight man.  BTW,
was our projection bulb going bad, or were more than few scenes in need
of better lighting?

Title
Review for Race the Sun (1996)
     If the idea of hearing "Rocks You Like Hurricane" played during a
racing scene doesn't gag you, then this is probably the film to see.
Halle Berry (who gets top billing!) and James Belushi star in this
dopey, feel-good family drama about a group of underprivileged Hawaiian
high-schoolers who design, build, and race a solar-powered car.  First,
in competition in Kona, and, then, as part of the 2000-mile, six-day
World Solar Challenge in Australia.
     Inspired by the true story, RACE IS SUN is amiable enough.  Adults
may fidget, but their kids won't mind the undercooked characters or the
sparse scientific detail.  (With seemingly no background, the class
builds a solar car.  Just like that!) The scenery is quite nice, and, as
honest happy endings go, any non-violent film that causes an audience of
kids to erupt into cheers is probably worth the stock it's printed on.
Now, if only someone could explain the odd resemblance, of late, between
James Belushi and Steven Seagal...
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
MOVIE HELL is on the Web!  http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Jingle All the Way (1996)
     This big-budget Christmas comedy has a coarse and very obvious wit,
which would be perfect for kids if this were a kid's movie.  I'm not
sure it is, even though the humor is as broad as the shoulders of its
star, Arnold Schwarzenegger.  The Terminator plays a daddy desperate to
find the most coveted toy in Minneapolis-- a Turbo Man doll-- on the day
before Christmas.  Sure, the wee ones will love seeing Arnie chased
through a living room by a reindeer, pummeled by purses in the Mall of
America, and all the roughhouse rowdiness between him and Sinbad, who
plays his postal-carrying rival.  But what will they make of the darker
elements, like Phil Hartman's lecherous next-door neighbor?  Or Schwarz-
enegger slugging a Conga line of Clauses in a bootleg toy factory?  Or,
my favorite, the smoldering head of a wise man that gets drop-kicked
into a crowd of carolers?  (Heh.  Who *hasn't* wanted to cause unrest
among ye merry gentlemen?) Tolerating the rest of the movie, with its
lazy plotting, frantic pacing, and a message that violence is a solution
to everything, is a greater challenge.  As is accepting the fantasy
ending, which, while extremely upbeat, veers uncomfortably into LAST
ACTION HERO territory.  Stay through the credits for the final gag.
Great soundtrack, too, with several swingin' tunes from the Brian Setzer
Orchestra.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC, USA, Earth
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
I'm also on the Web!  http://www.pagesz.net/~legeros/

Title
Review for Clifford (1994)
Directed by Paul Flaherty
Written by Jay Dee Rock and Bobby Van Hayes
Stars Martin Short, Charles Grodin, Mary Steenburgen, and Dabney Coleman
MPAA Rating     "PG"
Running Time    Approx. 90 minutes
     Martin Short as a troublesome ten-year-old.  That's it, that's
all, that's the whole, "hilarious" concept of CLIFFORD--the newest
nugget of fool's gold mined from the vaults of bankrupt Orion
Pictures.
     Actually, Short is only one-half of the Equation That Should Add
Up.  CLIFFORD costars always-annoyed Charles Grodin as Martin, the
unfortunate uncle who must care for Clifford (Short) while his parents
party in Hawaii.  Martin wants his fiance, Sarah (Steenburgen), to
believe that he likes kids, so he unknowingly welcomes the miniature
Hilter into his home....
     Needless to say, CLIFFORD must've looked *great* on paper.
     Picture Martin Short, standing small and wearing knee pants,
nagging Charles Grodin in scene after scene after scene until the
expected blow-up and resulting comeuppance.  Easy, right?
     (Actually, the title-role was written for a *child* actor.  But
I'm sure Kit Culkin would've passed on it, anyway. :-))
     A host of problems conspire against CLIFFORD.
     The script never defines Clifford's character and Short plays the
role *way* too broadly.  Unlike, say, Tom Hanks in BIG, Short plays
Clifford with too much intelligence to be comfortably cute or
completely cranky.  Frankly, it's like watching a bad SCTV or SATURDAY
NIGHT LIVE skit gone long.  Or, in this case, 75 minutes long.  The
script also sets up a host of absurd situations--from the awful
framing device to a super-stupid "Dinosaurland" climax that isn't even
a JURASSIC PARK slam because CLIFFORD was filmed *before* RAPTOR'S
LIST.
     Charles Groden has done better comedy--even opposite enormous
dogs that get named after deaf composers and, somehow, find their way
on stage during boring Academy Award ceremonies.  He gets a couple good
scenes and that's about it.  Neither Mary Steenburgen nor Dabney
Coleman are as lucky.

Title
Review for Rosewood (1997)
     Ugh.  Director John Singleton's dramatization of a little-known
piece of Florida history-- when a black town was burned to the ground by
whites in 1923-- is this month's longest sit.  The padded (and often
predictable) plot is punctuated by increasing acts of violence and
racial hatred.  No, no punches are pulled, which makes for a history
lesson as unpleasant as it is important.  The technical credits are
strong, though, and there's a well-acted cast of non-compelling char-
acters.  (But what the Hell is mush-mouthed Michael Rooker doing here?
Here's barely intelligible as the local law.) Regrettably, the drama is
further diminished by the effect that this story is likely to have on
the more-reactive members of the audience.  Folks get worked-up in the
movie, folks get worked-up in their seats, and everyone ends up talking
back to the screen.  So, when the camera passes a young woman's corpse,
and someone behind you invariably yaps "she's dead!," be prepared to
turn around and shout "gee, do you think so?"
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC, USA, Earth
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
I'm also on the Web!  http://www.pagesz.net/~legeros/

Title
Review for Picture Perfect (1997)
     The preposterous plot goes something like this:  a young lady who
works in an advertising agency (Jennifer Aniston) is told by her boss,
in so many words and with witnesses present, that she won't get any
further in the firm because she (a.) isn't married and (b.) isn't plan-
ning to have kids.  Instead of contacting a lawyer, to investigate her
options-- or a hairdresser, to get those damn bangs cut-- she perpet-
uates this story about a fiancee she doesn't have (Jay Mohr, the guy who
fires Tom Cruise in JERRY MAGUIRE), so she can get promoted *and* get
into the pants of a co-worker (Kevin Bacon, looking almost forty) who,
get this, is only interested in her if she's attached to someone *else*.
All of which, duh, leads to a romance with the faux boyfriend, who, I
guess, finds her meticulous lying to be rather endearing.  Calling Dr.
Laura!
     Okay, okay, I'll admit that Ms. Aniston has better comic chops than
I expected.  And a few scenes are justifiably LOL funny.  (And, at
times, unintentionally so.  I don't know when I laughed harder:  at the
statement that Aniston and Illeana Douglas are playing characters sup-
posedly the same age, or when the ghoulish-looking Kevin Bacon is refer-
red to as a "really beautiful man.")  Pure nonsense, but it's easy on
the brain.  And, for some of us, *exceptionally* easy on the eyes.
Director Glenn Gordon Caron (LOVE AFFAIR, CLEAN AND SOBER) parades Ms.
Aniston around in a number of low-cut dresses, including one garish
green gown that looks like a leftover from ROMY AND MICHELE'S HIGH
SCHOOL REUNION.  Guys, if your girlfriend picks this week's flick, just
sit back, relax, and enjoy that woody.

Title
Review for Adventures of Pinocchio, The (1996)
     A live-action Pinocchio made without Walt?  Jiminey Cricket!  The
first half of this Carlo Collodi adaptation is not without its charms:
the storybook look of Geppetto's village, shot on location in Prague;
nice underplaying by Martin Landau as the lonely puppet maker; Rob
Schneider and Bebe Neuwirth hamming it up as the minor villains Fox and
Cat; and the near-seamless special effects that bring a certain wooden
boy (voiced by Jonathan Taylor Thomas) to life.  While darker than the
animated version, the drama is still decidedly kid-powered, such as a
scene placing Pinocchio in peril on, gasp!, a rooftop.  The period
detail is also very nice, as is one fabulously photographed scene, at a
courthouse, where the costumes and the murals blend together.
     The movie takes a sour turn in the second half, during a hideous
production number that attempts to blend musical styles spanning a
couple of centuries.  This shrill, dissonant mess signals the beginning
of the end.  The movie never recovers from that misstep, despite such
interesting imagery as boys changing into jackasses and sea monsters
swallowing boats whole.  Pepe, the cricket-with-a- conscience, is also
on hand, albeit in computer-generated form.  He's voiced by David Doyle,
who, regrettably, makes no references to either whistling or wishing
upon a star.  And how about those tuneless tunes by Stevie Wonder and
Brian May?  Woof!  This version of PINOCCHIO may be quite the kids
movie, but the rest of us should stay put until Thanksgiving, when
Disney's 101 DALMATIONS is due.  Directed by Steve Barron.  
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Alien: Resurrection (1997)
     ALIEN: RESURRECTION is a mess.  The fourth film in the series is
easily the worst film in the series.  No, it's not a total bomb-- Ms.
Weaver is immanently watchable, the art direction is a winner, there's
more humor to go around, and director Jean-Pierre Jeunet (THE CITY OF
LOST CHILDREN, DELICATESSEN) has a great eye for the grotesque.  If
nothing else, there's certainly more goo, glop, and gore than in the
first three films combined.  (The opening scene details, in queasy
close-up, the surgical removal of you know what from Ms.  Weaver's
cloned character's chest.)  But is it exciting, suspenseful, or even
scary?  No, not really.  More than anything else, there's just too much
going on.  The various chases and fire-fights are so poorly integrated
that even the best bits often cancel each other out.  To make matters
worse, the score (by John Frizzell) telegraphs each and every boo before
it happens.  The finale is the worst, with a hybrid creature as likely
to inspire giggles as gags.  (Okay, the presence of Winona Ryder is
pretty damn funny, too.)  And can someone please explain the final
scene?  Why is everyone so happy after witnessing such huge and presum-
ably devastating destruction?  Game over, man.

Title
Review for Stupids, The (1996)
     Director John Landis is back at it, still light years away from the
comic masterpieces of NATIONAL LAMPOON'S ANIMAL HOUSE, THE BLUES
BROTHERS, AN AMERICAN WEREWOLF IN LONDON, and TRADING PLACES, but
obviously having a high time adapting Harry Allard and James Marshall's
series of children's books.  The central joke here is that Stanley
Stupid and his family take *everything* at face value.  When their trash
is missing from the curb cans, they think somebody stole it.  When Dad
(Tom Arnold) discovers the city dump, he thinks he's uncovered the crime
of the century.  When the kids (Bug Hall and Alex McKenna) can't find
their father anywhere in the house, they think he's been kidnapped.  And
so on.
     Though it ultimately lives up to its title, THE STUPIDS is dumb fun
for, oh, about an hour.  The cast has enormous enthusiasm and the
costumes (and some sets) are relentlessly sunny.  (Kids would like the
latter, if this were a movie for kids.  I'm not sure if it is.) The
cheerfully chaotic plot is one of the most unpredictable in recent
memory, adding arms dealers, space aliens, and a postal conspiracy into
the mix.  Film fans will also enjoy the director's trademark in-jokes,
from "see you next Wednesday" to the casting of prominent directors in
cameo roles.  (That's David Cronenberg as Stanley's old boss and Robert
Wise as the neighbor.  You find the rest.)
     What's missing is a better attention to detail.  Though the sloppy
editing is entirely annoying-- *must* they cut away in the middle of a
musical number?-- the most glaring gaffe is the film's failure to adhere
to a consistent set of rules regarding exactly how this Stupid universe
is supposed to behave.  Other people, places, and things are allowed to
act as goofy as the title characters do and that's a mistake.  The core
contrast between smart and stupid-- the very essence of what the jokes
are about-- is undermined and that's no good.  This is one movie that
might be funnier if it tried to be less funny.  Trust in the Lloyd.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Life Less Ordinary, A (1997)
     This surprising stinker from the TRAINSPOTTING team is an unfunny,
overly hip romantic comedy about a cute-as-can-be janitor (Ewan Mac-
Gregor) who one day gets replaced by a robot, tries to talk to the
company president (Ian Holm) about it, and ends up taking the million-
aire's spoiled-rotten daughter (Cameron Diaz) hostage.  The catch?
Well, she kinda likes being kidnapped.  And-- are you ready for this
one?-- they're pursued by a pair of increasingly aggressive angels
(Delroy Lindo and Holly Hunter) neither of whom can return to Heaven
until the kids are in love!  No, not an ordinary movie by any means.
The innumerable odd (and often yawn-inducing) sights include a pool-side
game of William Tell, a fantasy dance sequence set to "Beyond the Sea,"
and a T2/Robert Patrick impersonation by the diminutive Ms.  Hunter.
(Not only does she crawl across the hood of a moving vehicle, she also
spits a wad of chew, in a single screen moment that all but cured my
longtime crush on the actress.) While it's difficult to dislike *any*
movie that allows the line "this is Gabriel, get me God"-- or one that
closes with a cute claymation sequence-- there's absolutely *nothing*
compelling at the story's core.  No chemistry.  No charm.  Nothing.
Directed by Danny Boyle, written by John Hodge, and produced by Peter
MacDonald, all of whom prove that it takes real talent to make a movie
this bad.  (Rated "R"/102 min.)

Title
Review for Air Force One (1997)
A movie review by Michael J. Legeros
Copyright 1997 by Michael J. Legeros
     Well, once again, a summer movie has surprised me.  This time, it's
AIR FORCE ONE, which is the long-sit of the season that *I* didn't see
coming.  As the trailers have trumpeted for the last six months, Har-
rison Ford plays President Ass Kicker, a Chief Executive who has to make
like Kurt Russell making like Steven Seagal making like Bruce Willis,
when *his* plane is hijacked by Russian loyalists.  (The Commander in
Chief is hurried into the escape pod, but chooses to hang around, be-
cause his wife and daughter are still aboard and, friends, that's one
family you just don't go messin' with.) Director Wolfgang Petersen (IN
THE LINE OF FIRE, DAS BOOT) is a bonafide master of claustrophobic com-
bat, I'll give him that.  We're always aware of the bad guys, no matter
what curtain they're hiding behind.  (Is the President's 747 really that
big on the inside?) And, with the help of visual effects supervisor
Richard Edlund, Petersen also pulls off a couple of breathtaking aerial
sequences.  (An aborted landing at Ramstein Air Base is an early show
stopper.  Cool crash trucks, too.)
     The problem-- well, one of them-- is that Petersen serves up a few
too many crises.  Three too many, to be exact.  Sure, the action, when
it finally gets rockin' and rolling, is a welcome relief to a talky
first hour.  But do we really need to wrap with attacking fighters *and*
an aerial rescue *and* one last, lurking bad guy?  Sigh.  The ending
also boasts the weakest special effects in the movie, including some
obviously computer-generated water wonders.  (All of which, like the
rest of the scenes, are accompanied by Jerry Goldsmith's head-pounding
score.  Please pass the aspirin.) Another big botch is the choice of
villains.  Really, the motives of the terrorists-- whose soft-spoken
leader (Gary Oldman) seeks the release of an imprisoned general-- are as
patriotic as any American character in the movie.  They've just chosen a
more violent means to their end.  (Well, almost.  As Oldman's character
takes pains to point out, the United States is quite fond of murder when
it comes to protecting *their* interests.  And "snap" goes another bad
guy's neck.) All in all, AIR FORCE ONE gives a convincing illusion of
being the most believable and ably constructed of the summer stock.
Watch with your eyes open, however, and you might agree that it's just
one more dumb, loud blockbuster. 

Title
Review for Lion King, The (1994)
     Disney has done it again!  Surprised?  Forget the cross promotions
and tie-ins-from-hell, the strengths of THE LION KING are many and you
could waste an entire afternoon going over the giddy delights of this
full-length animated feature. Rich imagery, colorful characters, and
timeless themes are just some of the reasons to roar about THE KING.
     The story--an agreeable blend of HAMLET, BAMBI, and THE JUNGLE
BOOK--introduces Simba, a young lion lad whose father, Mufasa, is
king. But when the king is crowned by his scheming brother Scar, young
Simba is led to believe that he caused his father's death.  Simba flees
the kingdom, instilled with the guilt that will inhibit his return as
an adult.  The cub pairs with a pair of jungle johns--Pumbaa the wart
hog and Timon the meerkat--who teach Simba the bare necessities,
including their philosophy of "no worries"--a mantra that will prove
quite convenient for Simba to run away from responsibility.
     THE LION KING borrows the best from "big three," incorporating the
anachronistic humor of ALADDIN, the somber splendor of BEAUTY AND THE
BEAST, and the youthful vigor of THE LITTLE MERMAID.  (Not to mention
almost *all* of BAMBI.)
     There's action and adventure and, of course, music.  Glorious,
sweeping music from a score (by Hans Zimmer) that, oddly, is better
than the songs (by Tim Rice and Elton John). These tunes lack the
obvious wit of previous partners Alan Menken and Howard Ashman and,
with the exception of the "Be Prepared" (sung by Irons), are little
more than agreeable filler.
     The characterizations are some of the most diverse that Disney's
done to date. No humans are on hand, for a change, and no one flies
solo ala Robin Williams. Not even second-half scene-stealer Nathan Lane
as Timon.  Best of the best is Irons as Scar, who takes his place in
the long-standing line of memorable Disney villains.
     The film stumbles a bit in the art department.  Some of the
segments--such as a computer-aided stampede of wildebeest--are
breathtaking to behold. Other, less-involved scenes use simple
backdrops that are almost eyesores by comparison.  The entire final
sequence, for example, looks almost unfinished.
     THE LION KING is an enthusiastic sign that the Disney *still* has
room for improvement. Sure, THE KING is a grand entertainment and is
easily one of the best films so far this year.  But add better songs
and more computer graphics and *then* we'll see something the likes of
which we've never seen before.

Title
Review for Pallbearer, The (1996)
     David Schwimmer (from the television series "Friends") stars as a
sensitive (and slightly neurotic) single guy who gets more than he
expected from the grieving mother (Barbara Hershey) of a classmate he
can't remember.  Hello Mrs. Robinson!  Though quite cute as a romantic
comedy, THE PALLBEARER is paced like a funeral march.  The characters
act, react, and interact at half-speed, making for one *excruciatingly*
long sit.  (And what's with the dreary lighting?) Co-writer/director
Matt Reeves brings some snap to the story's midsection; the film briefly
comes to life when our hero attempts to resolve his feelings for
*another* classmate (a very appealing Gwyneth Paltrow).  By this time,
though, most viewers will have either fled or fallen asleep.  Those
tough souls who stay with it can marvel at the sleepy-eyed Schwimmer, a
hound dog with a head cold, who can go for over an hour without ever
changing his expression.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Executive Decision (1996)
(WB)
Directed by    Stuart Baird
Written by     Jim and John Thompson
Cast           Kurt Russell, Halle Berry, John Leguizamo, Oliver 
               Platt, Joe Morton, David Suchet, Steven Seagal
MPAA Rating    "R" (presumably for language and violence)
Running Time   129 minutes
Reviewed at    Carmike 7 Cinemas, Raleigh, NC (9MAR96)
     Aircraft silhouetted against an afternoon sky.  The music on 
the soundtrack surges; the actors grow into terse, tense expressions.  
A dangerous mid-air transfer is about to happen onto an endangered 
747.  Could it be Charleton Heston, about to be lowered into a 
cockpit to rescue Karen Black?  No!  It's never-aging Kurt Russell 
and a team of commandos raiding a hostage-held jetliner that's 
armed with nerve gas for use on a suicide mission.  Wohoo!  The 
disaster film lives!  
     Twenty-one years since AIRPORT '75 and the formula still works 
wonders, though with a few necessary changes:  instead of a mid-air 
collision causing problems, it's Middle-Eastern terrorists; instead 
of Gloria Swanson on board, the biggest name on the passenger list 
is Marla Maples Trump.  (She has a cameo as a stewardess.)  The 
expected emergency landing stays, but they've added an entire DIE 
HARD subplot that has Russell and his crack commandos methodically 
plotting a takeover.   All that's missing is George Kennedy's 
cigar!
     EXECUTIVE DECISION is shameless fun from producer Joel Silver 
and editor-turned-director Stuart Baird.  The Jim and John Thompson 
(PREDATOR, PREDATOR 2) script steals from everywhere-- AIRPORT, 
FAIL SAFE, SPEED-- and, once it gets airborne, the darn thing works 
wonders.  The attention to casting detail is particularly good:  
J.T. Walsh as a worried Senator on board, Steven Seagal as the 
squinty commando leader, Halle Berry as the stalwart stewardess.  
And the list of good players goes on:  Joe Morton, Oliver Platt, 
John Leguizamo.  No particular character is written *that* well, 
but they gel into one of the better action ensembles that we've 
seen in some time.  Recommended.  
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
MOVIE HELL is on the Web!  http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Johnny Mnemonic (1995)
     We're back in BLADE RUNNER territory with this one, conceptual
artist Robert Longo's vision of a William Gibson-inspired future
where information is the commodity to kill for.  Front and center
is Johnny (Keanu Reeves), a "cyber-courier" who smuggles data via
a "wet-wired" implant.  He's ready to quit the biz and get a portion of
his long-term memory restored, but, first, he has to finish one last,
dangerous job..
     The pressing problem in JOHNNY MNEMONIC is that Keanu Reeves seems
to have forgotten how to play an action hero since his stint on SPEED.
He's walking wood in a forest of stiffs that includes Henry Rollins,
Ice-T, and Dina Meyer.  (Dolph Lundgren's street preacher is in an
acting category all its own. :-)  Without a believable performance
between them, all we can do is sit back and watch the atmosphere, which
is pretty good in places.  The VR sequences are way cool, but the
physical FX--such as miniatures and mattes--leave a lot to be
desired.  Watch out for those bad blue-screens!
     We wouldn't mind a minute of JOHNNY MNEMONIC if the action played
better.  Too bad the debut director isn't very strong in this de-
partment.  His big finale is a sloppy, silly mess that runs twenty
minutes too long, which is way past the time that most of our "wet-
wired" processors have already shut down.
BOTTOM LINE:  YATF (Yet Another Tortured Future).  Skip it.

Title
Review for Multiplicity (1996)
(Columbia)
Directed by     Harold Ramis
Written by      Mary Hale, Chris Miller, Lowell Ganz, and Babaloo Mandel
Cast            Michael Keaton, Andie MacDowell, Harris Yulin, Richard
                Masur, John DeLancie, Eugene Levy
MPAA Rating     "PG-13"
Running Time    115 minutes
Reviewed at     General Cinemas at Pleasant Valley, Raleigh, NC (9JUL96)
     Michael Keaton plays a man so busy that he has to clone himself to
find enough time to work, play, and parent.  He's copied three times,
courtesy of your friendly neighborhood geneticist (Harris Yulin).  "Two"
is his aggressive side and takes charge at the office, while "Three" is
more prissy and stays home with the kids.  ("Four" is the flub; a fuzzy
copy with the mind of a child.)  Mr.  Keaton is very funny-- and
distinctly different-- in each of these roles.  He gives a command
performance that the movie doesn't know what to do with.  The best that
four (cloned?) writers could come up with are some recycled gags from
MR. MOM, a few hundred or so double takes, and one very funny sequence
involving the rule over who gets to sleep with the wife (Andie
MacDowell, looking dazed and confused even when she's not supposed to
be).  The latter is also the closest that the movie comes to having a,
uh, climax.  MULTIPLICITY attempts to end on a serious note and it
doesn't work.  Twenty minutes are wasted there.  Also curious is how
absolutely nothing is explained about the character of the scientist.
We see him in the cloning sequence and then he just disappears for the
rest of the movie.  Perhaps he's working on opening a franchise, maybe 
one called Clones 'R' Us?
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Spawn (1997)
A movie review by Michael J. Legeros
Copyright 1997 by Michael J. Legeros
     SPAWN is worth skipping, unless you're a comic-book fan, in which
case you'll probably enjoy the special effects.  Viz wiz and first-time
director Mark A.Z. Dippe proves, once again, that a caped crusader can
at least be *visualized* on film.  The soulless, joyless story is *less*
enjoyable, but it certainly goes a long way to easing to pain of that
other hotly anticipated four-color failure, BATMAN AND ROBIN.  (At least 
Mr. Schumacher's film had entire *sequences* worth watching.)  Really, 
there's barely anything here to hook the viewer.  The tone is black, but 
not black enough.  The costumed villain (a squat and obscenely padded 
John Leguizamo) is a grotesque delight, but doesn't get enough screen 
time.  Even a literal rendition of Hell-- complete with a CGI rendition 
of the Big Guy himself-- gets boring after the first look-see.  Sigh.   
With Michael Jai White, Martin Sheen, Nicol Williamson, D. B. Sweeney,
and Theresa Randle.

Title
Review for War Room, The (1993)
Directed by D. A. Pennebaker & Chris Hegedus
Starring James Carville, George Stephanopoulos and just about everyone
else involved in 1992's Presidential campaign.
MPAA Rating     none
Running time    Approx. 100 minutes
     THE WAR ROOM is a fun, little documentary about the Bill Clinton
Presidential campaign.  But don't expect to see much of "Bubba" here--
he's as scarce as a leftover French fry in the White House.  The *real*
stars of THE WAR ROOM are communications director George Stephanopoulos
and chief strategiest James Carville.  And, as this film suggests, both
are just as powerful as the President-To-Be.
     THE WAR ROOM goes behind-the-scenes to show who *really* controls a
political campaign.  Though it's the candidates who get the attention,
it's people like Carville who spend hours thinking up the "sound bites"
and the "catch phrases." And it's a process that's both mesmerizing and
funny to watch.  One of the best bits eavesdrops on a seemingly absurd
discussion about "sign size" and how Jerry Brown has bigger letters
than they do!
     Forget real-life cartoons Dan Quayle and Ross Perot; James
Carville is the fun one to watch here.  He's an instant scene-stealer
who burns with such hatred for George Bush that his features
involuntarily crimp every time he hears "read my lips."
     Stephanopoulos is rather bland.  But his cautious tone and boyish
features make the perfect contrast to the wired and wily Carville.  The
odd couple is backed by a diverse supporting cast including Hillary,
Bill, and a dry-humored Mary Matalin.  And listen for a great Al Gore
impersonation!
     THE WAR ROOM only drags at the end.  As the film approaches
Election Day, everything seems to slow to half-speed.  The last
thirty-minutes are tough--especially with the outcome already known.
But a sincere speech from Carville helps end everything on a high
note.

Title
Review for Uomo delle stelle, L' (1995)
(Mirimax)
Directed by     Giuseppe Tornatore
Written by      Giuseppe Tornatore and Fabio Rinaudo
Cast            Sergio Castellitto, Tiziana Lodato, Franco Scaldati,
                Leopoldo Trieste, Clelia Rondinella, Tano Cimarosa,
                Nicola Di Pinto, Costantino Carrozza
MPAA Rating     Rated "R" (presumably for nudity and sexual content)
Running Time    106 minutes
Reviewed at     The Rialto, Raleigh, NC (26MAY96)
    One of last year's Best Foreign Film nominees is an odd, dour drama
about a movie-studio talent scout (Sergio Castellitto) scouring Sicily
for the Next Big Star.  He travels from village to village in his
vehicle, announcing over megaphone the promises of rags to riches, and
then setting up his lights, camera, and action to anyone willing to pay
the 1,500 lire fee.  (To cover the cost of film and developing, he
says.) The villagers all end up baring their souls to the camera, which
makes for an interesting travelogue of local Sicilian color.  (Early in
the movie, however, he has everyone reciting dialogue from GONE WITH THE
WIND.  In one hilarious sequence, the camera captures the various
butchered readings of Scarlett O'Hara and Rhett Butler.) Though a very
well- produced and good-looking film, THE STAR MAKER suffers on a number
of a fronts.  The talent scout, for example, isn't exactly the most
likable of characters.  And though his world-- and the film-- is
brightened after he meets a simple convent girl (Tiziana Lodato), she
arrives so late into the story that her presence barely makes a
difference.  Directed by Giuseppe Tornatore (CINEMA PARADISO).
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Island of Dr. Moreau, The (1996)
    The third screen adaptation of H.G. Wells' century-old novel is the
worst of two warring worlds:  it's neither suspenseful enough to be
scary nor outrageous enough to qualify as a camp classic.  Marlon Brando
is well-cast as the mad scientist who lives on a remote South Pacific
island, where he can experiment on animals and play God in peace.
Brando plays the part as a continuation of his Kurtz character from
APOCALYPSE NOW, turning every scene of his into an intentional exercise
in absurdity.  His jaw-dropping late arrival-- wearing chalky white
make-up under a billowing white muumuu, among other odd accouterments--
will be long-remembered by film scholars.  And has the summer seen a
stranger sight than that of Brando behind a piano, playing excerpts from
"Rhapsody in Blue" to a roomful of mutant monsters?  As the mad
scientist's mad assistant, Val Kilmer rivals with a doped-up performance
that's almost as audacious.  (Stay awake for a dead-on impersonation of
the big guy, which Val delivers toward the end.) Alas, nothing else in
this movie even comes close to working the way it should.  The human
elements never connect, the animal actors look ridiculous, and any
affecting social commentary is saved for the last sixty seconds. 
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Get on the Bus (1996)
    To the credit of Spike Lee and screenwriter Reggie Rock Bythewood,
GET ON THE BUS *did* get me thinking.  I thought about the fifteen men
bound for the Million Man March and wondered how many of them were
representations of Mr. Lee.  (The film student is an obvious choice, but
do we see a side of Spike in the macho actor played by Andre Braugher?
Or, maybe, in the mulatto police officer portrayed by Roger Guenveur
Smith?) I thought about Ossie Davis and wondered how many times I'd seen
him playing the wise old man.  (Remember how good he was with Burt
Reynolds on that TV show, some years back?) I thought about all the
weighty issues riding on that bus and wondered if any of these preachers
would stop sermonizing long enough to simply "be." (The one passenger
who stays silent is a Nation of Islam attendee and what does that tell
you?)
    I thought about the great state of Tennessee and wondered if a bevy
of black men would find hospitality in a Memphis redneck bar.  (I bought
the State Police stopping them on suspicion of drug traffic, though.)
Mostly, I thought about Albert Einstein and wondered how he would
explain the stretching of time inside of a movie theater.  (The film
runs two hours and feels like three.  Wait, I remember an exciting
exchange!  Yes, somewhere in the second hour, when an auto dealer gets
on da bus and begins offering some choice opinions about affirmative
action.)
    GET ON THE BUS is clearly the best movie that Spike Lee has made in
a while, or, at least, since before CLOCKERS and GIRL 6.  (When was the
last *funny* Spike Lee movie?  CROOKLYN in '94?  JUNGLE FEVER in '91?)
Those reading their eyelids may beg to differ, but Lee has very nearly
succeeded with this rolling sermon that, like the Million Man March
itself, pushes the promotion of unity among African-American males.
Leave it to Lee to bring nobility to the multiplex.  Now, if only he'd
though to put Sandra Bullock behind the wheel of that rig...  Pop quiz,
Hotshot:  you've got a movie about a bus, loaded with black male
stereotypes and rigged to make the viewer fall asleep no matter how fast
it goes.  What do you do? 
Mike Legeros
Raleigh, NC, USA, Earth
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>"Orange whip?  Orange whip?  Three orange whips." [and do gesture]

Title
Review for Blink (1994)
     BLINK is the latest in a long line of Flawed Hollywood Thrillers.
The plot is formula--a psycho stalks an attractive woman who's
protected by a cop who's sleeping with the target--but good humor, a
good cast, and a couple neat twists provide the real thrills in this
"thriller."
     Once again, distress duties fall upon Madeline Stowe, who was last
seen resisting "Unlawful Entry." This time, Stowe plays
sightless-since-seven Emma Brody, a folk-band violinist who's awaiting
a corneal transplant.
     When the eyes are finally upon her, Emma has problems with her
newfound vision--one of which is what her doctor calls a "perceptual
delay."  That is, there's a delay between her eyes and her brain.  What
she sees can, sometimes, take over a day to appear in her head.
     Of course, poor Emma also suffers from flashbacks and blurry
vision.  So, when she catches a glimpse of a passing serial killer,
neither she nor the police completely believe her eyes....
     Despite the odd ocular angle, BLINK is a formula film at heart and
has the cliches to prove it.  There's the cautious-of-commitment cop
(Quinn), the cop's hard-nosed boss (Young), and the cop's rival, the
maybe-too-friendly doctor (Friedman).
     Throw in some psychological mumbo-jumbo and you have the perfect
recipe for disaster.
     This stew would probably sour in the hands of lesser talent.  But
with a Respectable Director (Michael Apted) behind the boards, BLINK
rarely sinks as low as the subject matter suggests.  Sure, there are a
couple of Awful Moments--including a hideous POV shift to that of the
killer's--but the bulk of BLINK is easy on the eyes (and brain).
     Most of the interesting stuff happens in the first half, when the
script promises more than it could ever hope to deliver.
     You get great flourishes like Quinn's character quoting Longfellow
to get gals.  Or Emma's flashbacks of her mother, who blinded her in a
fit of rage.  Or the crowning moment of questionable ethics, when
Quinn's boss tells him to, simply, "sleep with her and get it over
with."
     BLINK is also an unusually funny film.  A jovial bunch of
detectives provides gallows humor by the yard.  And a couple hilarious
herrings, of the red variety, are netted at key points late in the
film.
     There are other reasons not to blink at BLINK. The cast is
attractive, the locales (in Chicago) are great, and Stowe makes a
refreshingly strong heroine.  But when the plot passes the point of
oversaturation, somewhere in the last half-hour, BLINK drags like the
best of them.
     The director side-steps this problem, however, by simply slapping
on the suspense.  As any Bad Movie Fan knows, shameless manipulation
works wonders in the absence of a polished script.
     To the victor belongs the spoils and BLINK does reward the patient
viewer with a slightly surprise ending.  And, in a moment of unbridled
audacity that's worth the price of matinee admission alone, Apted even
allows a visit from Norman Bates' mother.

Title
Review for Frankenstein (1994)
     No FRANKENSTEIN film should ever be boring.  Period.  Not THE
BRIDE OF FRANKENSTEIN, not YOUNG FRANKENSTEIN, and certainly not MARY
SHELLEY'S FRANKENSTEIN.  But boring is as boring does and this
refreshingly literate monster movie is one creation that never comes to
life.
     Don't blame the source material.  Shelley's story always contained
more philosophy than atrocity, and writers Steph Lady and Frank
Darabont doctor the horrors appropriately.  With one eleventh-hour
exception, their transgressions are all very tasteful.  This
FRANKENSTEIN is a thinking's man's monster movie, where The Creature
spends more time learning language than lumbering.
     With appropriate tweaks to the original story--such as electric
eels as energy sources--there should be enough scares here to spook
anyone.  But the surrounding story never comes together.  The tone
isn't quite right, and parts of the plot always seems to be missing.
Did test screenings do this?  The generous leaps and bounds of the
story suggest serious snipping in post-production.
     The film stinks for subtext, as well.  Director Kenneth
Branagh--the man who put Shakespeare in the cineplex--offers no
commentary on the horrors of 16th-century medicine.  Nor does he
effectively examine the relationship between Victor and his adopted
sister (Helena Bonham Carter).  His worst omission: a sense of humor.
This FRANKENSTEIN should be brimming with sly winks and subtle nods to
earlier incarnations.  But, no, not once does the doctor even so much
as yell "it's alive."
     (And what's with that "circling" camera technique?  Is the
director trying to infuse into ever scene a sense of action?
Excitement?  Dizziness?)
     Playing the infamous Victor Von, Branagh is all buffed and
beautiful for his steamy laboratory scenes.  But his eyes burn with
neither malice nor madness--he's a good boy who's too good.  Better is
DeNiro, a stitch (sorry) as The Creature.  His misshapen mass of
serrated scars and slurred syllables is a welcome presence in the
second hour.
     Supporting roles go to Ian Holm, Aidan Quinn, Tom Hulce, Richard
Briers, and, as a heavy (!), John Cleese.  Why the latter is forced to
wear dental props, though, is never explained.  Sorry, sorry.
     To the credit of everyone involved, there is one, great moment to
remember.  The scene occurs toward the end of the film, when The
Creature does something very bad to someone very good.  That brief,
horrible act brings a rush of excitement into the film like oxygen into
a backdraft.  And, for a few, fleeting moments, you can clearly see the
terror that should've been there from the beginning. And then it's
gone.

Title
Review for Smilla's Sense of Snow (1997)
(Fox Searchlight)
Directed by     Bille August
Written by      Ann Biderman, based on the novel by Peter Hoeg
Cast            Julia Ormond, Gabriel Byrne, Richard Harris, Robert
                Loggia, Jim Broadbent, Vanessa Redgrave
MPAA Rating     "R" (presumably for violence and profanity)
Running Time    115 minutes
Reviewed at     The Colony Theatre, Raleigh, NC (04APR97)
     SMILLA'S SENSE OF SNOW is an international thriller with a sci-fi
twist.  And, though that twist may be difficult for some folks to warm
up to, all the other essential ingredients are here to make a mystery
nifty:  a tough-as-nails heroine (Julia Ormond, who, even as an ice
queen, is still the Most Beautiful Woman in the World), a shady sup-
porting character-turned-love interest (Gabriel Byrne), a child in peril
(albeit, with distress shown in flashback), and the ever-extending
tentacles of a big, bad corporation.  Great location work, too, in both
Denmark and Greenland.  SMILLA is a bit butt-numbing toward the end, but
who won't be taken back a double decade by the sight of Richard Harris
out on an ice flow?  Anyone up for an ORCA revival?

Title
Review for Twister (1996)
(WB)
Directed by    Jan De Bont
Written by     Michael Crichton and Anne-Martin Martin
Cast           Helen Hunt, Bill Paxton, Cary Elwes, Jami Gertz
MPAA Rating    "PG-13" (for "intense depiction of very bad weather")
Running Time   117 minutes
Reviewed at    Wynnsong 10, Durham, NC (10MAY96)
     Auntie Em!  Auntie Em!  The summer-movie season has officially blown 
into town with TWISTER, the first must-see movie of the year.  Though
both underwritten and lacking the momentum of his last film, SPEED,
director Jan De Bont's take on Oklahoma storm chasing still impresses
with some of the most spectacular special effects ever seen on screen.
Industrial Light and Magic (ILM) has blended the authentic with the
computer-generated to create a series a storms the likes of which
Dorothy and Toto never saw.  You'll marvel at the dark, swirling clouds
of debris and other matter-- flying cows and tractors and houses, oh my!
A tanker-truck that drops out of the sky is a sight, though my favorite
is the splintering screen of a doomed drive-in that's showing THE
SHINING.  The FX also get better as they go.  De Bont wisely rations the
thrills, saving the best for last.  (I could've done without the
continuity gaffes, though.  Just how *does* a red truck stay shiny after
riding through a storm?)
     The effects are great, but the script is a *mess*.  Blame Michael
Crichton, Anne-Marie Martin, and a host of script doctors for, oh,
predictable plotting, dumb drama, and characters as corny as Kansas in
August.  The non-star cast does what they can with the material.  Helen
Hunt and Bill Paxton, playing soon-to-be-divorced scientists, are very
sincere shouting lines like "Come on!", "There's no time!", and "Take
cover!" (Did the MST3K gang also do a rewrite?)  Other cast members
include Cary Elwes as a rival storm chaser, Philip Seymour Hoffman as a
tie-dyed metalhead who is particularly fond of the meteorological-by-
way-of-MTV term "Suck Zone", and Jamie Gertz as Paxton's character's
fiancee.  (Ms. Gertz plays a "reproductive therapist," if you can
believe it.  She's there to scream, ask questions, and provide comic
relief.  That is, until she predictably can't take it anymore.)
     There's a lot going on in this movie and, unfortunately, very
little of it makes (focused) sense.  The central character motivation is
a geeky combination of science and thrill-seeking; these guys love to
take risks because they love to study storms.  De Bont attempts to
inject other elements into the film, but they don't work as written.
For example, we could do without the tragic fate of Hunt's character's
aunt.  She exists to reinforce the Very Noble goal of better weather
predicting, by showing that tornadoes often cause huge amounts of damage
and injury and often without warning.  No duh.  The sequence is a
melodramatic cheap shot and doesn't belong here.  Not in a movie that's
just out for thrills.  In fact, the "back stories" are all pretty bad,
but like most storm chasers-- or, if you prefer, most summer-movie
audiences-- we're in for the ride.  We certainly expect more than a few
lulls before we get to see a TWISTER.
     Finally, something should be said about the shameless inclusion of
pop songs on the soundtrack.  They're played too prominently in the
background, intruding for no other seeming reason than to sell something
else for Time-Warner.  The mix of musical genres and styles is often
distracting and certainly doesn't blend with the other accompaniment, a
windy orchestral score from composer Mark Mancina.  (The score is also a
bit much, I must say.  Must movie music be so overblown?  Is James
Horner teaching classes in this stuff?)  The exception is a short
sequence that combines Rainbow, Rossini, and Rogers and Hammerstein; it
happens early the film and is one of the few places on the soundtrack
that doesn't feel prepackaged.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Guarding Tess (1994)
     If Tom Clancy tried to write a sitcom, he'd probably end up with
something like GUARDING TESS--a horribly misfired comedy about a
by-the-book Secret Service agent assigned to protect a
do-anything-she-wants-to former First Lady.
     The set-up seems foolproof: team Shirley MacLaine with Nicolas
Cage.  She's cranky presidential widow Tess Carlisle; he's
straight-laced Service man Doug Chesnic.  She likes to play golf in
thirty-degree weather; he won't let her ride in her car unless properly
seated.
     She likes having him around; he wants off the assignment.
     With only their age differences precluding any obvious romantic
interest, this story should've scripted itself.  After all, the actors
don't need much prodding.  MacLaine has already settled into her
post-MADAME SOUSATZKA crotchety character.  And nobody, I mean
*nobody*, does a slow-burn better than Nicolas Cage.
     GUARDING TESS gets off to a bad start.  The writers start the
story too late by opening the film at Doug's debriefing.  He's finished
his three-year tour-of-duty and he wants a more adventurous
assignment.  The First Lady has other ideas, though, and, with a phone
call to the President, demands Doug's return.
     That bit is fine in terms of plot device--but it presumes a
conflict that the audience hasn't seen.  We don't know what's been
going on with Tess and Doug.  We don't know what he's done or what she
hasn't.  And without TESS AND DOUG: THE EARLY YEARS to fill us in, the
bickering seems blase.
     Of course, the film ignores this technicality and spends about an
hour letting MacLaine and Cage circle each other like toothless
sharks.  But the nibbles are few and far between.  In fact, the film's
scene-stealer is isn't even in a scene!  That's director Hugh Wilson as
the voice of the president, who's salty tongue chastises Cage in a
couple hilarious phone-calls.
     Right at the hour mark, the story gets serious and it's downhill
from there.  Plot points start swarming like agents on Reagan and,
suddenly, nothing's funny anymore.
     In the right context, the drama would've worked wonders.  But who
can believe such somber sincerity after an hour of failed frivolity?
Or, for that matter, Nicolas Cage shooting off people's toes?  The
shifting tone renders GUARDING TESS almost unwatchable.

Title
Review for On Deadly Ground (1994)
     ON DEADLY GROUND proves, without a doubt, that Steven Seagal
directs as badly as he acts.  This environmental actioner is p.u. from
the word g.o. and even co-star Michael Caine, aka Mr.  Will Act For
Food, can't help defuse this bomb.
     The plot is some superior nonsense about a nasty oil mangate
(Caine) and the Bad Things he's planning for the pristine Alaskan
wilderness.  Eskimo environmentalists want him stopped--but they have
no power.  Or hero.  Until the company's head firefighter, Forrest Taft
(Seagal), enters the picture.
     When Taft gets wind of his boss's *real* plans, The Ponytail takes
an armed stance against his employer.  They try to kill him, he tries
to kill them, and it all wraps up with Seagal on a soapbox.
     Pay attention to the opening scene--the first clue that Seagal
doesn't have one--and you have still have time to ask for your money
back.
     At the beginning, Taft arrives in Alaska to "blow out" a "well"
fire.  Yes, a "well" fire!  Anyone who's seen HELLFIGHERS knows that
you can't get much more exciting than this.  But, believe or it not,
Seagal sieves the action right out of this explosive situation.
     His "back up" is fine--production designer Wm. Ladd Skinner,
cinematographer Ric Waite, composer Basil Poledouris--but even *they*
can't compensate for dingbat direction.  With a poorly staged scene, who
cares about Skinner's authentic-looking Eskimo village?  Or Waite's
almost-unreal Alaskan photography?  Or Poledouris energized score?
     Seagal even botches the obligatory bar-fight.  Instead of anything
resembling choreography, he resorts to silly slow-motion to punctuate
his punches.
     The Big Shoot Out is the Big Disappointment.  Even after a middling
midsection, one still hopes for a rousing round-up of John Woo
proportions.  Sorry Charlie, no Grand Guignol here.  Just a sloppy mix
of bullets and bad-guys and immolations and explosions and 101 Other
Ways For Bad People To Die.  Hardly the right reward for having to sit
through Eskimo subtitles, R.  Lee Emery's crewcut, and Steven Seagal
trying to be Kevin Costner.
     Even with a "real" director, ON DEADLY GROUND is still a tough
sell.  Seagal seems to have lost his charisma (there's a relative term,
if there ever was one!); certain supporting players are downright
awful; and the plot has more holes than a bad Schwarzenegger story.
     And, just when you think you can't "stands no more," Seagal wraps
this stinky cheese with a five-minute (cut from fifteen!) environmental
speech complete with stomach-turning footage.

Title
Review for Titanic (1997)
     What to say about James Cameron's TITANIC?  Well, you certainly get
your money's worth.  $200 mil is right there, right up on the damn
screen, with a lavishly, expertly, meticulously recreated and nearly
full-size version of the great lady herself.  However it succeeds (or
fails) as a narrative, by golly Ms. Unsinkable Molly, you *do* get to
take that once-in-a-lifetime time-machine tour.  Up and down and around
we're guided, from stem to stern, in and out of staterooms, ball rooms,
dining halls, cargo holds, and even the boiler room.  (And, geez, will
you ever forget the sight of those massive pistons in the engine room?)
These endlessly fascinating period details are the film's greatest as-
set, guaranteed to hold your interest, no matter how expertly (or poor-
ly) Cameron handles both the characters and the story.  Well, that is,
*both* stories.  Not counting the curiously flat framing device-- a
modern-day deep-sea treasure hunt, starring Bill Paxton and featuring
Cameron's own footage (!) of the wreck itself-- TITANIC is actually
*two* movies in one.
     The first is a breezy but embarrassingly juvenile love story, about
a Third Class boy (Leonardo DiCaprio) and a First Class girl (Kate Win-
slet) and the forces that conspire to keep them apart.  (One of which is
her well-to-do but narrow-minded fiancee, Billy Zane, doing Snidely
Whiplash sans mustache.) JAMES CAMERON'S ROMEO AND JULIET runs about an
hour and a half and, if the teen romance doesn't strike a chord, you're
probably doomed to dwell on some of the worser aspects of the film:
corny dialogue, repetitive shots, weak supporting characters, a cloying
Celtic/New Age score, and, on most of the daylight exteriors, an odd and
presumably special effects-induced "haze." And, yet, even if you can't
believe it and run with it, those ninety or so minutes pass pretty
quickly because there *is* so much atmosphere to take in.  (Cameron
pulls out so many stops and delivers such an embarrassment of riches
that you really have to step back from stepping back to get cranky about
the stuff that sucks.)
     TITANIC-- not *The* Titanic.  Just Titanic-- is also a disaster
movie.  Perhaps the granddaddy of all disaster movies.  (Or, at the very
least, the granddaddy of all POSEIDON ADVENTURE remakes.)  Using compu-
ters and models and moving sets, Cameron successfully, believably,
astonishingly recreates *the* great failure of 20th Century technology.
Whatever the liabilities of the script-- and, oh God, there are so many
of them-- the images speak for themselves:  an elderly couple preparing
to drown together in bed, the ass end of a great ship rising higher and
higher into the air, the pained, pale expressions of lifeboat passen-
gers, wincing at the distant screams of the dying.  It's an hour of film
that has to be seen to be believed and, perhaps, be ultimately disap-
pointed by.  (In particular, the death throes are drawn out to an almost
comic extreme.  If you're in a sarcastic mood, comparisons to the for-
ever-and-a-day finale of SPEED 2: CRUISE CONTROL won't be far behind.)
But when we've returned to present day, our tears dried and the pains of
a poor script promptly forgotten, the likely reaction of any paying cus-
tomer will be, well, that they got their money's worth.  And, really,
isn't that the name of the game?

Title
Review for Little Buddha (1993)
Directed by Bernardo Bertolucci
Written by Mark Peploe and Rudy Wurlitzer, based on a story by Bertolucci
Cast Keanu Reeves, Chris Isaak, Bridget Fonda, Alex Wiesendanger, and
     Ying Ruocheng
MPAA Rating     PG
Running Time    123 minutes
     LITTLE BUDDHA is a *great* chaser to the Summer Movie Memorial Day
500.  Intriguing, entertaining, and ultimately relaxing, Bernardo
Bertolucci's primer on Tibetian Buddhism tells the story of a 9
year-old-son Seattle son (Wiesendanger) who may bear the spirit of a
great Tibetian lama.
     When confronted by visiting Lama Norbu (Ruocheng), the parents
(odd choices Fonda and Isaak) take the news surprisingly in stride.
They allow their son to learn from the Lama, who tells the boy the
storybook story of Prince Siddhartha (Reeves) and his search for
enlightment in ancient Nepal.  From this tale, the boy (and the
audience) learns about the Buddist fundamentals of compassion,
knowledge, and impermanence.
     LITTLE BUDDHA is a two-tiered tale and both sides of the story are
equally engaging.  Fonda and Issak are both a bit stiff, but
Wiesendanger is a find.  His foil, best of the bunch Ying Ruocheng, is
a calming presence if there ever was one.  The gimme-a-break casting of
Reeves is something to behold, though.  Bronze, buffed, and beautiful,
he makes a most excellent Enlightened Dude.  Somehow, he works.
     Of course, the *real* reason to watch this film is for
Bertolucci's dynamic direction and Vittorio Storaro's prodigious
photography.  Together, they open the eyes as well as the mind.  Best
surprise: the multi-million dollar special-effects sequence of Reeves
sitting under the spreading Bodhi tree.
     There are a *couple* bumps on the road to enlightment.  The plot
is confusing now and zen, and the dialogue is often overpowered by the
music.  (Courtesy of Ryuichi Sakamoto, whose sweeping score, oddly,
recalls the work of Vangelis in BLADE RUNNER.)

Title
Review for Disclosure (1994)
     Sexual harassment is the subject of DISCLOSURE, a broadly played
thriller that may do more to goose the career of the director than to
educate the masses on the subject matter.
     Meet Tom Sanders (Michael Douglas), a stable family man at the
Seattle computer firm Digicom.  He loves his wife, he loves his job,
and he's expecting a promotion before the big company merger.  What he
gets, instead, is a new boss who's an old girlfriend (Demi Moore).  The
situation quickly comes to a head following an after-hours
tete-a-tete.  Tom refuses her advance, she files for harassment, and
thus begins the plot.
     What sounds like a neat twist on a stereotypical situation really
isn't; writer Paul Attansio (of QUIZ SHOW fame) has simply swapped
genders.  Big deal.  Like the book, the film has bigger fish to fry.
DISCLOSURE is more than just a story of sexual harassment and that's
all I'll reveal here.
     For sheer people-pleasing power, rank DISCLOSURE alongside
Crichton's other novel-to-film, JURASSIC PARK.  The script is smart,
the direction is tidy, and the cast knows their roles by heart.
Michael Douglas makes a solid, sturdy hero, while Demi Moore is
surprisingly effective as the hissable villain.  Her calm dismissal of
Douglas made at least one patron in *my* row talk back to the screen.
     There are many many more reasons to like this film, but my
favorite has to be the way DISCLOSURE depicts a high-tech computer
firm.  Come on, Dennis Miller as a developer?!?  They get some stuff
right, but watch out for those VR sequences!  Did somebody say
LAWNMOWER MAN?
NOTE:   Gripes to the management of Durham's Wynnsong 10, who delayed
        the film by fifteen minutes to help seat stragglers.  The film
        was also out of focus when started and the management didn't
        correct the error for at least five minutes.  Sigh.

Title
Review for Mirror Has Two Faces, The (1996)
(TriStar)
Directed by     Barbra Streisand
Written by      Richard LaGravenese   
Cast            Barbra Streisand, Jeff Bridges, Lauren Bacall, Pierce
                Brosnan, Mimi Rogers, George Segal, Brenda Vaccaro
MPAA Rating     "PG-13"
Running Time    125 minutes
Reviewed at     Mission Valley Cinemas, Raleigh, NC (09NOV96)
     THE MIRROR HAS TWO FACES is a mess.  Babs' new movie is a tedious
exploration of a woman's appearance and her self-opinion therein,
disguised as an old-fashioned romantic comedy about two college
professors (Babs and Jeff Bridges) who enter into a chaste marriage
because "sex ruins everything," set in an indulgent fantasy world
populated by beautiful people like Elle Macpherson (as Bridges' ex-
girlfriend!) and Pierce Brosnan (as Babs' old beau!), and shot through
an endless series of hazy filters, or, perhaps, a year's worth of old
pantyhose.  The laughs are there, sometimes intended and sometimes not.
I howled as an over-pronounced saxophone (on the soundtrack) circled the
two during an intimate moment.  And how about that busy Marvin Hamlisch
score, that you half-expect Babs to break into song with?
     Mr. Bridges is great fun to watch as the button-downed, bow-tied
intellectual whose idea of a good time is bringing a spectral analyzer
to a Christmas concert.  (How much are those, anyway?) His character is
perfectly serious (and perfectly believable) when he says "I'm sure if
sex is something that interests you, I would provide that on occasion."
Also very funny are Lauren Bacall and Mimi Rogers, as Barbra's mother
and sister, respectively.  (George Segal and Brenda Vaccaro, in
supporting roles, are largely wasted.) As for Babs herself, well, it's
quite a stretch to believe her as an ugly duckling spinster.  Especially
given the care that she's taken to look good in every.  single.  frame.
Maybe if she had a fat suit, a la Eddie Murphy in THE NUTTY PROFESSOR?
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC, USA, Earth
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
I'm also on the Web!  http://www.pagesz.net/~legeros/

Title
Review for Unforgettable (1996)
(MGM/UA)
Directed by     John Dahl
Written by      Bill Geddie
Cast            Ray Liotta, Linda Fiorentino, Peter Coyote, Christopher
                McDonald, Kim Cattrall, Kim Coates, David Paymer
MPAA Rating     "R" (presumably for language and violence)
Running Time    117 minutes
Reviewed at     General Cinemas at Pleasant Valley, Raleigh, NC (24FEB96)
      Unforgettable-- not.  Cross THE FUGITIVE with STRANGE DAYS and you
get Ray Liotta as a Seattle medical examiner acquitted of killing his
wife and now trying to catch the Real Killer by re-experiencing her
memories.  (Through an injection of her preserved cerebrospinal fluid,
among other things.) A collection of top talent both before and behind
the camera-- including Linda Fiorentino in the non-bitch role of a
biochemist-- is impressive, but Bill Geddie's script is too densely
plotted to be of use to anyone.  Director John Dahl (THE LAST SEDUCTION,
RED ROCK WEST) is so busy connecting the dots that he fails to remember
the bare necessities, such as natural tension or character development.
The last thirty minutes are the worst:  Dahl playing catch-up with a
series of imbedded flashbacks, not realizing that his film ceased to be
interesting almost an hour ago.  What a waste.  
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
MOVIE HELL is on the Web!  http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Batman & Robin (1997)
     While a complete review is in the works, I can report that BATMAN
AND ROBIN is easily the most light-hearted of the franchise.  Though not
quite the camp classic that director Joel Schumacher obviously intended,
it delivers many a hearty Batlaugh, from Schwarzenegger's see-'em-a-
mile-away one-liners to Thurman's wonderfully punny innuendo.  (To the
diamond- stealing Mr. Freeze, Poison Ivy purrs "I'll help you grab your
rocks.")  As usual, the villains steal the show-- what else is new?--
but at least the heroes get a bigger share of the screen time.  Chris
O'Donnell is, again, the most believable on the dramatic front.  Clooney
is the best *looking* Bruce Wayne to date, but, well, he smiles too
much.  Ms. Silverstone, making her debut as Batgirl, is adequate and
little else.  More action-figure action, much of it way-over-the-top,
from sky-surfing without parachutes (!) to a vehicle chase down the arm
of a giant statue.  Great production design, too.  (The most accomplish-
ed of the four films, I'd say).  Like all the Batfeatures before it,
however, the film's greatest failing is in the editing.  Nips and tucks
(and even some slices) are needed all over the place.  And what's with
the repetitive score?  Definitely not for purists.

Title
Review for Faithful (1996)
(New Line)
Directed by     Paul Mazursky
Written by      Chazz Palminteri, based on his play
Cast            Cher, Chazz Palminteri, Ryan O'Neal
MPAA Rating     "R" (presumably for language and sexual content)
Running Time    91 minutes
Reviewed at     Six Forks Station Cinemas, Raleigh, NC (5APR96)
     I really really really wanted to walk out of this terrible movie,
but I didn't.  Instead, I stayed and endured, in spite of the sheer
awfulness that erupts when a hit man (Chazz Palminteri) breaks into a
housewife's (Cher) expensive home, only to begin sprouting monologues
about fidelity and faithfulness.  Paul Mazursky directs from Chazz's
play, which also stars a pudgy Ryan O'Neal as the husband who hires the
"contract artist." The plans go afoul when the neurotic hit man-- he
calls his shrink while "on duty"-- begins to fall for the wife.  (He's
obviously moved by her unnatural beauty and a voice that sounds like a
perpetual head cold.) The laughs in this movie number, oh, about ten.
The dialogue is probably racy enough to keep you awake, if that be your
type of torture.  Or, just pass the time by imagining David Letterman as
the host of next year's Oscar ceremony:  Chazz, Cher; Cher, Chazz.
[ Video note:  For a *real* intimately hilarious hostage comedy, go       
  rent THE REF (1993).  Kevin Spacey, Judy Davis, and Denis Leary.    
  You'll laugh. ]
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
MOVIE HELL is on the Web!  http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Switchback (1997)
     The second serial-killer thriller of the month is just awful.  Oh,
it starts deceptively okay, with a handful of intriguing characters and
some solid location work.  After a baby-sitter gets gutted in the suit-
ably spooky someone's-in-the-house prologue, parallel stories unfold,
the first involving a Texas sheriff (R. Lee Emery), a gruesome double
murder, and the arrival of a morose FBI agent (Dennis Quaid) on the eve
of voting for the local lawman's reelection.  The second pairs a hitch-
hiker (Jared Leto) with a friendly former railroad worker (Danny
Glover).  They're headed west, toward the Rockies and away from the
murder scene.  Which one is the killer?  Well, it doesn't really matter,
'cause when writer/first-time director Jeb Stuart (DIE HARD) finally
spills the beans, you won't take his choice seriously anyway.  The whole
thing goes south about an hour in, with the tale taking hairpin turns
that I certainly couldn't follow.  And through the whole thing there's
Quaid, playing with the most intense monotony this side of Steven Sea-
gal.  I guess I'm glad that I didn't walk out-- there's some nice train
stuff at the end and a fun nod to DR. STRANGELOVE.

Title
Review for Twister (1996)
(WB)
Directed by    Jan De Bont
Written by     Michael Crichton and Anne-Martin Martin
Cast           Helen Hunt, Bill Paxton, Cary Elwes, Jami Gertz
MPAA Rating    "PG-13" (for "intense depiction of very bad weather")
Running Time   117 minutes
Reviewed at    General Cinemas at Pleasant Valley, Raleigh, NC (13MAY96)
     I went back for a second look at TWISTER and I wish I could report
better things.  The FX are still a gas.  Flying tractors, rolling homes,
and disintegrating barns; it's all there.  Director Jan De Bont, along
with Industrial Light and Magic, has effectively realized one of
nature's most primal forces and I'm not talking about Jesse Helms.  The
effects-related thrills are so complete-- so edge-of-your-seat
jaw-dropping-- that many may find themselves physically exhausted by the
end.  In that regard, TWISTER *works*.  It excites, therefore it is.  On
a second viewing, though, the movie becomes more of a bore.  The obvious
problem-- beyond the missing momentum, overscored music, and shameless
product plugs-- is the script.  As written, TWISTER rests somewhere
between the very bad and the very corny; somewhere between, say,
SHOWGIRLS and MR. HOLLAND'S ANUS.  (I'd call Richard Dreyfuss's Oscar
nomination a special effect, wouldn't you?)
     TWISTER opens on an Oklahoma farm, in 1969, where a little girl is
about to be scarred by a storm.  She'll endure the loss of Somebody
Special and then grow up to look *just* like Helen Hunt.  Cut to present
day, to a pick-up truck traveling on an Oklahoma highway.  Former
storm-chaser Bill Harding (Bill Paxton) and his fiancee (Jami Gertz) are
on their way to meet Jo (Helen Hunt), that now- adult little girl who is
Bill's almost ex-wife.  (Jo hasn't signed the divorce papers yet,
because she's been busy working on Dorothy, get it?, an invention to
study tornadoes.) Knowing how it all plays out, I think that we can
interpret this scene as the first of many mistakes.  Bill Harding isn't
the focus of what passes for the plot.  He's a strong presence, sure,
but he shouldn't be the first person that we lay eyes upon.  TWISTER, as
we learn, is about that little girl and the storm that she remembers.
Jo is the focus of this movie and *Jo* is the one who should be seen
accommodating Harding and his fiancee and not vice versa.
     The filmmaker's choice of a non-star cast-- a la JURASSIC PARK--
works well with regard to both Hunt and Paxton.  They are good actors
who exhibit a warm chemistry with each other, even as their dialogue
grows increasingly empty-headed.  Their light banter soon devolves into
incidental exclamations along the lines of "watch out!", "take cover!",
and "who wrote this crap?" (They're also very good at out-shouting each
other.) No, we never get a sense of who their *characters* are, but they
get an ample amount of screen time together and that's enough for most
summer movies.  Running from vehicle to vehicle and from storm to storm,
Hunt and Paxton are also very physical in their roles.  They finish the
film fleeing the best cornfield dusting since NORTH BY NORTHWEST.
     There's really enough story here, between these two characters,
that we don't need the other elements.  We don't need a team of rival
storm chasers, led by Cary Elwes.  (Cary Elwes?  What's he doing here?
If the script called for a "physically unthreatening opponent," then why
didn't somebody hire Paul Reiser?  He was very good in ALIENS, all those
years ago.) We don't need to put a supporting character in peril, to
either reinforce Jo's obsession or to put a "human face" on the
devastation.  (The scene involves a collapsed house and it just stops
the movie in its tracks.  What a waste of screen time.) And, we
*certainly* don't need Jami Gertz, who's character-- a "reproductive
therapist," Lord help us-- disrupts the tone about every eight minutes
or so.  She exists for comic relief (unnecessary) and to ask
unscientific questions, so the movie can explain to us, in "plain
English," what exactly "weather" is.  (Personally, I wish she had asked
about the radios and how these guys can simultaneously transmit on so
many frequencies at once.)
     As dazzling as the effects are, De Bont doesn't back them up with
the expert editing that he showed us in SPEED.  The storm sequences
often last too long and give us too much time to adjust to what we're
seeing.  (Familiarity breeds lack of fear.  A scene inside a car-garage
pit plays like a theme-park ride at Universal Studios.  Ditch it, but
not before explaining why the fools keep looking in the direction of the
flying debris.) Another glaring problem is that the film doesn't
communicate a sense of either distance or time.  We never know how far
the characters have been traveling or how long they've been chasing a
given storm.  When TWISTER *does* come together, the action is usually
on a smaller-scale.  Paxton and Hunt swerving to avoid falling farm
machinery; a tanker-truck that plops onto the highway in a burst of
flames; and, the piece de resistance, a drive-in theater that's showing
THE SHINING, with a screen that splinters while Jack is having his big
ax attack.  (Oddly, though, we're never shown any larger-scale
devastation.  No aerial shots of leveled towns, etc. etc.)
     If the scenes were confined to Hunt, Paxton, and the tornadoes, 
then TWISTER would work just fine.  Add their motley crew of 
assistants (Philip Seymour Hoffman, et al) for both comic relief 
and local color, and, viola, you've got a movie.  The director 
could do worse than to recut this mess.  Ditch the music, ditch the 
pop songs.  Cut as many scenes as possible with Elwes and Gertz.  
Cut at least half of the incidental dialogue.  Ditch the scene with 
the aunt and the collapsed house.  Tighten tighten tighten and we 
might have something here.  (And, since this is a Steven Spielberg 
production, maybe the idea of director's cut isn't *that* far-
fetched.  Are you listening Time-Warner marketing?)  For now, in 
its present form, TWISTER is just a lot of wind.  The FX are great, 
but, friends, outside of the funnel clouds, everything else sucks.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Welcome to the Dollhouse (1995)
     First-time writer/director/producer Todd Solondz won Best Picture
at the Sundance Film Festival with this cute, cutting, and very black
comedy about a seventh-grade girl desperately trying to survive in
Junior High Hell.  Newcomer Heather Matarazzo touches the heart as the
tragic Dawn Weiner, huh huh huh, the bespectacled school outcast who is
repeatedly dumped upon by her teachers, friends, and family.  Though
nowhere near as funny as the rave reviews have suggested-- any episode
of "The Simpsons" crackles with more knowing wit-- WELCOME TO THE
DOLLHOUSE still succeeds as both a character comedy and a social satire.
As in Larry Clark's KIDS, the story situations-- and the accompanying
language-- are also brutally frank.  Pay attention to the psychology
behind a young man's threat of sexual violence and Dawn's response to
same.  I'm tempted to label this movie as "anti-Disney" or, if you
prefer, the antithesis of mainstream family fare.  However, as Mickey
owns Mirimax, the corporate giant could well be the next home for Mr.
Solondz and his remarkable talents.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Greedy (1994)
Directed by Jonathan Lynn
Written by Lowell Ganz & Babaloo Mandel 
Starring Kirk Douglas, Michael J. Fox, Nancy Travis, Olivia D'Abo,
Phil Hartman, and Ed Begley, Jr.
MPAA Rating     "PG"
Running Time    Approx. 110 minutes
     GREEDY is a horribly excuted "ensemble" comedy about a band of
money-hungry cousins who will do *anything* to get their hands on their
rich Uncle's dough.
     The story introduces Uncle Joe (Douglas), an eccentric millionare
who's taken up with a sexy pizza-girl (d'Abo).  His cousins have been
circling their bait for years and are, understandably, outraged.  So
they call in Joe's favorite nephew, Danny (Fox), to even the balance.
But Danny has his *own* ideas about how to take care of Uncle Joe.
     GREEDY tries hard to walk a straight line between slapstick and
serious.  But the tone is never correctly set.  Even *with* footage of
Jimmy Durante over the opening credits.  I don't care who you
blame--the bottom line is a film full of people trying either to be too
funny or too serious.
     The deck's already stacked with a cast of lightweights.  I mean,
come-on, Nancy Travis?  Ed Begley Jr.?  Or Jack Benny-lookalike Phil
Hartman!?!  Fox is fun, but he still looks seventeen.  Only Kirk
Douglas gets away with anything above acting.  He has a large time
growling and groaning and leering and lying.  Just listen to him
deliver the line "I'm richer than sh*t."
     Just as the cast is uninteresting, so are the characters.  The
cousins are all one-note cartoons and the central protagonist, Danny,
is a professional bowler!!  Who though *that* one up??
     If nothing else, GREEDY certainly *looks* good-- but who cares
about production values in a film with uninteresting characters?  For
that matter, who cares about uninteresting characters?  Which is the
problem:  when the jokes all-too-often go flat, there's very little to
fall back on.
NOTE:   As trying as the whole experience is, GREEDY has one genuine
        gut-buster that comes toward the end.  And it makes this mostly
        mediocre movie just a little bit above okay.

Title
Review for Yin shi nan nu (1994)
     Delightful culinary comedy from Taiwanese filmmaker Ang Lee (THE
WEDDING BANQUET) about a master chef and his three grown daughters and
their difficulties in communicating at any other time than during
Sunday dinner.  Real characters and real situations are just two of the
reasons to see this handsome (and often hilarious) film.  Easily one of
the best films of the year.
     Super-cute, ultra-low budget comedy about two losers-who-know-it
who want to make a movie just because.  One drives a cab, the other
tends bar, and neither knows the first thing about filmmaking.  The
joke, of course, is that these two New York slackers (Eric Shaeffer and
Donal Lardner Ward) really *did* make a movie, this movie, without even
knowing what it would be about.
     Watch for a handful of cameos, including Phoebe Cates who had the
fortune/misfortune of hailing Shaeffer's cab.  In real life and in the
movie.
     Mildly diverting road-comedy stars Terence Stamp (BILLY BUDD,
SUPERMAN II) as one of three drag queens traveling across the outback
in a bus named Priscilla.  Aussie filmmaker Stephan Elliott doesn't
pace his film fast enough to keep your seat from squirming--that is,
unless you find the idea of men dressed as women dressed as Abba
hilarious.
     Lip-synching aside, the scenery is good and Terence Stamp is
always worth watching.  Especially when delivering droll lines like
"what is this, outback with Benny Hill?"  Stay through the closing
credits.
     Holy Oedipus Rex!  This hilarious dark dark dark dark comedy won
the Audience Award at this year's Sundance Film Festival and with good
reason.  No summer has ever been tougher (or funnier) than what
20-year-old Ray (Jeremy Davies) goes through while taking care of Mom
(Alberta Watson) while home from college.
     Low-budget to be sure, be redeemed fourfold by a super script and
sharp performances by Davies, Watson, and Benjamin Hendrickson (as the
father).  Title refers to masturbation, one of the many taboos blithely
broken by first-time writer/director David O. Russell.
     So what if Meryl Streep wants to play Linda Hamilton?  THE RIVER
WILD is one of those pulse-pounding, preposterous thrillers that works
best with your brain almost entirely on hold.  That way you can sit
back and smile and think of all the ways that you'd do things
differently if *you* were the person on the raft with your family and a
killer and not a banjo in sight.
     The photography of the trip is quite good and the river certainly
looks wild.  Too bad bad guy Kevin Bacon never really gets into the
act.  He can be creepy when he wants to be.  Streep and (David)
Strathairn are both fine.  From the director of BAD INFLUENCE and THE
HAND THAT ROCKS THE CRADLE.
     KING KONG remade as a baseball comedy!?  Feel-good film stars
Albert Brooks as a veteran scout (for the Yankees) who discovers "the
greatest player he's ever seen" pitching 100mph fastballs in Mexico.
Too bad the talent (AIRHEADS survivor Brendan Fraiser) needs to play
with a shrink before he can play ball.
     Though the tone veers a little too close to drama at times, the
jokes are strong and the leads are good.  Fraiser's a charm, while
Brooks overacts to the max.  And who'd he steal that straw fedora
from?  Darren McGavin?  Walter Matthau?
     Cameos include Bob Costas, Tony Bennett, and George Steinbrenner.

Title
Review for White Squall (1996)
     DEAD SAILORS SOCIETY is the unfortunately appropriate description
of this aspiring, real-life drama that ends up, well, all wet.  The
plot, based on the true 1961 incident, centers on the floating school-
ship Albatross.  Its crew of thirteen high-schoolers have signed-on for
a year of sailing 'n' schooling, just as *we* have signed-on for a grand
coming-of-age tale set against the allure and adventure of the high
seas.  Unfortunately for us *and* them, neither gets what they expected.
     WHITE SQUALL is a confounding film.  The visuals are great, as only
Ridley Scott (ALIEN, BLADE RUNNER) can render them; equally good is Jeff
Bridges, who gives a strong, salty performance as the no-nonsense
Captain.  "If we don't have order, we don't have anything," he notes and
to which somebody behind the camera should've taken seriously.  For
starters, all the young dudes look alike.  There's nary a distinguishing
trait between them, other than the fact that they all look like Tom
Cruise.  The passage of time is never properly charted, also a problem,
nor is the awesome "strength of the sea" given it's proper due.  That
is, until the climax.
     What happens to the Albatross-- and after someone shoots a dolphin,
no less!-- could be an outtake from Robert Shaw's speech in JAWS.  Man
goes out on boat with three crew and thirteen lads; only eleven return.
The villain-- impressively rendered inside an indoor tank-- is a freak
meteorological phenom called a "white squall," which hits near the end
of the film.  Water water everywhere and soon the surviving captain and
crew are blubbering and bonding before a condemning Coast Guard
tribunal.  It's a stupid, sappy ending to an already waterlogged movie.
Arrggh.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
MOVIE HELL is on the Web!  http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Hamlet (1996)
    So, you have to see this one in Chapel Hill, at the Carolina, and
they're conveniently charging $7.50 for all shows.  Price gouging is
what it's called and, if you arrive early, you'll have time to (a.) get
incensed and (b.) deliver a monologue about it in the lobby.  I just
took my seat, as I was already spent from having an aside on Franklin
Street, after a traffic ticket informed me that the Elvismobile was
parked approximately one inch into a towing zone.  Sigh.  I can report
that $32.50 buys a lot of movie.  Four hours worth, actually, with the
complete text, a zany international cast, Elsinore imagined as a bright
and sunny palace, and Kenneth Branagh, Mr. Shakespeare himself, spitting
spittle as the peroxide-blonde brooder.  (His Hamlet is quite the
shouter.) The twenty-minute intermission is helpful, though, by the end,
I wanted even more movie.  I wanted more action, more sprawl, and more
visual space, especially in the flashbacks and exterior scenes.  I
wanted to witness Ophelia's final fate, for example, and see more of the
Norwegians, who storm the castle at the end of the story.  Mr. B.  has
made a big play at a big play, but, you know, it still doesn't feel like
a big-enough movie.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC, USA, Earth
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
I'm also on the Web!  http://www.pagesz.net/~legeros/

Title
Review for Quick and the Dead, The (1995)
(Tri Star)
Directed by     Sam Raimi (DARKMAN, ARMY OF DARKNESS)
Written by      Simon Moore
Cast            Sharon Stone, Gene Hackman, Russell Crowe, Leonardo DiCaprio
Running Time    105 minutes
MPAA Rating     "R" (presumably for violence and language)
Reviewed at     General Cinemas at Pleasant Valley, Raleigh (11FEB95)
     In Sam Raimi's THE QUICK AND THE DEAD, Sharon Stone stars as a
squinty eyed gunslinger--a Woman of Few Words, if you will, who rides
into the town of Redemption (!) to compete in a quick-draw contest.
She's really there to kill the man who runs the town (Gene Hackman),
but don't tell him that.  He's busy trying to wreak revenge on his
former partner (Russell Crowe).  And don't mess with The Kid (Leonardo
DiCaprio), a cocky upstart who also wants a shot at playing Quickdraw
McGraw.
     THE QUICK AND THE DEAD forces the question of why we like to watch
westerns.  With so many cliches bumping heads--including Pat Hingle as
a bartender!--we know exactly how the story is going to be played out.
We know the speeches, and the stances, and the fact that the bad guys
are going to get it, and get it good.  That's why we're here, and
that's why this film is so disappointing--because it tries to change
what's tried and true.
     The story softens our hero by giving her feelings and that's a
mistake.  Instead of the standard "slow-burn," where Stone would brood
for a couple hours before killing her quarry, we have watch her wallow
in self-doubt and fear.  Her "human side" robs the story of strength.
No longer does the story have a solid center and, so, the film
immediately falls flat.  Give Ms. Stone credit, though, for *trying* to
be tough.  She's cute and, with less dialogue, may have been something
worth watching.
     Cult director Sam Raimi (DARKMAN, ARMY OF DARKNESS) tries to
compensate by digging deep into his bag of tricks.  He gives us cool
shots and wacky special effects, such as huge bullet holes that let
sunshine through.  He's clearly in his element, but the story structure
works against him.  Flashbacks are used to flesh out Stone's character
and they disrupt the momentum.  What was wrong with just showing what
happened at the beginning of the film?  Open with a flashback and you
*still* have suspense, Sam.
     The remaining technical credits are all aces.  THE QUICK AND THE
DEAD looks great.

Title
Review for Contact (1997)
     Reliable Robert Zemeckis (FORREST GUMP) directs this glossy, easy-
to-follow adaptation of Carl Sagan's science-fiction novel, about a
radio astronomer (Jodie Foster) who intercepts the first intergalactic
e-mail addressed to the planet Earth, and then finds herself at the
center of controversies political, religious, and scientific.  (As the
trailer so kindly gives away, the alien-o-gram contains a blueprint for
a transport device.  And you can guess who has a First Class ticket.)
Closer to a character study than an epic sci-fi flick, CONTACT has a
little of something for everyone.  There's action, with people running
around a small lab, shouting technical terms and excitedly staring at
computer screens.  (Who knew that radio astronomy involved so much
adrenaline?)  There's romance, involving a hunky religious scholar
(Matthew McConaughey).  There's intrigue (of the White House variety),
some real suspense (how about those countdown sequences!), a couple of
science lessons (hey, you learn about prime numbers *and* Occam's
Razor!), a surface-level discussion of faith versus proof, and, even,
the occasional hint of hilarity.  (Check out the lunatic fringe that
sets up camp outside Cape Canaveral.  I spotted an Elvis impersonator.)
     And there's so much more:  great photography, exceptional effects,
a ready-made supporting cast (James Woods acting antagonistic, Angela 
Bassett being stern, etc.), loads of convenient dramatic invention (look,
there's someone on the gantry who shouldn't be there!), and cameos by, I
believe, CNN's entire on-air staff.  Everything fits together exactly as
it should and, at times, almost painfully perfunctorily so.  (Is this
the most exciting boring movie of the summer?  Or does that distinction
belong to FACE/OFF?)  Yup, everything fits together very nice and neat,
except for the ending, which, depending upon your sensibilities, is
either a major or minor botch.  (I found it as distracting as Foster's
narration during her magic carpet ride.)  When all is said and done, no
one in the film, including Foster's seemingly smart cookie, thinks to
ask the obvious and most logically scientific response to the hubbub:
"repeat the damn experiment and see if you get the same results."  Sigh.
Well, if nothing else, CONTACT is a summer movie that (a.) makes you
think and (b.) makes you think about the scientific method and, hell,
that's more brain power than you've probably used in the last six weeks.
And you *do* get to see stellar sights, such as the sculpted profiles of
McConaughey and Foster, when they turn away from the camera to kiss.
Have you ever seen such perfect noses?

Title
Review for Primal Fear (1996)
     A densely plotted, poorly paced adaptation of the William Diehl
best seller, PRIMAL FEAR does have *one* thing going for it:  the cast
is *very* handsome.  Richard Gere, in one of his good roles, as a high-
profile Chicago defense attorney; Laura Linney (CONGO) as the prosecutor
he once dated; Andre Braugher (TV's "Homicide") as his investigative
assistant; John Mahoney as the state attorney he antagonizes; and the
list goes on.
     They all meet in court, after the brutal murder of the city's
beloved archbishop yields a single suspect:  a soft-spoken altar boy
(played with surprising conviction by newcomer Edward Norton Hey
Ralph!).  Despite a few faces that don't register-- neither Frances
McDormand's psychiatrist nor Alfre Woodard's no-nonsense judge make an
impression-- it's fun to watch so many good actors knock-around on
screen.  Too bad that award-winning television director Gregory Hoblit
doesn't know where to go with it.
     As a potboiler thriller-- or, even, as a decent courtroom drama--
PRIMAL FEAR is just too slow.  Despite an enormous amount of plotting,
the film lacks any real sense of urgency.  Very few scenes *move*.  (You
may even fall asleep!) And, as a character study, PRIMAL FEAR is just
too murky.  Gere's character is a fantastic creation:  a hotshot lawyer
with principals and, ah, convictions.  The problem is that we're never
shown how the events in the film affect *him*.  Instead of, say, a coda
that indicates growth, change, or awareness, all we get are a few
closing shots of him outdoors, standing alone.  What's the point?
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
MOVIE HELL is on the Web!  http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Sweet Hereafter, The (1997)
    Ian Holm (THE FIFTH ELEMENT, BIG NIGHT) stars in this quiet, quirky
Canadian drama about a remote British Columbia community, a school bus
accident that kills a chunk of their children, and the ready-to-sue
ambulance-chaser (Holm) who arrives in short order.  Writer/director
Atom Egoyan (EXOTICA), adapting from the novel by Russell Banks, con-
trasts the town's collective grief with Holm's character's struggle to
accept the loss of his own child-- a drug-addicted daughter that he
can't keep from loving, no matter how many times she breaks his heart.
Heavy stuff, but Egoyan has a few tricks up his sleeve to keep the po-
tentially wrenching drama at a discretionary distance.  (The non-linear
story structure, with its interwoven flashbacks, in one such device.) 
A remarkably centered performance by Holm is the centerpiece of this
absorbing and, at times, haunting film.  (I was moved, but not to tears.
Then again, I'm not a parent, either.)  Gorgeous winter photography,
too, by Paul Sarossy.  With Sarah Polley, Bruce Greenwood, Tom McCamus,
Gabrielle Rose, Arsinee Khanjian, SPANKING THE MONKEY's Alberta Watson,
and a surprisingly menacing Maury Chaykin.

Title
Review for Intersection (1994)
Directed by Mark Rydell
Starring Richard Gere, Sharon Stone, and Lolita Davidovich.
     The sole virtue of INTERSECTION, the high-profile, low-interest
remake of the 1970 French drama LES CHOSE DE LA VIE, is one, bonafide
great hook.
     Said hook comes at the beginning and it's ripe for the picking:
Vancouver architect Vincent Eastman (Gere) is about to have a nasty
collision with either a minibus, a logging truck, or both.  Mere
moments before the impact, Vincent's life flashes before his eyes.
     Unfortunately, what passes for Vincent's life is already
dead-on-arrival.
     The story goes that Vincent is recently separated from wife and
business partner Sally (Stone).  He's living with a journalist
(Davidovich), but he hasn't resolved his feelings for either woman.
He's sitting on the proverbial fence and the film--courtesy of
imbedded flashbacks--shows how he got on the fence in the first
place.
     As accurately as INTERSECTION portrays a man in transition between
spouses, the story makes for lousy drama.  The characters are
unflattering and there's no passion to the proceedings.  This is "carpe
dullem"--seize the exit!
     With such a who-cares story, the only remaining allure is in the
window-dressing.  But even the bells and whistles get botched in this
one.
     The British Columbia locales are nice and safe and maybe too
clean.  The lighting and cinematography is also very pretty, which
helps to scrub away any grit from the surface of this story.  Coupled
to such a too-handsome cast, it's hard to sell this drama as
believable.
     Of the three leads, only Stone does anything worth watching.  She
gets a great ice-queen role that may win her notice.  Even if her
scenes are scarce.
     Put it all together and you get a film that seems trapped in a
bizarre nether-realm between safe and sorry.
     With a little more ham, this could've been a great Bad Movie.  A
contrived confrontation between Davidovich and Stone already sticks out
like a sore thumb.  Other close-to-camp moments include Landau's "time
is short" speech, an obvious stunt-double wrecking Gere's car, and
Davidovich's "delivery" of the Year's Best Breast Joke.
     The filmmakers could also have gone the other way.  With a little
narrative juggling and some clearer characterization, they could've
refined this mess into something memorable.

Title
Review for Rock, The (1996)
(Hollywood)
Directed by    Michael Bay
Written by     Douglas S. Cook, John Hensleigh, David Weisberg
Cast           Sean Connery, Nicholas Cage, Ed Harris, David 
               Morse, Michael Beihn, William Forsythe
MPAA Rating    "R" (presumably for language and violence)
Running Time   129 minutes
Reviewed at    General Cinemas at Pleasant Valley, Raleigh, NC (7JUN96)
     Now *this* is more like it.  Soaked in testosterone, star-powered by
a trio of A-list actors, and stylish steered by 24-year-old BAD BOYS
director Michael Bay, THE ROCK delivers the sort of all-out sensory
assault that this year's summer season has been in dire need of. 
Producers Don Simpson-- who died this spring and to whom the film is
dedicated to-- and Jerry Bruckheimer (TOP GUN, BEVERLY HILL COP) know that
nothing succeeds like excess.  They've pushed THE ROCK to be their
hardest, fastest, and loudest blockbuster yet.  The results are just that: 
big, bold, immensely entertaining, *and* of surprising depth.  A canny
combination of popular genres, THE ROCK is equal parts caper flick and
buddy pic, mixed with bits and pieces of political conspiracy and
secret-agent stuff.  All shaken, not stirred, of course.  (Imagine an
Oliver Stone-scripted DIE HARD sequel starring James Bond and you're
halfway there.)
     The plot introduces a disgruntled Marine general (Ed Harris) who has
devised an elaborate hostage scheme for getting money to the families of
servicemen who were disowned by the government after certain secret
missions.  He and a crack group of soldiers steal a set of gas-filled
rockets, infiltrate Alcatraz island in the San Francisco Bay, and threaten
mass death and destruction if their demands are not met.  The feds respond
by sending in a SEAL team accompanied by two peculiar characters:  an FBI
chemical weapons specialist (Nicholas Cage) who has more experience with a
guitar than a gun and a former Alcatraz inmate (Sean Connery) with a
rather unusual history.  One knows about rockets; the other knows about
"the Rock."  (Connery's character is a former British intelligence agent,
wink wink, who stole some of J. Edgar Hoover's secrets and has since been
held, without trial, in various maximum- security prisons for the last
thirty years.)
     Before they land on the island-- via underwater transport in a nod to
THUNDERBALL-- both Cage and Connery get their fair share of horseplay. 
Cage is at the center of a nifty bomb diffusion/poison gas sequence near
the beginning of the film, while Connery later performs an ingenious
escape from a high-rise penthouse.  (Oh, if only Pierce Brosnan were so
dashing.) Both Cage and Connery end up in a spectacular car chase, with
one in a "borrowed" Ferrari and the other driving a civilian (!) Humvie. 
The director films much of the chase in close-up, which allows us to see
such dizzying details as a row of parking meters that disintegrates into a
cloud of coins.  (He also knows when to pull back the camera.  Like when a
trolley car goes airborne.) By the time Cage and Connery get to the
island-- to play cat-and-mouse with the bad guys-- the more faint-hearted
viewers may find themselves already exhausted! 
     The strengths of THE ROCK are many:  the contrast between Cage's
mild-mannered intensity and Connery's quicker, more-unpredictable wit; Ed
Harris barking orders in his customarily clipped and no- nonsense fashion;
the furrowed brows of David Morse, Michael Biehn, and William Forsythe as
supporting players in the best boys-club cast since CRIMSON TIDE;
cinematographer John Schwartzman's gorgeous bronze and blue hues; and, of
course, director Michael Bay's remarkable use of quick-cutting.  (You can
probably count on two hands the number of shots that last longer than five
seconds.) The film's flashy, in-your-face-and-you-better-pay-attention
style of narrative may turn off some viewers.  Those who can't see the
subtle differences between "10" and "11" on a volume dial, for example,
may wish to skip this one.  THE ROCK roars and for obvious reasons.  Just
as we need the juice to gloss over the various preposterous plot points,
we also need the juice to ensure that *this* summer's thrill ride is more
exciting than last summer's.  And the summer before.  And the summer
before that one... 
--
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Once Upon a Time... When We Were Colored (1996)
     Television actor Tim Reid makes his directorial debut in this 
pleasant, but s-l-o-w story of a black baby born in the cotton 
fields of 1946 Mississippi.  Reid has created a gentle giant of  
period detail that deserves praise for, among other things, such 
remarkable restraint.  (There's no gratuitous racism or violence, 
here.  Given the potentially incendiary nature of the subject 
material, I call that an accomplishment.)  Some have labeled this 
film as "sanitized," which I don't agree with.  ONCE UPON A TIME... 
is very real and, unfortunately, very slow.  The lack of narrative 
focus makes for a particularly long sit.  Stick with it, though, 
and the second hour gets (a bit) better.  Filmed in North Carolina, 
from the book by Clifton L. Taulbert, and with the exceptional cast 
of Al Freeman Jr., Phylicia Rashad, Leon, Paula Kelly, Bernie 
Casey, Isaac Hayes, Polly Bergen, Taj Mahal, Richard Roundtree, and 
many others.  
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Truth About Cats & Dogs, The (1996)
     This likable romantic comedy stars Janeane Garofalo (BYE BYE
LOVE, REALITY BITES) as a talk-show pet doctor who pretends to be
her blonde-model friend (Uma Thurman) after a charming caller (Ben
Chaplin) asks her out on a date.  (Think "Cyrano" Lite.) Mildly
hilarious before it descends into "touchy-feely" tedium, THE TRUTH
ABOUT CATS AND DOGS is hampered by the casting of two equally
attractive leading ladies.  For the conflict to work as it's
written, the characters need to be a real "Mutt and Jeff" pair.
However, Ms. Garofalo is easily as appealing as (if not more than)
Ms. Thurman.  (If Uma looks less-ravishing than usual, I'd blame the
terrible 'do that she wears!  Woof!) Director Michael Lehmann
(HEATHERS) tries to make Janeane look frumpy, but to no avail.  She
shines even brighter than her co-star and that's a problem for
believability.  (Maybe a better title would be THE TRUTH ABOUT
WOMEN'S SELF ESTEEM?) That said, Janeane, Uma, and Ben Chaplin have
a very good chemistry together.  They make this a trip to the vet
that's arguably worth taking, even for those of us who gag at all
the canine- and feline-related humor.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Copycat (1995)
(WB)
Directed by   Jon Amiel
Written by    Ann Biderman and David Madsen
Cast          Sigourney Weaver, Holly Hunter, Dermot Mulroney,
              William McNamara, Will Patton, Harry Connick Jr.
MPAA Rating   "R" (presumably for violence, language, and gore)
Running Time  123 minutes
Reviewed at   General Cinemas at Pleasant Valley, Raleigh, (27OCT95)
     In the new thriller COPYCAT, Sigourney Weaver plays Helen Hunter,
a criminal psychologist whose specialty is serial killers.  That is,
whose specialty *was*.  She's since retired, after an attack thirteen
months ago left her an agoraphobic alcoholic.  (She can't leave her
heavily-reinforced home without a drink and a panic attack, and not
necessarily in that order.)  Into Helen's protected world steps a
diminutive detective (*Holly* Hunter), who needs her help in solving a
string of brutal murders.  (Is there any other kind?)  As it turns out,
there's another demented, young white male on the loose.  Except this
one is imitating the most infamous killers in history.
     Sitting-duck slasher pics don't come much more effective than
this.  Directory Jon Amiel (SOMMERSBY) keeps twisting the screws,
combining a stalker's POV in almost every other shot, with plenty of
throbbing music, and gratuitous scenes of the killer planning his
crimes.  (Ladies, please trim your fingernails before attending with
your dates.)  All very effective devices that are dressed-up
considerably by screenwriters Ann Bidermand and David Madsen.  Their
story is intelligent, though way too overplotted to be logical.**  The
psychology adds up okay, even if this is really just a big boo-house at
heart.  Where SEVEN was stylish, COPYCAT is shameless.  Where MANHUNTER
was moody, COPYCAT is manipulative.  And so on.
     The casting is choice.  After three ALIEN bug-hunts, Sigourney
Weaver certainly can play peril.  Her foil, Holly Hunter, is
surprisingly effective, despite her small size and smaller voice.
"Have the mice stopped screaming, Clarice?"  The partner is played a
solid Dermot Mulroney.  (Together, they patrol the streets of San
Francisco as "Monahan and Getz."  Such great cop names!)  In a
substantially smaller role, Harry Connick Jr. is a hoot as a backwoods
bad guy whose resemblance to Jim Varney suggests the title for the
inevitable sequel:  ERNEST GOES A-KILLIN'.
**- The audience has too much time to wonder about such things as why   
    Weaver's character doesn't own a gun.  Or, where and on what 
    planet did she find such a fast modem for her computer?  Or, if 
    anybody else thinks that Weaver could pass for Hugh Grant's older 
    sister?

Title
Review for Peacemaker, The (1997)
(Dreamworks)
Directed by     Mimi Leder
Written by      Michael Schiffer
Cast            George Clooney, Nicole Kidman, Marcel Iures, Gary
                Werntz, Holt McCallany, Alexander Baluev, Rene Medvesek,
                Michael Boatman, Armin Mueller-Stahl
MPAA Rating     "R" (presumably for profanity and violence)
Running Time    123 minutes
Reviewed at     General Cinemas at Pleasant Valley, Raleigh NC (24SEP97)
     The first film from Dreamworks SKG-- you know, that studio from
those guys-- is, well, one, long chase scene.  Nicole Kidman and George
Clooney go through the requisite motions as a pair of nuclear weapons
experts, trotting the globe in search of stolen Russian warheads, one of
which ends up in a Bosnian backpack, bound for the Big Apple.  Kidman,
as a brunette (!) and looking all of 23 years old, plays the presiden-
tial adviser who's in charge, while Clooney bobs along as a Special
Forces officer who pretends she isn't.  And while neither delivers the
star performance that's expected, they do have enough chemistry to keep
their scenes interesting.  (Just ignore their idiotic repartee at the
outset.  Once people begin to die around them, they shut up and get ser-
ious.  And, believe it or not, actually grieve.)
     More importantly, both are able to stay in step with director Mimi
Leder's relentlessly brisk pacing.  This is a movie that *moves*, man,
and isn't afraid to sacrifice such trivialities as character develop-
ment, plot complexity, or humor.  (The grim business of counter-terror-
ism is periodically lightened-- a "Baywatch" joke here, an American
Online gag there.)  At least the action is terrific.  Four superbly
staged sequences are the real reasons to plop down $6.50:  the nighttime
hijacking of a moving choo choo, a car chase/demolition derby/Mercedes
Benz product plug, a helicopter attack on a truckload of bad guys, and,
the grand finale, where every available agency converges on a handful of
Manhattan city blocks during rush hour.  It's chaos of the finest order,
marred only by a Dreaded Flashback to the villain's past.  And, of
course, the LOL realization that the bomb's ten-minute timer has been
ticking for, oh, at least twenty minutes.  Heh.

Title
Review for Austin Powers: International Man of Mystery (1997)
    This silly, sloppy, psychedelic spy-movie spoof stars and was writ-
ten by Mike Myers, who plays both the title character and his arch-
nemesis, Dr. Evil.  Both have been reawakened from suspended animation,
to do battle in and begin adjusting to the nineties. (Powers has prob-
lems with political correctness, Baby, while Evil has to adjust his
megalomaniac musings to accommodate inflation, ozone depletion, and
Prince Charles' babe-o-matic ears.) The credits sequence is pretty
groovy, I'll give it that, but the rest of the movie contains no more
than, oh, twenty minutes of bankable hilarity.  The jokes are bad, the
timing worse, and only the occasional sequence stands out, such as Myers
walking around in the buff, with various objects in the frame concealing
his naughty bits.  (Okay, I'll admit it:  I also howled at a sequence
set in a public restroom, with Powers fending off an assassin's attack
and Tom Arnold in the next stall, thinking that he's hearing a struggle
of a different kind.) The character of Austin Powers is, for all pract-
ical purposes, another classic Mike Myers' creation, but damned if his
script has a clue what to do with him.

Title
Review for My Best Friend's Wedding (1997)
     More gratuitous garbage-- ah, the joys of summer-- this one a re-
lentlessly cheery romantic comedy that entertains with as much reckless
abandon any of those bloated boy toys, such as SPEED 2 or CON AIR, only
with broader laughs and big, goofy grins in place of the bombs, bullets,
and other things that go boom in the night.  Julia Roberts-- remember
her?-- plays a neurotic restaurant critic who, for no apparent reason,
decides to sabotage the wedding of her best friend (Dermot Mulroney).
See, they made a pact, years ago, to marry if each was still single at
age 28.  So, on the very day that she recalls this fact, just like that,
out the blue, he calls, not to propose, but, rather, to tell of his
*own*, few-days-away wedding.  This drives her nuts and for reasons that
the film never bothers to explain.  Worse, the bride-to-be (Cameron
Diaz, playing a prep princess) just up and starts loving her on the
spot, putting Roberts' character in an increasingly uncomfortable,
increasingly jealous, and, heh, increasingly *advantageous* position.
(There's even a cat fight.  And in a ballpark restroom, no less!)
     With Ms. Roberts beaming brighter than she's been in any number of
years, a frothy supporting cast that doesn't frown much, either, a huge,
high-dollar wedding ceremony at the end, and enough overall sunshine to
blind any Batpatron unlucky enough to stumble into the wrong theater, MY
BEST FRIEND'S WEDDING is the perfect summer movie to laugh, coo, and get
all warm and fuzzy with.  Needless to say, I didn't buy a minute of it,
mostly because there's no core character motivation for Roberts' char-
acter.  Bam, she's racing to the airport, cigarette in hand and mayhem
on her mind.  (Do I recall a scene from the trailer, where Roberts is
rehearsing the reasons she can't get married, thinking that her friend
is calling to cash in on their pact?) Sure, she's funny, falling off
beds and knocking over dinner trays.  Sure, we feel her pain-of-the-
moment, though, really, what kind of best friend sabotages the other
one's wedding?  And then she pauses to flash that mega-watt smile and
everything is forgotten, except for how sore your bottom might be.  (Or,
as I noticed, how much her voice, over an answering machine, sounds like
Mary Tyler Moore's.)
     Director P.J. Hogan (MURIEL'S WEDDING), unafraid to try anything,
includes several musical numbers, ranging from the insipid (doo-wop
girls in wedding gowns over the opening credits) to the excruciatingly
insipid (an everybody-sings rendition of "I Say A Little Prayer," com-
plete with M. Emmet Walsh singing bass, if you can believe it.)  What
else helps pass the time?  Oh, there's the occasional oddball moment--
Roberts entering a plain-English Internet e-mail address, the actress
behind the wheel of a "borrowed" bread van, and her quiet moment with
PRIVATE PART's Pig Vomit, actor Paul Giamatti as a bellboy.  Let's
see... Cameron Diaz croaking karoke is a confirmed comic high point, as
is a fifteen-minute excursion into farce, when Roberts' character's
drop-dead dashing gay editor (Pierce Brosnan lookalike Rupert Everett)
pretends to be her fiance.  His attempt at public affection may well be
worth the price of admission.  Sorry about the hand.

Title
Review for Jackal, The (1997)
     THE JACKAL is a high-tech, low-believability thriller, starring
Bruce Willis as the title character, an expert assassin and master of
many disguises, who's contracted by a Russian mob boss for a hit on the
head of the F.B.I.  One of the few who can actually identify the Big J.
is a former I.R.A. operative (Richard Gere), imprisoned in the U.S. and
ready to cut a deal if it means a chance to get out and about and maybe
escape, or see his old girlfriend (Steven Tyler lookalike Mathilda May),
or, hell, just be awarded a transfer to a minimum-security prison.  So,
the guy with the good looks and giggle-inducing accent is paired with a
pair of agents, one from Washington (Sidney Poiter) and the other from
Moscow (Diane Venora).  And a-travellin' they go, trotting the continent
for clues, while their target gets ever-closer to his quarry.
     As a loose and largely unremarkable remake of THE DAY OF THE
JACKAL, the film has a few things going for it.  Let's see...  several
of the action sequences are legitimate pulse-pounders, even if they
rarely serve the story well.  The scenery and spacious sets are also
quite eye-catching.  (However dumb the story becomes, you *do* feel like
you're going places:  Moscow, Helsinki, London, Montreal, and, in one
head-scratching shot of Willis aboard an Outer Banks ferry, a trip from
Chicago to the suburbs of D.C. by way of Morehead City!) And then
there's Bruce, the coolest cat on the block and the only guy in the
movie who has a pair.  (Gere looks good and that's about it.  Poitier
brings grace, but not enough weight.  Only Ms. Venora displays the
requisite intensity required of their roles.)
     On the suck side, the finale runs long, the plot has too many
holes, and the tone, at times, skirts dangerously close to camp.  (The
high low point?  I gotta go with Bad Death Scene #1.  You may need to
leave the theater for that one.) And, let's see, some of the effects are
weak, such as a blue-screen bit set in a subway tunnel.  (But doesn't
Gere grimace convincingly?) Oh, and, Heaven help us, there's even a
stranger-in-the-house sequence-- the same scene I swear saw in SWITCH-
BACK, KISS THE GIRLS, and I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER.  Sigh.  Well,
at least Willis' disguises are fun.  His portly Canuck is a sight, eh?,
but be back from the bathroom before Bruce hits a gay bar as a frisky
swinger.  Even if it (and its follow-up scene) fails to amuse, at least
you'll know what they're talking about, when the inevitable outrage
erupts.  Directed by Michael Caton-Jones (ROB ROY).

Title
Review for Devil's Own, The (1997)
     Frankly speaking, any $90M movie starring Brad Pitt and Harrison
Ford should be more exciting than this one.  Whatever the Hell the title
means, the plot is deceptively simple:  an Irish terrorist (Pitt) takes
refuge in New York City and moves into the basement of an unsuspecting
beat cop (Ford) and his family.  And then the latter finds out about the
former.  To the credit of director Alan J.  Pakula and however many
writers went without mention, this movie doesn't take the easy way out.
The hoary cliches are kept to a minimum, the violence is terse and to
the point, and each character is given a fair amount of breathing room.
So, what's the problem?  Well, it just ain't exciting enough.  THE
DEVIL'S OWN never reaches the emotional heights suggested by either the
story *or* the star power.  Sure, there's some suspense.  And an in-
triguing moral conflict.  And the slight pleasure of seeing Indiana
Jones as the father of three girls.  But when we get down to brass
tacks, and the characters have to confront each other, there's just not
enough punch to their punches.
Mike Legeros - Movie Hell
legeros@pagesz.net - http://www.n-vision.com/hell/

Title
Review for Liar Liar (1997)
(Universal)
Directed by     Tom Shadyac
Written by      Paul Guay and Stephen Mazur
Cast            Jim Carrey, Maura Tierney, Justin Cooper, Jennifer
                Tilley, Cary Elwes, Amanda Donohoe, Swoosie Kurtz
MPAA Rating     "PG-13"
Running Time    87 minutes
Reviewed at     Mission Valley Cinemas, Raleigh, NC (19MAR97)
     This crowd-pleasing comedy-fantasy stars Jim Carrey as a lawyer who
must tell the truth for 24 hours.  His son makes a birthday wish and,
poof, magic happens.  Just like a Penny Marshall movie.  And, because
dad is played by Plastic Man, he can't simply speak the truth.  He has
to shout it, or spit it, or contort his body to express it.  LIAR, LIAR
is as predictable as its one-joke premise suggests, with Carrey on only
a slightly shorter leash than usual.  Though the occasional bit is side-
splitting-- a board-room roast, a violent double-take or two, and the
definitive answer to "how's it hangin'?"-- there's little here that we
haven't seen (or heard) before.  Well, okay, he's never tried to tug at
our hearts, which is what happens at the end, easily the worst part of
the movie.  Thank God for the outtake reel, rolled over the closing
credits.
     LIAR, LIAR was screened at Mission Valley Cinemas, in Raleigh.
Fifteen minutes passed before the correct lens was installed.  And the
rude people in the row behind me were expectedly hostile, when I sug-
gested that they continue their conversation after the movie.  But they
*did* shut up.
--
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC, USA, Earth
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
I'm also on the Web!  http://www.pagesz.net/~legeros/

Title
Review for Shall We Dansu? (1996)
     A bit of a long sit.  This warm and fuzzy feel-gooder from Japan,
about a 42 year-old Tokyo accountant (Koji Yakusho) who reawakens to
life through secretive ballroom lessons, runs about, oh, twenty minutes
too long.  Sure, everyone clapped at the end, but I *do* recall hearing
more than a few people squirming during the protracted finale.  (At the
Rialto, the to-be-replaced squeaky seats are far more telling than any
after-show comments in the lobby.) Even with yawns, a reduced blood flow
below the equator, and the ever-present threat of a knocked-over root
beer bottle, I enjoyed reliving the life-cycle of the partner dancer:
the hesitant attraction to the sport, often the result of a crush on a
better dancer; those painfully awkward initial lessons; mixing and
mingling with other dancers; the get-serious point of no return; the
months of practice for competition or exhibition; the cruel reality and
partner incompatibility; and, of course, the alienation and subsequent
reclamation of a non-dancing spouse.  (To try the latter, just hang out
at the Longbranch for a few months.  Then, tell your sweetie.) If you've
never waltzed, rumbaed, or quick-stepped, this may be the movie that
lands you on the dance floor.  One two three, one two three... 

Title
Review for How to Make an American Quilt (1995)
(Universal)
Directed by    Jocelyn Moorhouse
Written by     Jane Anderson, from the novel by Whitney Otto
Cast           Maya Angelou, Anne Bancroft, Ellen Burstyn, Samantha 
               Mathis, Kate Nelligan, Winona Ryder, Jean Simmons, Lois
               Smith, Alfre Woodard
Running Time   109 Minutes
MPAA Rating    PG-13
Reviewed at    Mission Valley Cinemas, Raleigh, NC (2OCT95)
     With apologies to author and talk-show host Dr. Laura
Schlessinger, a better title for this movie might be SEVEN WOMEN WHO DO
STUPID THINGS TO MESS UP THEIR LIVES.
     Winona Ryder stars as "Finn," a Berkeley grad student who is
spending the summer with her grandmother (Ellen Burstyn) and great aunt
(Anne Bancroft).  She's taking a break from her
boyfriend-turned-fiance, because she's scared, and because she finally
wants to finish her thesis.  Grandma's house is also the longtime home
of a quilting bee, made up of seven women who have all suffered from
the tragedies of love.  Or, at the very least, from the results of bad
decision-making.  They each have a story to tell and they do.  So much,
in fact, that poor Winona and her character's fear of commitment are
practically lost in the shuffle.
     As a naysayer`s portrait of marriage, this spring's MIAMI RHAPSODY
was much funnier.  Sarah Jessica Parker as a bubbly neurotic beats an
angst-ridden Winona any day of the week.  Part of the problem is the
actress; Ms. Ryder still looks like she's in high school and it's a
stretch to think of her thinking such serious thoughts.  (Which she
really doesn't.  The story allows virtually no examination of her
character's feelings about engagement or marriage.  Instead, the plot
provides a silly stud-boy for "Finn" to be distracted by.)
     HOW TO MAKE AN AMERICAN QUILT is a "chick flick" that many may
embrace wholeheartedly.  The story shoots for anecdotal appeal and, in
some ways, succeeds gracefully.  Who can fault the flawless chemistry
between Burstyn and Bancroft?  Or the relaxed pace that so well suits
the, uh, patchwork narrative?  Or the unusual supporting cast that
includes everyone from Rip Torn to Ester Rolle to legendary poet Maya
Angelou?  Go with the flow and you're fine.  (At least until the hokey
final reel, which starts with a stormy, weather-related metaphor,
continues with a character-by-character recap of each woman's story,
and finally ends with fair Winona-- wrapped the a quilt, no less!--
following a crow into an orange grove.  Hilarious!)
     Stand back to think about the movie's message and reasonable doubt
comes into play.  A woman who sleeps with her sister's husband.
Another wife who accepts her husband's philandering.  Another
wife-turned-widow who answers her grief with an affair.  And so on and
so on.  How can we view these characters as anything other than
failures?  When we turn to Winona, with an optimistic look toward youth
and the future, we find *her* character in the arms (and more!) of
another man, because she's too afraid to face her own feelings!
[Insert head shaking.]
     To the credit of all parties involved, HOW TO MAKE AN AMERICAN
QUILT is no less honest than Clint Eastwood's well-received BRIDGES OF
MADISON COUNTY.  Both are warm, well-acted features that return plenty
for anyone willing to just "go with flow."  And what more does a movie
ask, these days, than mere physical attendance?  Go with flow, Sheldon,
and you're fine.  Stop, look, and listen... and you may come away with
a different opinion.

Title
Review for Puppet Masters, The (1994)
     Bring the 1951 novel THE PUPPET MASTERS into present-day and there
should be at least one major character in the course of the story who
chimes in the line "oh, like one of those BODY SNATCHERS movies?"
Unfortunately, not once in 108 minutes does anyone on-screen make a
reference to either Don Siegel's 1956 classic or the two remakes that
followed.  And that's too bad, because no one in THE PUPPET MASTERS
should be acting as seriously as they are.
     Sure, the first forty minutes are ultra-creepy as Donald
Sutherland leads his crack crew of scientists through the "infested"
hamlet of Ambrose, Iowa.  The veteran actor-- who also appeared in the
'78 remake of BODY SNATCHERS-- is appropriately stone-faced while
poking around a town "taken over" by alien parasites.  And, as told
from the scientist's POV for a change, these first few scenes have an
edgy, matter-of-fact feel.
     But as the story wears on and more and more people are
"compromised," Sutherland's stone-face never lifts.  Nor does the
film's.  Instead of fun we get fight scenes, and chase scenes, and one
"runaway" helicopter.  Ugh.  All too much for the scope of this simple,
spooky story.
BOTTOM LINE:  Cut thirty minutes and you'd have something here.

Title
Review for If Lucy Fell (1996)
     A couple years ago, writer/director/actor/ex-cabby Eric Schaeffer,
along with his co-everything pal Donal Lardner Ward, made the very
funny, ultra-low budget MY LIFE'S IN TURNAROUND.  (Actually, one of the
better of films of 1994, as I recall.) The two went on to television--
on "Too Something," on Fox-- and now Schaeffer's back on film, with Ward
nowhere to be found.  Too bad.  This super- sleight New York romantic
comedy could use a helping hand.
     The premise has longtime roomies Schaeffer and Sarah Jessica Parker
(playing a therapist, no less!) vowing to take a dive off the Brooklyn
Bridge if they don't find love by age thirty.  Which is in one month.
Off they go to find romance, which, of course, is right in front them.
Yawn.  There isn't much substance to IF LUCY FELL; the loosely played
laughs come and go, and the emotion behind the romance just isn't there.
If there's a reason to watch this film-- on tape, of course, after
renting MY LIFE'S IN TURNAROUND-- it's to enjoy Schaeffer's endearingly
goofy performance.  He's a natural, even if his movie isn't. 
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
MOVIE HELL is on the Web!  http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for I Like It Like That (1994)
     The first major motion picture made by an African=American woman
(as if that matters), I LIKE IT LIKE THAT is one of the best romantic
comedies you'll see on screen this year.
     The story is about the emotional, sexual, and economic pressures
faced by a lower-income Latino couple; two young people trying to raise
their kids in an aggressive Bronx neighborhood.  "Street life" is
tough, but Lisette and Chino (Velez and Seda) have stayed together for
ten years.  That is, until a citywide blackout changes their lives
forever.
     Writer/director Darnell Martin does the impossible here,
maintaining a breezy, easy tone while incorporating the grim realities
of urban living.  She keeps her film funny-- sometimes *too* funny--
and never turns away the more sensitive subjects. Watch how smoothly
she handles Chino's eleventh-hour encounter with a neighborhood drug
dealer.
     Her film is also very sexual, though neither offensive nor
pornographic (in case you live in North Carolina and happen to be
consuming alcohol at the time of viewing).  The opening sequence, for
example, centers on Chico's, ahem, "staying power."

Title
Review for Fire Down Below (1997)
     Ah, the refreshing vapidity of a Steven Seagal movie.  In the best
brain cleaner since SPEED 2: CRUISE CONTROL, Mr. Squinty squares off
against an evil mining magnate (Kris Kristofferson) whose illegally
dumped toxic waste is killing fish, sickening children, and inflaming
the testosterone of every grown man this side of southeastern Kentucky.
The first hour is pretty bad, with Seagal's EPA agent attempting to
infiltrate a small mining town as a church sponsored handyman whose work
attire inexplicably includes designer black-leather jackets.  He tries
to blend in, making friends with the locals and only kicking their asses
when provoked.  (Obviously intending to *instruct* as well as entertain,
Seagal demonstrates the fine art of redneck whupping in a *variety* of
locations:  lumberyard, city street, etc.)  The second hour, however, is
where the *really* awful fun begins.  How about Marg Helgenberg's love-
interest, a spinster (!) outcast (!!) beekeeper (!!!) whose overprotec-
tive brother becomes increasingly psychotic?  Or the Bubba-falls-down
fight sequence, set in a pool hall, where ol' Stone Face's fists o' fury
are filmed in fast motion!?  Or, my favorite-- and the last in a long
line of canyon-spanning logic leaps-- Seagal taking his final shot at
the villain and then walking away, completely ignoring the accompanying
FBI agent who was shot in the gut a few second before!?  Hilarious.
With appearances by a bunch of country music folk, including Mark Col-
lie, Randy Travis, Patsy and Peggy Lynn, Travis Tritt, and Marty Stuart,
who picks along with Stevie in one scene.  And who was the guy that
walked away from the poker game?  He looked familiar, too.

Title
Review for Apollo 13 (1995)
     Director Ron Howard makes nice, fuzzy movies like BACKDRAFT and
THE PAPER.  They're "human" films, with an emphasis on gung-ho over
grit.  Cast in point: the absorbing APOLLO 13, which recounts the
real-life problems of a 1970 moon shot that left three astronauts
(played by Tom Hanks, Kevin Bacon, and Bill Paxton) stranded in space.
Though a bit too much in places, the story of how NASA got its boys
back home is some of the best dram you'll likely see this year.
     The core story, with its fine acting and great special effects, is
the draw here.  The characters could be a bit more human, or, at the
very least, Paxton could've cried "we're all gonna die, man!"  (THE
RIGHT STUFF is still a better portrait of these pioneers.)  There is
one good in-joke: Roger Corman has a cameo as a congressman.  If the
three guys in the capsule don't have much in the way of personality,
said deficiency never gets in the way of the action.  The efforts of
the NASA guys on the ground (spearheaded by a cool Ed Harris) gives
fresh meaning to the idea of "old-fashioned American ingenuity."
     The rest of APOLLO 13 is all overdone, of course, with Kathleen
Quinlan (as Hanks' astronaut's wife) spending all of her time looking
distressed, while James Horner's string-section tries very hard to
overpower the DTS Digital sound effects.  Sigh.

Title
Review for Delicate Art of the Rifle, The (1997)
     THE DELICATE ART OF THE RIFLE has been billed an "action adventure"
by our local newspaper, "The News and Observer."  I'd place the locally
produced (and, so far, locally distributed) feature closer to comedy.
Perhaps black comedy.  Perhaps *absurdist* comedy, as there isn't much
realism to this tale of a college theater tech (David Grant) who happens
upon his roommate (Stephen Grant) shooting people from atop a campus
building.  The script is frequently funny, but the movie is long and, at
times, tedious.  (A brutal sound mix doesn't help matters much, either.
Oof.)  Filmed on or around my alma mater, North Carolina State Univer-
sity.  And, for when they become famous, the names to remember are Dante 
Harper (director), Stephen Grant (also writer), Todd Flinchum (producer), 
and Alicia Kratzer (production designer).

Title
Review for Eraser (1996)
(WB)
Directed by     Charles Russell
Written by      Tony Puryear and Walon Green
Cast            Arnold Schwarzenegger, Vanessa Williams, James Caan,
                James Coburn, Robert Pastorelli
MPAA Rating     "R" (presumably for language and violence)
Running Time    112 minutes
Reviewed at     The Wynnsong 10, Durham, NC (21JUN96)
     The new Arnold Schwarzenegger movie is plotted like a series of old
serials that have been combined and compressed, such that every ten
minutes (or so) our hero must beat the clock to avoid another peril.
Sirens!  The cops are coming!  Shots fired!  The bad guys are coming!
Parachute is tangled!  The ground is coming!  This methodical (and
intentional?) approach is actually a *good* thing, given the patchwork
of implausibilities, improbabilities, and other ignored concerns
contained in the script.  Arnie stars a steel-jawed U.S. Marshall who
works for the Witness Protection Program and who has been assigned to
protect-- at any cost-- a young woman (Vanessa Williams) who is blowing
the whistle on her treasonous employer.  The chutes and ladders involve
a political conspiracy, some very high-tech weaponry, and, heaven help
us, another mole inside of a secretive government agency.
     Arnie's character is actually a variation on the Energizer Bunny.
He gets stabbed, spiked, shot, crushed, blown-up, *and* dropped from a
couple of different heights.  None of the many writers (seven, I hear)
thought to worry about his seeming invulnerability, any more than they
thought to worry about describing a weapon as one that fires projectiles
at "just below the speed of light."  Help me.  Granted, such head-
scratchers are a trademark of the action genre, but too much of ERASER 
is carried too far.  Or, rater, the action scenes which are supposed to
*distract* us from such logic problems aren't carried far *enough*.
Director Charles Russell (THE MASK) is new to the big-budget game and
his set pieces are mostly modest in scope.  That is, with two
exceptions.  Both a skydiving sequence and a roomful of escaped
alligators are pure thrills.  Bring a tissue, though, as you may get a
nosebleed from going so far over the top.
     Too erratic to be a "must see," ERASER is still recommendable for
the smaller details.  When Arnie is disguised as a delivery person, for
example, the back of his jumpsuit reads "Let's Party."  Or there's James
Caan, as the boss gone bad, reacting to a throwing-knife wound:  "I
can't believe you nailed me with that cheap, mail-order shit!"  Or, 
even better, the mobster who points to Arnie and asks: "Who's the tree
trunk?" Other notable cast members include Babe's dad James Cromwell in
one scene, James Coburn as the agency head, and Robert Pastorelli as
Arnie's colorful, eleventh-hour sidekick.  No one as dead-on as, say,
either Tom Arnold or Charleton Heston in TRUE LIES, but they're amusing
enough.  (Nor is it every day that we get James Coburn stare down James
Caan!) Finally, where would Schwarzenegger be without a handful of
one-liners?  The Terminator gets off a couple great ones that you're
sure to hear elsewhere.  There's also a classic exchange with two young
kids, after Arnie drops from the sky into a junkyard.  Very funny.
--
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Brassed Off (1996)
     BRASSED OFF!, the only musical mining drama that's likely to grace
our shores this (or any other) year, has, to its credit, a strong cast
(headlined by Pete Postlethwaite, Tara Fitzgerald, and Ewan McGregor),
several compelling characters, and plenty of fine brass music.  (Music
and dialogue rendered on a recording so crisp that I actually had
trouble paying attention to the movie!  Since when did small films start
sounding so big?)  What sends this British import right down the crapper
is a weighty mix of dour drama-- striking miners, families strapped for
cash, clowns trying to commit suicide, etc.-- and heavy-handed politics.
Ugh.  By the end, when the colliery band makes it to their final competi- 
tion, there's nothing left to celebrate, except, perhaps, the impending
restoration of blood flow to a certain bum deal.  An interesting movie,
I suppose, but way too bitter to be bittersweet.

Title
Review for Fan, The (1996)
(TriStar)
Directed by     Tony Scott
Written by      Phoef Sutton, based on the novel by Peter Abrahams
Cast            Robert De Niro, Wesley Snipes, John Leguizamo, Ellen
                Barkin, Benicio Del Toro
MPAA Rating     "R" (presumably for language and violence)
Running Time    115 minutes
Reviewed at     Mission Valley Cinemas, Raleigh, NC (13AUG96)
     The first hour is exciting.  Before his character ever draws blood,
Robert De Niro cuts a chilling figure as an edgy knife salesman (!)
whose life is increasingly in shambles.  He can't make the numbers at
work, his ex-wife is threatening him with a restraining order, and, now,
his favorite baseball team's expensive new addition (Wesley Snipes) is
hitting his first slump.  What's a psychotic fan to do?  In these
expertly shot early scenes, director Tony Scott (CRIMSON TIDE, TOP GUN)
generates tension in the most unlikely of places.  Who else would film a
car-phone conversation like a high- speed chase?  About the time that De
Niro's character gets down to business, though, the suspense starts
seeping away.  Major dramatic events happen, but they don't register.
Plausibility wanes, tension fades, and, finally, we're left holding the
umbrella during one howler of a rain-soaked night game.  The finale is
so bad-- so jaw-dropping awful-- that even Marge Schott might be at a
loss for words.  Other umpires might call it differently, but I say THE
FAN is *out*!
--
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Mission: Impossible (1996)
     Though you can't take your eyes off of it, director Brian DePalma's
hotly anticipated adaptation of the classic '60's spy series is a
misfire of near-colossal proportions.  *Huge* amounts of effort and
talent are up on the screen and, yet, the movie fails to meet the
most-simple of narrative standards:  it doesn't draw us into the
characters.  Period.  Minutes pass, scenes change, but that crucial
connection never happens.  Blame the lousy pre-credits opening, for
starters.  What the hell are we supposed to make of a surveillance
expert (Emilio Estevez) watching a black-and-white video of what appears
to be a bad Russian soap opera?  Huh?  This terrible sequence was
reportedly *much* more elaborate, until the test audiences got hold of
it.  God help us.  Now, the scene runs about five minutes and that's all
the introduction we get.  Almost no chance to identify the characters,
nor assimilate the action, nor get a feel for the film's tone.  Needless
to say, the movie never recovers from this misstep.
     What we later learn is that said soap stars are really a team of
secret agents.  They work for Mr. Phelps (Jon Voight, looking very old),
a shadowy government figure who must owe Blockbuster Video some serious
bucks because all of his tapes keep self-destructing.  (The character of
Mr. Phelps is one of the few elements retained from the television
series; another is composer Lalo Schifrin's cool theme music.) The story
has Mr. Phelps accompanying his IMF team on a doomed mission to Prague,
to intercept someone who's selling the real names of secret agents.
(Said list is largely responsible for turning the plot screws.  Would
you like some fries with your MacGuffin?) Problems ensue, bad things
happen, and the team's point man, Ethan Hunt (Tom Cruise), is
immediately suspected as a traitor.  Notice that I'm not telling much of
the plot.  The rest of the story has Hunt on the run, ducking his
superiors while trying to catch the real bad guys.
     The whole thing is far more convoluted than I can describe here.
And the tone isn't much better.  DePalma tries be both serious and silly
and it doesn't work.  The major components of the movie are too heavy;
the handsome cast, the top production values, etc. all but squeeze the
cheese right out of the film.  So, instead of integration, we get a
study in contrasts:  fine actors like Kristin Scott-Thomas playing
straight to somebody wearing obvious old-age make-up.  Or, those
imposing international locales that are announced to the audience in
gigantic letters on title cards.  Or, my favorite, the dramatic
confrontations and the crazy angles that capture them.  Holy tilted
camera!
     The camera tilts are absurdly appropriate, though, given the film's
low Believability Factor (BF).  When Cruise's character escapes from a
restaurant, for example, he blows up an aquarium that releases enough
water to supply a small city.  (BF=0.09) And there are *many* such
goofs, gaffes, and general "head-scratchers" scattered about.
Respectable writers David Koepp (JURASSIC PARK), Steven Zaillan
(SCHINDLER'S LIST), and Robert Towne (CHINATOWN) are listed in the
credits.  I wonder which one was responsible for that amazing "Internet
magic" that Hunt performs?  Or who thought it believable that Hunt would
retreat to a government-sponsored safe house, after said government was
now hunting *him*?  As the movie is nearly devoid of any humor, these
unintentional amusements-- like the sight of Vanessa Redgrave wearing
what's either a bad wig or a bad dye job-- provide some critically
needed chuckles.  (One *intentional* gas is the film's standout
sequence, involving the theft of a computer file from a secured room at
the CIA Headquarters.  It's vintage DePalma and *far* more exciting that
the speed-train-helicopter-into-the-Chunnel-chase finale.)
     Still, MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE should generate both good returns and
good word of mouth.  Working with an array of accomplished actors,
lavish locales, and cool camera tricks, DePalma has created a convincing
illusion.  He's made the quintessential Hollywood product:  a well-
produced and well-promoted thrill machine.  If the applause at the
screening that I saw is any indication, *many* people are going to enjoy
this movie and many people are going to think that they've really *seen*
something.  For the rest of the us-- those already sensitive since that
terrible TWISTER blew through-- we can roll with what's awful and still
have some fun.  After all, the director *is* Brian DePalma.  He knows
how to handle trash and turn it into something that's entirely
watchable.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Casino (1995)
(Uni)
Directed by    Martin Scorsese
Written by     Nicholas Pilegii and Martin Scorsese, based on the
               book by Pilegii
Cast           Robert DeNiro, Sharon Stone, Joe Pesci, James Woods,
               Kevin Pollock, Alan King, Don Rickles
MPAA Rating    "R" (for violence, language, sexual content, etc.)
Running Time   177 minutes
Reviewed at    Mission Valley Cinemas, Raleigh, NC (16NOV95)
     Finally.  The GOODFELLAS gang (Martin Scorsese, Nicholas Pilegii,
Robert De Niro, and Joe Pesci) reunites for this stunning, yet demanding
story of mob interests in 1970's Las Vegas.  Based on Pilegii's non-
fiction book, CASINO is the story of bookie-turned-casino boss Sam "Ace"
Rothstein (De Niro).  He's the brains behind the operation of the
Tangiers Hotel and Casino, who, along with problem pal Nicky Santoro
(Pesci), works to keep the cash flowing back to the Midwestern mob
bosses.
     Despite the prickly prospects of the subject matter--as well as a
177-minute running time--the first hour of CASINO is nothing short of
incredible.  The story opens with an extended introduction into casino
management and the mob ties therein.  Every conceivable base is covered
as Pesci and De Niro narrate over a steady stream of oldies, while
Scorsese's camera stays in constant motion through quick cut after cut
after cut.  It's a great start that slows, somewhat, in the second hour.
     With the introduction of Ginger McKenna (Sharon Stone), a Vegas
vamp who ends up holding "Ace's" ace, the narrative becomes more
conventional.  No problem.  Stone proves up to the task of the excep- 
tionally demanding role, though her cool chemistry with costar De Niro
is muted and often difficult to read.  In fact, one could argue that,
even though it's a dramatic portend to later events, her entire subplot
could be easily excised without any noticeable reduction to the overall
structure, or emotion, of the story.
     If De Niro and Stone are both a bit distant, Pesci is right there.
He's the actor with the most fire, even if he's playing awfully close to
his Oscar-winning role from GOODFELLAS.  (Anyone for a tally of how
often Pesci says the f-word?  Or how many cigs De Niro smokes?) Backing
the big three is a shrewd supporting cast that includes James Woods,
Alan King, Kevin Pollock, and a serious Don Rickles.  (The funny Don
Rickles can be heard in TOY STORY, also opening this week.)
     The third, and final hour of CASINO lacks something.  As each of
the characters close on their grim, inescapable outcomes, there's
neither a rush, nor a relief at the end.  No overt emotion for the
viewer other than, perhaps, horror at the grisly fates suffered by some.
(Hint:  you'll be taking back junior's baseball-bat Christmas present
after watching this one.) The beginning may be a blast, but the ending
is nothing special.  CASINO just ends; and that's that.
     Technical credits are easily some of the best of the year.  Dante
Ferretti's eye-popping production design is a winner, as are Rita Ryack
and John Dunn's fine, period costumes.  Great soundtrack, too.  Such a
sumptuous production. I can't wait to see it again.
BOTTOM LINE:  Scorsese.  Casual viewers beware.

Title
Review for No Escape (1994)
MPAA Rating  "R"  (presumably for v-i-o-l-e-n-c-e)
"Prisons have become big business."
      - Title card explaining imprisonment in the year 2022.
     Cross MAD MAX with LORD OF THE FLIES and you've got the idea behind 
NO ESCAPE, a lousy prison-in-a-jungle pic. from producer-who-knows-better 
Gale Anne Hurd (ALIENS, THE ABYSS).
     The story introduces Robbins (Ray Liotta), a Marine captain con-
victed of murder and sent up the river and across the ocean to an island 
penal colony with no guards and one rule: stay alive. This "resort 
community" is controlled by two warring factions: the savage Outsiders 
(led by soft-spoken Stuart Wilson) and the peaceful Insiders (led by 
softer-spoken Lance Henriksen). But Robbins, who has a genetically 
traced problem with authority, doesn't want in on either..
     For about thirty minutes, NO ESCAPE is the perfect tonic to a sans 
action spring. The locales are lush, the premise is punchy, and Liotta 
is the last action hero we'd expect to be engaging. The man can act 
and his early scenes with Wilson, who plays the lively leader of the 
Outsiders, have a nice, lazy charm.
     Watch a staged fight between Robbins and "Ralph, our director of 
athletic activities" for a friendly nod to RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK.
     Once our hero goes outside the Outsiders (and inside the Insiders), 
the plot machinery grinds to a halt and NO ESCAPE becomes just that. 
Robbins spends the rest of the film seeking salvation in a ramshackle 
village that looks a little too much like GILLIGAN'S ISLAND to be 
taken seriously.
     There are a couple of brief battles to break up the monotony, but 
director Martin Campbell doesn't do very well with any more than three 
people fighting at one time.  He's better than, say, Kevin Reynolds, 
but not the *best* talent to effectively tingle the testosterone.
     The gore is pretty good, though. Watch for a dandy beheading and a 
*great* impaling.
     NO ESCAPE stars no women (!) and, considering the number of men 
shown in close quarters, could use a stronger sexual subtext to be 
believable. But this is Hollywood and Gale Anne Hurd *already* has a 
pretty large set of cojones.

Title
Review for Larger Than Life (1996)
    LARGER THAN LIFE, the comedy that puts Bill Murray on the road with
an elephant (!), almost warranted a walk-out, but not because this
particular pachyderm played in the odious OPERATION DUMBO DROP.  Rather,
it was the number of children in attendance that left my companion and I
unable to relax in our seats.  (Upon entering the theater, Waverly Place
in Cary, we were dismayed to discover bare walls.  Without stereo sound
to drown out the inevitable noise of an underage audience, the situation
was rapidly approaching lose- lose.  Did I mention the dried vomit on
the seat in front of us?) Happily, the brats were well-behaved, though I
doubt that any of them appreciated Bill Murray's character of a smarmy
motivational speaker.  (His motto, obviously modeled after multiplex
managers, is "get over it.") They came to see an elephant and, oh, what
an elephant it was!  Vera, as she's called in the movie, can bow and
play dead and do almost any trick, except perform a rewrite on Roy
Blount Jr.'s clearly understocked script.  In fact, no human that Mr.
Motivation meets on his cross-country trip to California-- to sell Vera
to either a zoo-keeper (Janeane Garofalo) or an animal trainer (Linda
Fiorentino)-- is particularly funny, not even the manic trucker Tip
played by an unrecognizable Matthew McConaughey.  Critters watching
critters notwithstanding, LARGER THAN LIFE is best enjoyed as another of
Murray's feature-length slow burns.  And stay awake for the movie's one
great scene, when Murray tries to drive a big rig.  Hilarious.  
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC, USA, Earth
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for G.I. Jane (1997)
     The new one from Ridley Scott-- enough of a reason right there to
run out and see it-- is a feature-length retort to "let's see if she can
take it like a man," where "she" is a naval intelligence officer (Demi
Moore) hand-picked to be the first female allowed to undergo Navy SEAL
training.  (A program that 60% of the *male* recruits don't finish.)
And, surprise, we learn that she can do it, and without any gender
handicapping, no less.  (She sleeps in the same barracks, wears the same
shaved head, and must endure the same levels of physical abuse.  Well,
almost.  None of the *guys* experiences a simulated attempted rape from
Viggo Mortensen's Master Chief from Hell.) No, G.I. JANE isn't much of a
message movie, nor is it a particularly effective character study.
(Heh, *what* character?) But as a ball-breaking, black rain-soaked
depiction of the most brutal basic training that you could possibly
imagine, the movie is gangbusters.  (My favorite sequences:  a jog
through the mess tent, where they're given about sixty seconds to eat,
and a late-night essay-writing exercise.)
     Alas, once Moore's character wins the respect of her teammates--
which happens about eighty minutes in-- the story doesn't have a clue
where to go next.  So, we take an excursion off base, for a confron-
tation with an oily Texas senator (Anne Bancroft, drawlin' away).  And
then we wrap with a cliched training-exercise-turned-real that, while
mildly engaging, has been done to death before and even by the
director's brother Tony in TOP GUN.  Neither sequence is particularly
well-paced-- the character and plot developments feel rushed, but, you
know, what's one more summer movie that tanks in the last half (or
whole) hour?  Now, for the nit picks:  can military instructors actually
physically abuse their recruits?  Did Ridley Scott direct those combat
sequences while under the influence?  Can Demi do more than a handful of
one-handers at a time?  And, most importantly, has anybody transcribed
that delicious exchange about a cigar and it's, ah, particularly
aromatic aroma?

Title
Review for Con Air (1997)
     CON AIR, the latest testosterone poisoner from late Don Simpson
producing partner Jerry Bruckheimer, starring Nicholas Cage as the lone
good-guy bad guy aboard a hijacked prison plane, may not be the worst
movie of the year-- it's too entertaining to be called that-- but it is
an exhausting failure, nonetheless.  Bad Choices abound, from editing to
story structure to Cage's accent, which renders the hair-extended hero
sounding like a cross between the King and Hi, his character from RAIS-
ING ARIZONA.  (Cage's comment on a car, hanging from the ass-end of a
plane: "Awhn any other day, this maht seem strange."  Thankyouverymuch.)
Call it wrongway filmmaking at its finest, CON AIR is as jaw-dropping
awful as last summer's MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE.  And, I believe, even more
fun.  For every preposterous plot point, for every momentum-sapping
sidetrack, for every hundredth slow-mo shot of something exploding,
there's a huge laugh lurking right around the corner, be it from one of
a dozen scene-stealing villains, to one of a dozen vehicular collisions,
to one of a (double) dozen fall-out-of-your-seat-funny one-liners.  And
I haven't even mentioned the theme from A SUMMER PLACE.  Bad movies
should be so much fun.

Title
Review for Flintstones, The (1994)
Directed by     Brian Levant
Written by      Tom S. Parker, Jim Jennewein, and Steven E. deSouza
Cast John Goodman, Eliabeth Perkins, Rick Moranis, Rosie O'Donnell,
     Kyle MacLachlan, Halle Berry, and Eliabeth Taylor
MPAA Rating     PG
Running Time    92 minutes
     If the very first scene--a dusty quarry filled with giant boulders
and earthmoving dinosaurs--doesn't fill you with a giddy gross of riant
recognition, then you're probably in the wrong film.  THE FLINTSTONES
is an immensely enjoyable all-ages attraction that's the first true
treat of the summer.
     Remember Fred (Goodman)?  He's that hearty, blue-collar bloke who
spends his days in a quarry and his nights in an (bowling) alley.  As
the film opens, his day is nearly done and, astride his 'sauris, he's
ready and waiting for the 5 o'clock bird.  Watching from afar is Cliff
Vandercave (MacLachlan), a young exec who's scheming with his secretary
(Berry) to steal funds from the firm.  All Cliff needs to get rich
quick is to find the perfect patsy....
     John Goodman is probably the closest we'll come to a man called
Flintstone.  His enthusiasm is bigger than his shirt size (no small
feat there!) and, though he never gets the accent quite right, he's the
obvious anchor of the film.  But he's not the focus.  THE FLINTSTONES
is an ensemble effort with a barefoot cast that works overtime to be as
obviously appealing as Goodman.
     Elizabeth Perkins is the best of the rest.  She nails her role of
Wilma square on the red-head, right down to her priceless delivery of
the word "Frad!" Less effective are the Rubbles.  Rick Moranis plays
Barney dumber than his cartoon counterpart, but he's still more
believable than Rosie O'Donnell, passable but all wrong as Betty.  Hee
hee hee hee.
     Remaining roles include Elizabeth Taylor, looking good and
sounding great as Fred's mother-in-law, Halle Berry as the seductive
secretary Sharon Stone, and Harvey Korman as the voice of a persnickety
"dict-a-bird."  Living cartoons Jay Leno, Richard Moll, and Jonathan
Winters also make appearances.  And watch for cameos from William Hanna
and Joseph Barbera.
     THE FLINTSTONES isn't as manic as one might expect and you can
blame director Brian Levant for that.  The happy helmer never tries too
many of those Barry Sonnefieldish tricks that made RAISING ARIZONA and
ADDAMS FAMILY VALUES such perfect cartoons.  His camera stays still,
but, with so many gags *already* in the film, any lack of tricky
technique goes by almost unnoticed.
     The writing, done ala "round table" despite three "official"
credits, is great.  Steven Spielrock and Company have unearthed every
stone-age pun possible and then some.  Sample dialogue from Fred:
"There's 4,000 people in the world!  Who needs the Rubbles?"
     The production design is equally rich and boasts more background
gags than a Zucker/Abrahams/Zucker film.  A newspaper reads "All the
news fit to chip."  A drive-in theater shows George Lucas' "Tar Wars."
And, best of all, a stone-age Warhol hangs on the wall at Slate and
Co.
     With so much obvious effort both before and behind the camera, THE
FLINTSTONES is surprisingly clunky.  The climax is rickety and many
other scenes seem shortened.  Were the producers afraid to take a good
thing too far?  Running a mere 92 minutes, THE FLINTSTONES should be
more seamless than it is.
     Since the entire film is a special-effect, some things look better
than others.  The props are all foam, of course, but the dinosaurs are
real--and I mean *real*--and that's what counts in Bedrock.
     The music, by David Newman, incorporates both songs and cues from
the TV show.  "The Twitch," performed by the renamed BC-52's, adds a
Sixties-flavor that isn't needed. (Male-dominated households
notwithstanding.)  How about Jurssaic grunge from Seattlerock?  (Sorry.)

Title
Review for Breakdown (1997)
     Here's something that you don't see every day:  a Hollywood action-
thriller that knows when to say when.  Never-aging actors Kurt Russell
and Kathleen Quinlan play a California-bound couple, whose bright red,
brand-spanking-new Jeep Cherokee (with Massachusetts plates) breaks down
on a secondary road, somewhere in the Southwest.  A trucker (J.T.
Walsh, Our Favorite Heavy) stops and offers them a ride.  She goes, he
stays, and, not much later, she's nowhere to be found.  Russell goes
slightly nuts, flags down the trucker, and hears those words that we
never want to hear outside of a movie theater:  "I've never seen you
before in my life." And you can take it from there.  (Or watch the
trailer, which reveals a bit more.)
     BREAKDOWN is balanced on every front, from pacing to photography to
suspense to sound effects.  (Is there a sweeter music than that of the
shifting of truck gears?) Most impressive:  director and co-screenwriter
Jonathan Mostow actually allows his everyman hero to *behave* like an
everyman.  (Well, okay, Russell does impersonate Indiana Jones in one
scene.) This guy has to think on his feet and, often, he's at a loss for
what to do.  And while some of his decisions are better than others,
*all* of our hero's actions are based on such determined determination
that you may catch yourself trying to talk back to the screen!  "No,
don't do that, do this!" Just rent the whole damn theater for yourself.

Title
Review for Judge Dredd (1995)
     Despite handsome casting and sharp production values, last month's
second comic-book-to-film is a failure from the get-go.  The tone
problems start in the very first scenes, after James Earl Jones' somber
narration introduces the judicial system of the future, where "judges"
roam the streets of Mega-City One, acting as judge, jury, and
executioner.  The toughest judge is Judge Dredd (Sylvester Stallone),
who's emotionless commitment to "da law" strikes fear in the hearts of
evil men.
     Boasting a great set-up, JUDGE DREDD sounds tougher than it really
is.  The screenplay--by William Wisher and Steven E. De Souza--tries
to cover too many bases at once, as if someone at Disney decided that a
Facist character in a graphic comic book could have some sort of mass
audience appeal.  So they "humanize" the movie by giving Dredd a hollow
sense of humor, a female Judge/love-interest/sparring-partner (Diane
Lane), and even a comic sidekick (Rob Schnieder, who obviously didn't
learn *his* lesson after appearing alongside Stallone in DEMOLITION
MAN).
     Actually, *that* film is much more enjoyable than the wasted work
here.  Director Danny Cannon has visualized correctly, but the story
contains too much absurdity to be taken seriously.  Sci-fi
hillibillies; malfunctioning motorcycles; and, yes, even a cat-fight
(between Lane and Joan Chen).  Sigh.  The whole thing is actually not
awful until the last twenty minutes, when Stone and Armande Assante
(who plays the villain) are standing and shouting in each other's
faces, their respectively flawed diction trying to work their mouths in
the direction of north by northwest.

Title
Review for Flirting with Disaster (1996)
     Is forced hilarity hilarious?  That's the question to ponder while
watching (enduring?) this edgy romantic comedy from SPANKING THE MONKEY
director David O. Russell.  Nothing is particularly relaxed (or sacred)
about this story of a young married man (Ben Stiller) who drags his wife
(Patricia Arquette), his baby, and his adoption- agency contact (Tea
Leoni) on a cross-country search for his biological parents.  The
dialogue, the characters, even the camera work itself is frantic.  Too
frantic.  The humor, like everything else about the movie, ends up
feeling forced.  Sure, the presence of such seasoned supporting players
as Mary Tyler Moore and George Segal (and Lily Tomlin and Alan Alda) is
nice.  As is the film's very frank sense of sexuality.  (The subject of
fellatio is, ah, a running gag.) Most of it, though, just isn't very
funny.  FLIRTING WITH DISASTER, *indeed*. 
--
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Wild Bill (1995)
     Another cryptic period piece, a la PERSUASION.  Well-acted by Emma
Thompson and Cannes Best Actor winner Jonathan Pryce, CARRINGTON is the
story of the unrequited love between British painter Dora Carrington
(Thompson) and eccentric writer Lytton Strachey (Pryce).  They shared a
passion for years, though he was an avowed homosexual who found the
female form rather offensive.  (Their repression knowing no limits,
each maintained separate sexual relationships while always staying very
close to each other.) The fine cast, notably Pryce, and an
ever-interesting story makes CARRINGTON quite watchable, despite a
confusing script that too often misses the nuts-and-bolts of basic
character introductions.  We get the juicy bits, but not always what
comes before.  (Anyone up for a tally of how many times Emma takes
another hop in the sack?  I wonder what Kenneth thought...)
     Here's the hat trick of the season:  Sean Penn writes, directs,
*and* casts former flames Jack Nicholson and Anjelica Huston as former
spouses, each dealing with the death of their daughter (to a drunken
driver) some five years after the fact.  He wants to kill the guy that
killed her; she wants a more peaceful resolution.  Though never
completely coherent as a drama, THE CROSSING GUARD is still a
reasonably compelling film.  The basic conflict carries the story
through the frequent slow spots.  More interesting are the flashes of
philosophy, when Penn pauses to ponder the nature of guilt.
Unfortunately, such insight is intermittent and entirely absent by the
end.  Still, there's that cast.  Huston only has a handful of scenes;
the best work is from Richard Jordan-look-alike David Morse, as the
driver, and Jack, boozed-up and bloated, wasting his nights in a strip
club, and, in one unexpected scene, taking the stage with one of the
girls.
     Writing/directing/producing team Charles Shyer and Nancy Meyers
(NOTHING BUT TROUBLE) return with this wholly unnecessary remake-
of-a-sequel that's also a sequel-to-a-remake.  They up the ante of
FATHER'S LITTLE DIVIDEND (1951) by making the father of the bride both
a daddy and a grandpa.  Mom (Diane Keaton) and Daughter (Kimberly
Williams) pregnant together, and Dad (Steve Martin) doing double-takes
throughout.  In real-life, such an event would take on a demented,
tabloid edge; in Disney's white-picket world, baby baby translates into
a mild form of wackiness that culminates with Martin Short sitting
behind the wheel of an Explorer (what else?) and Dad almost landing on
the wrong end of a prostrate exam.  Are we laughing yet?
     Actually, we *would* be laughing, had these bits not already been
shown in the trailers.  Who's idea was it to give away all the gags?
At least there's Steve Martin, who has more physical grace than most
contemporary screen comedians.  Even in a subdued role in a subdued
movie, he glides through each scene with distinctive flair.  Too bad
the same can't be said for Martin Short and B.D.  Wong.  As the
returning Decorators from Hell, they grate more than they give.  And,
yes, that's "SCTV" veteran Eugene Levy as the Middle-Eastern home
buyer.  Though the marketing staff should be shot--or given trophies;
I can't decide which--FATHER OF THE BRIDE PART II is innocuous
enough.  Relentlessly cheery *and* extolling more family values than
we've seen in several months, there's certainly an audience for this
golden-lit world of healthy babies, selfless spouses, and
happily-ever-after's.
     This cute children's adventure--think THE WIZARD OF OZ meets
BIG--is the perfect (and, perhaps, unintentional) companion-piece to
TOY STORY.  Director Joe Johnson (HONEY, I SHRUNK THE KIDS, THE
ROCKETEER) and Company have created a jungle of computer-generated
animals that live, breathe, and stampede across the screen.  Sure, they
look as fake as they do in the ads, but the prospect of what they
represent is thrilling.  The plot--a mysterious board game causes
demented jungle flora and fauna to appear--is fun enough, but the mind
can only wander and wonder about how this technology will affect future
features.  Such as the sequel to JURASSIC PARK, due in `97.  For now,
(older) kids will eat this stuff up.  Robin Williams is surprisingly
toned-down as the man-child who emerges from the game.  Bonnie Hunt is
appealing as his neurotic playmate who has to resume a game started 26
years earlier.  The story could be a couple shades darker, though.
With better animation and a sharper edge, JUMANJI would qualify as an
instant classic.
     Two hours and two minutes of Woody Harrelson and Wesley Snipes
knocking around as foster-brother transit cops, jerking the chain of
their totalitarian supervisor (Robert Blake, playing *way* over the
top), and creating every manner of subway-related mayhem.  The tone is
abominable and almost wincing in spots.  The plot--involving the
robbery of the car that collects the fares--is equally absurd.  (Any
kid with a train set could handle The Heist better than the authorities
in the movie do.) Woody and Wesley have great chemistry, though, and
that's probably enough for most audiences.  Sheer idiocy.  It'll make
millions.
     Great gimmick; godawful movie.  Joe Everyman (Johnny Depp) has
ninety minutes to kill the person in the photo, says bad guy
Christopher Walken, or his little girl dies.  Here's the gun, here's
the hotel, and here's her itinerary.  Fail to complete the mission, and
your daughter dies.  No problem--we saw this much in the trailer and
it looked good then.  Director John Badham (POINT OF NO RETURN,
STAKEOUT) has also shot the story in "real time," so one minute here
equals one minute there.  Cool.  The problem comes with, well, all the
rest of it.  Instead of leaving Depp alone and to his own devices, the
script has Walken's character hounding his every turn.  Which is
insane.  Any chance of innovation is negated through this, and other
boneheaded plot points.  We threw up our hands and left after 35
minutes of "real time."
     Surprisingly stiff for a romantic-comedy remake, SABRINA still has
its charms.  The old-fashioned plot--involving a pair of wealthy
brothers (Harrison Ford and Greg Kinnear) and their chauffeur's
attractive daughter (Julia Ormand)--takes a while to settle into.
We're asked to feel sympathetic toward a trio of characters who, in the
nineties, come across as either shallow or stupid.  Or both.  Each
projects an innocence, though, that helps to eclipse their flagrant
flaws.  And, after about ninety-minutes of story, they cease to seem
like candidates-for-counseling and begin to function as real
movie-people.  Exceptionally polished, SABRINA is always eye-catching,
even when the story strays down a dead-end alley.  Such as an entire
segment set in Paris.  And how about the pairing of Richard Crenna and
Angie Dickinson as the in-laws-to-be?  We haven't seen them together
since the 1971 TV-movie THIEF.
     The Rod Serling gimmick--the *whites* as the minority race--is
intriguing, but writer/director Desmond Nakano doesn't go anywhere with
it.  Instead of biting satire, or even a revealing, cross- cultural
snapshot, Nakano gives a fired factory worker (John Travolta) a gun and
lets him kidnap the wealthy industrialist (Harry Belafonte) who was
indirectly responsible.  The idea, of course, is that each will share a
better perspective at the end of their ordeal.  And that is the
problem.  Nakano has created an alternate reality that's just *too*
real to believe such a ludicrous plot twist.  In fact, as written, the
entire second-half of the story would be virtually unwatchable, if not
for the extraordinarily humane performances by Travolta and Belafonte.
They shine brightly, and provide the small moments of sanity in an
otherwise absurd story.
     An arty western that's neither romantic nor revisionist, director
Walter Hill's third oater is, from a commercial perspective, dead on
arrival.  Few heroes and fewer heroics are just some of the challenges
to this fictional retelling of the final days of James Butler Hickok.
As superbly played by Jeff Bridges, he's bitter, half-blind, and
all-too-aware that the end is nearer than farther.  (The conflict comes
from his past:  a string of memories that he can't keep back, and the
son of a sweetie who's gunning for the gunslinger.) Leaner and meaner
than most Western wear, WILD BILL stumbles a bit at the end.  Hill
indulges in one too many flash- backs and the rhythm is almost lost.
He rights himself for the finale, though, and wraps with an unusually
tight closing.  Great supporting cast, too, including Christina
Applegate, Bruce Dern, Ellen Barkin, and John Hurt.  Recommended.
Michael J. Legeros - Raleigh, NC
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Check triangle.movies for weekly reviews from MOVIE HELL

Title
Review for I Love Trouble (1994)
     No amount of nostalgia can bring back the past, but, oh, how
TROUBLE tries.  Spousal scribes Charles and Nancy Shyer--who remade
FATHER OF THE BRIDE in 1991--have returned to reinvent the screwball
comedy.
     Nick Nolte and Julia Roberts play rival Chicago reporters.  He's a
veteran columnist, she's a cub reporter.  They meet at the scene of a
train derailment--a fitting metaphor for their first impressions. (He
hates her guts, she thinks he's a sleaze.)  They sniff around the
wreckage, scoop each other's story, and, finally, pool their resources
to work as a team.  That is, a team that happens to file separately.
     Rival reporting is a tried-and-true Hollywood tradition and, in
the beginning, the film has the feel of one of those great, old
newspaper classics like THE FRONT PAGE.  Somewhere around the hour
mark, though, TROUBLE transforms into a thriller, complete with bodies,
bullets, and half-baked McGuffins.  Which is too bad, because the
plot--some nonsense about missing microfiche--shoots the film in the
foot.
     Nolte and Roberts have more chemistry than the film deserves, but
not enough to keep viewers awake through the sitcom situations that the
characters wind up in.  The script's lack of snappy patter doesn't help
much, either.
     (The age discrepancy is almost worth noting, until you remember
that Nolte and Roberts are the same age as when Tracy and Hepburn
were doing the same thing.)
     Technical credits are surprisingly superb.  Charles Shyer's
direction, Dean Tavoularis' production design, and John Lindley's
lensing are all worth watching.  If nothing else, I LOVE TROUBLE is one
of the better-*looking* films of the summer.

Title
Review for Star Trek: First Contact (1996)
[Note that followups are directed to rec.arts.movies.current-films and
rec.arts.movies.startrek.current only, not to rec.arts.sf.movies.  -Moderator]
    The best thing about seeing a Star Trek movie is that when the
inevitable projection problem occurs, there's always someone more-
obsessive than yourself who gets up to go notify the management.  STAR
TREK: FIRST CONTACT is the perfect movie for those dedicated fans,
because they can project their own excitement into an otherwise talky
action movie.  Despite a strong script and an excellent ensemble cast,
there's a fundamental visceral tension that's missing here.  Or, rather,
which leaks out over time.  In fact, the most exciting moment in the
movie is a cabin-room confrontation between Patrick Stewart and Alfre
Woodard.  (How odd.  Even with the best FX in eight movies, FIRST
CONTACT is surprisingly thrill-less.) Everything else, however, is par
for the course:  in-jokes, one-liners (most of them hilarious), gizmos
with lots of flashing red and yellow lights, explosions heard in the
vacuum of space, and plenty of technical mumbo-gumbo like "we appear to
be caught in a temporal wake." By the end, the resolution of the lengthy
conflict (the Enterprise goes back in time to battle the Borg) makes
perfect logical sense and little else.  Next time, please reactivate the
emotion chip.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC, USA, Earth
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
I'm also on the Web!  http://www.pagesz.net/~legeros/

Title
Review for Harriet the Spy (1996)
     Nickelodeon's first foray into feature filmmaking is an overlong
kiddie drama that stars Michelle Trachtenberg as a precocious sixth-
grader and self-proclaimed spy.  Her afternoons are spent sneaking
around and spying on people.  She writes down everything she sees in a
private notebook, which later falls into the hands of her classmates
with predictably disastrous results.  The story, adapted from the
classic children's book by Louise Fitzhugh, plays like a pre-teen
version of WELCOME TO THE DOLLHOUSE.  They act cruel, she acts crueler,
and then everyone goes off to apologize and live happily ever after.
Unlike Dawn Weiner, the central character from DOLLHOUSE, Harriet also
gets to exact revenge on her classmates.  However, this being a movie
intended for kids, she must be taught a lesson and doesn't get to savor
the pleasures of being mean.  Too bad she can't get back at her busy
parents, who have long-since delegated the responsibility of raising her
to a live-in nanny.  Now *that* could be considered cruel.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Chasers (1994)
MPAA Rating   "R" (presumably for language, nudity, sex, and crew-cuts) 
Running Time  112 minutes 
     Sad is the day when a new film from Dennis Hopper-- the man who 
helped defined a generation with EASY RIDER-- is heralded with hardly any  
fanfare.  Granted, CHASERS is not exactly industrial-strength movie- 
making, but Hopper's first film (as a director) since THE HOT SPOT is an  
mildly agreeable road-pic about a pair of Navy men (Berenger and  
McNamara) who run into trouble escorting a military prisoner back to  
base.  Shades of THE LAST DETAIL?  Not exactly. 
     The story introduces Eddie Devane (McNamara)-- a swaggering smooth-
talker assigned to "chaser duty" on the day before his discharge. His 
orders are to report to gruff security officer "Rock" Reilly (Berenger) 
and assist in the transport of a "dangerous" prisoner from Camp Lejeune.  
What neither man knows is that their cargo (Eleniak) is female and better  
suited to the pages of Playboy than prison. That small surprise turns  
into a big problem when the boys discover that appearances are quite  
deceiving. 
     There isn't much of a plot to CHASERS, and the script's idea of  
sophistication is clogging a fuel tank with tampons. What little story  
there *is* disappears somewhere in the second hour, but that's no problem  
because the leads are okay and they keep the chemistry going when the  
plot isn't. 
     McNamara is the best of the bunch and the only one with anything  
resembling a character. He's fun to watch because he recalls a younger  
Tom Cruise with his doesn't-have-a-clue-and-doesn't-know-it smile.  
Berenger glares and growls through his "role" and Eleniak weakly smiles  
through hers. To be fair, the actress tries her hand at a couple moving  
monologues. Key word: *tries.* 
     They hit the road in Jacksonville, North Carolina, and start south 
on a trip teeming with local color. Hopper's hopper is filled with 
monster trucks and BBQ huts and sign after sign for yet *another* Baptist 
church.  Anyone who's travelled the length of coastal Carolina can 
appreciate a fist-fight staged on a tacky miniature-golf green. (Is there 
any other kind?) 
     The fringe also features a bevy of bit-parts including Hopper as a  
travelling salesman with more than just fabric samples in his trunk; Gary  
Busey as a Navy-hating marine; Dean Stockwell as a golf-playing Porsche  
salesman; and Crispin Glover as McNamara's nervous partner-in-crime. 
     Together, they make one happy family that keeps CHASERS from sinking  
lower than it should. 

Title
Review for Murder in the First (1995)
Road trip!  On their way to L.A., driving companions Whoopi Goldberg and
Mary Louise-Parker stop to pick up a friend (Drey Barrymore) in
Pittsburg.  She's just ko-ed her abusive husband with a baseball bat and
needs to both get away and stay away.  So they head out to the highway,
ready to play tunes and paint toenails.  Sound familiar?
Call it another "chick flick," but this logical successor to THELMA AND
LOUISE delivers an intriguing message about the price of freedom.  From
the POV of screenwriter Don Roos, the cost of empowerment includes
pregnancy, AIDS, and a six-month jail sentence.  Directed by Herbert
Ross (STEEL MAGNOLIAS).
As an old science-fiction geek from long, long ago, I thought I'd find
at least *something* to enjoy in the doomed HIGHLANDER III.  Wrong.
This is direct-to-video fare at it's finest, with plotting that would
shame even the cheapest comic book.  Mario Van Peebles (!) plays the
sword-wielding villain, who returns from a 400-year imprisonment to
battle Christopher Lambert and his mysterious accent.
AMADEUS it ain't.  Gary Oldman is certainly right for the role of Ludwig
van Beethoven.  He can brawl like the best rock star and brood like the
most serious composer.  He even plays his own piano, which, in this
film, is no small feat.  Too bad the CITIZEN KANE-like structure of
writer/director Bernard Roses's biography-as-a-mystery never uncovers
anything interesting.  Great soundtrack, though, if you don't mind the
conspicuous absence of period instruments.
Horror helmer John Carpenter is behind this painfully slow story of a
hard-boiled insurance investigator (Sam Neill) trying to track down a
missing Stephen King-sort (Jurgen Prochnow).  The I.I. believes the
disappearance to be a publicity stunt, until he ends up trapped in the
author's fictional town.
The premise is great, but Carpenter's pacing is all wrong.  He doesn't
even frame the story very well.  Neill does what he can with a very
unappealing character.  He's no fun to watch.  A better mystery might be
to figure out how John Glover, David Warner, and Charleton Heston (!)
were corralled into this mess.
They are a pair of pranksters from Queens who specialize in abusive,
obscene phone calls.  Their strengths are their voices, which help
breath to life such unforgettable characters as the irate Frank Rizzo
and the hapless Sal Rosenberg.  What the Jerky Boys are *not* are
actors, and this movie makes the mistake of trying treat them as same.
A truly innovative script would've kept the Boys (Johnny Brennan and
Kamal) hidden off-screen for the entire film.  This slop reveals their
identities within the first five minutes--a mistake from which the film
never recovers.  Sure, the two recreate some of their better-known bits
to amusing effect, but the bulk of the film is just one, long chase
scene.  And what are William Hickey, Alan Arkin, Ozzy Osbourne, and Tom
Jones doing here?
Executive produced by Tony Danza and Emilio Estevez (!).
This overdirected courtroom drama would like to be as exciting as A FEW
GOOD MEN, but director Marc Rocco doesn't have enough sense to keep his
camera still during the best parts.  He swirls and twirls through every
scene as if he were filming a wrestling match.  Both Kevin Bacon and
Gary Oldman (again!) are quite good, but Christian Slater is a loss.
He's too much of a lightweight for this sort of stuff.
You don't have to see either BLUE or WHITE to enjoy RED, director
Krzysztof Kieslowski's final installment in his TROIS COLOURS trilogy.
RED is also the final film for the director, who has announced his
retirement.  Chance encounters are one of the many ways that this
captivating--and puzzling--film explores the idea that we are all
connected in ways we never realize.  Front and center is a love story
between a fashion model (Irene Jacob) and a retired judge (Jean-Louis
Trintignant).  Subtitled.
If you're in the mood for another sweeping family saga ala LEGENDS OF
THE FALL, then try TO LIVE.  Director Zhang Yimou (RAISE THE RED
LANTERN) recounts three decades of Chinese history as seen through the
eyes of a poor, working-class couple (Ge You and Gong Li).  You won't
see anything like Brad Pitt here, but you *will* get a remarkably
detailed portrait of Life Under Mao.  Winner of two awards at last
year's Cannes film festival including Best Actor.  Subtitled.

Title
Review for James and the Giant Peach (1996)
      Flying rhinos, enchanted crocodile tongues, and one very large
piece of fruit.  It's all business as usual for Roald Dahl, whose 1961
children's book has been brought to partially-animated life by director
Henry Selick (THE NIGHTMARE BEFORE CHRISTMAS) and producer Tim Burton
(same).  Book-ended by extended live-action segments, the pit of this
PEACH is a plum of a stop-motion story about a boy's adventure with
several human-sized insects.  (They are enlarged along with the peach.)
The animation is dazzling, the voices are well-cast, and the humor is
very droll.  (Says one bug of another, "he's committing pesticide!") Too
bad the story drags.  The ending is also a wash, and the songs, by Randy
Newman, sound like, well, songs by Randy Newman.  Of course, it's not
every day that we get to hear Richard Dreyfuss and Simon Callow
performing showtunes together!  (The former's musical range has
marginally improved since MR. HOLLAND'S ANUS.) Speaking of Freud, adults
should wholly enjoy the many darker aspects-- and psychological
possibilities-- of this story, even as they fidget, even as their kids
don't.
--
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Diabolique (1996)
     Woof!  DIABOLIQUE reminds me of those activity-book pages that I
used to love-- the ones titled "what's wrong with this picture?" So many
problems surface in this failed French-film remake that it's difficult
to know where to start!  The tone is the worst-- an overly oppressive
mood that lands with an almost-audible thud.  The characters then play
too close to camp, which is probably the best way to take this tabloid-
worthy tale of a wife (Isabelle Adjani) and a mistress (Sharon Stone)
who conspire to kill their husband/ lover (Chazz Palminteri).  Try this
for dialogue:  "If it's all the same to you, I'd rather not hang for
fried chicken." No, not as good-bad as SHOWGIRLS, but close.  Very
close.  The defining moment comes at the end, when Stone and Adjani are
finishing some business in the shallow end of a swimming pool.  Cut to
an underwater shot of their struggle and both actresses are still
wearing heels.  Ouch.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
MOVIE HELL is on the Web!  http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Hong faan kui (1995)
     Asian superstar Jackie Chan is just a-kickin' and a-grinnin' 
through this cheery, cheesy martial-arts comedy about a lone Nice 
Guy (Chan) who must defend his friends against a rude biker gang.  
Add a slinky love interest, some stolen diamonds, and a runaway 
hovercraft (!), and you've got a recipe for some seriously hokey 
fun.  (And I mean *hokey*:  this Bronx is flanked by mountains and 
sports the occasional palm tree!)
     RUMBLE IN THE BRONX is Chan's second attempt to break into the 
American film market and he might just make it this time.  Despite 
the erratic pacing and some hilariously bad dubbing, RUMBLE is so 
relentlessly good-natured that you can do little more than groan 
and laugh.  Also adding to the amusement factor is the foreknow-
ledge that Chan does all of his own stunts, and only after director 
Stanley Tong attempts each one, himself!  (Check the blooper reel, 
at the end, for a run-down of who broke what during filming.)
     Given the overall slap-happy construction, snooty action fans 
may scoff at this stuff.  Sure, directors like James Cameron and Jan 
DuBont are choreographing equally impressive physical feats, but 
not with the raw effort of Mr. Chan.  He's a one-man arsenal of 
fury and fun.  However awful the film around him may seem, he's as 
bright a movie star as the world currently knows.  Recommended. 
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
MOVIE HELL is on the Web!  http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Crow, The (1994)
Written by David J. Schow and John Shirley, based on the comic book
     series and comic book strip by James O'Barr.
Cast Brandon Lee, Ernie Hudson, Michael Wincott, David Patrick Kelly, 
Rochelle Davis, and Jon Polito.
MPAA Rating "R" (presumably for rape, language, and violence)
"Looks like he zigged when he should've zagged."
     - Ernie Hudson, as a police officer commenting on a suspicious 
       death.
     Comic book translations are notorious tricky-- anyone up for a 
double-bill of THE PUNISHER and CAPTAIN AMERICA?-- and THE CROW proves 
no exception. Despite a gross of good intentions, Brandon Lee's final 
film doesn't fly very high.
     The story opens on Halloween Eve, better known as Devil's Night. 
Wilmington-as-Detroit is in flames and the police are tending to at 
least *one* murder:  young rock-musician-turned-pavement-artist Eric 
Draven (Lee), found on a sidewalk six-stories below the apartment he 
was thrown from. The cops are also upstairs, administering aid to his 
fiance who was assaulted and raped and not necessarily in that order.  
She dies, the perps. escape, and, exactly one year later, Draven rises 
from the grave to wreak revenge.
     Unlike Charles Bronson, whose only known superpower involves an 
inability to refrain from filming DEATH WISH sequels, Lee's character 
has supernatural strength and amazing agility and can even reheal from 
gunshot wounds faster than Robert Patrick in TERMINATOR 2. By his side 
is his crow, the presumable source of his powers as related in the 
narration.
     Wearing what appears to be Alice Cooper's leftover make-up, Lee 
is plopped into an underlit urban landscape that was obviously modeled 
after BATMAN and BLADE RUNNER. But no number of red-lit, rain-soaked 
streets can compensate for cheap FX that make THE CROW seem closer to 
DARKMAN than BATMAN.
     (The glaring miniatures should show better on video, though. :)
     A nod to DARKMAN is an insult to Sam Raimi, though, because Alex 
Proyas can't film a decent action scene to save his life.  His two 
"best" set-pieces-- some banzai board-room butchery and a cool church-
roof sword fight-- are also undercut by the awful editing of Dov 
Hoenig and Scott Smith.  Blame said editors for the film's frightful 
flashbacks, as well.  But the pace is quick, thank God, and every 
good-idea-turned-bad is over before it begins.
     The cast is better than it should be. Ernie Hudson is a good 
choice as a friendly policeman and he gets off most of the film's 
funnier lines. Newcomer Rochelle Davis does well as both the narrator 
and Draven's scrappy ward.  Jon Polito has a small, succulent role as 
pungent pawnbroker. And Michael Wincott makes a distinct impression as 
a long-haired Mr.  Big whose collection of ancient-swords makes him 
seem like he walked into the film from the trailer to HIGHLANDER III.
Finally, there's Brandon Lee, son of Bruce Lee, and a 28-year-old 
rising-star who was fatally shot during shooting. Lee had four films 
to his name-- KUNG FU:  THE MOVIE, LASER MISSION, SHOWDOWN IN LITTLE 
TOYKO, and RAPID FIRE-- and THE CROW would've been a nice feather in 
his belt and that's about it.  There's nothing great from him here-- 
just a good performance that owes as much to presence as ability.
     When the echo of that gunshot finally fades, watching THE CROW 
should prove an even *less* remarkable experience. Despite a healthy 
dose of humor and some surprising sincerity, THE CROW is still just a 
couple notches above its straight-to-video brethren. For now, maybe 
it's an appropriate eulogy to an actor who could only get better.

Title
Review for Just Cause (1995)
Sean Connery stars as a Harvard law professor who heads back into the
courtroom, by way of the Everglades, to defend a young, educated black
man (Blair Underwood).  The guy is on death row for the murder of a
white girl, and says that his confession was coerced from the region's
tough, black cop (Lawrence Fishburne).
Watching Connery and Fishburne bump heads for two hours is amusing
enough, but the plot's a joke.  There's no logic at work here.  Tone is
also an issue--there is none.  Director Arne Glimcher never establishes
exactly what his film is trying to say.  Is it a statement on human
rights?  Is it a knock-off of SILENCE OF THE LAMBS?  Glimcher never
tells.  Instead, he forces his characters to jump through hoop after
hoop, over drawbridge after drawbridge, hoping that the audience won't
notice what's missing.
Still wondering who Nigel Hawthorne is?  Then check out his Oscar-
nominated work in THE MADNESS OF KING GEORGE, still playing in both
Raleigh and Chapel Hill.  Stage director Nicholas Hytner, in a
remarkable screen debut, has adapted Alan Bennett's 1991 tragic comedy
to fine effect.  Sumptuous-looking and only mildly stuffy, the film
charts the madness that plagued King George III (Hawthorne) almost 30
years into his reign.
In Suri Krishnamma's A MAN OF NO IMPORTANCE, Albert Finney disappears so
deeply into the role of a lovable Dublin bus conductor that it's a shame
when the film gets so serious around him.  His character is a conductor
with a passion for Oscar Wilde.  He reads to his riders, and once a
year, with their help, he tries to stage one of the author's plays.
For about an hour, there's a sweet magic behind Finney and his troupe of
working-class stiffs.  Conflict arises, but it's small stuff--an
administrator from the bus company here, an outraged Catholic pork
butcher (Michael Gambon) there.  But with Finney at the wheel, so to
speak, the film rolls smoothly over these plot points--just like the
gorgeous Leland double-decker bus in the story.
Where things get serious is toward the end of the film, when the plot
takes a turn that the bus never would, and the story heads down a very
dark alley that marks the end of an enjoyable ride.  The twist makes
sense--and helps paint a complete picture of Finney's character--but
the trip to get there betrays the light, airy atmosphere of what had
come before.
It's not a fatal misstep, mind you, and it doesn't send the story
soaring into the realms of incredulity.  It's just a turn off.
Mein Fuhrer!  The most fun that *I* had last month was in Durham, at the
Carolina, at a mid-week screening of Stanley Kubrick's pitch-black
comedy DR. STRANGELOVE (OR HOW I LEARNED TO STOP WORRYING AND LOVE THE
BOMB).  The 1964 film stars Peter Sellers (in three roles), George C.
Scott, Sterling Hayden, and Slim Pickens.  Their antics brought the
house down, which, to my surprise, was packed by an audience younger
than the film.

Title
Review for Fallen (1998)
(WB)
Directed by     Gregory Hoblit
Written by      Nicholas Kazan
Cast            Denzel Washington, John Goodman, Donald Sutherland,
                Embeth Davidtz, James Gandolfini, Elias Koteas
MPAA Rating     "R" (presumably for violence and profanity)
Running Time    123 minutes
Reviewed at     The Morehead City 1-2-3, Morehead City, NC (24JAN98)
     Denzel Washington stars in this run-of-the-mill religious thriller,
as a Philly police detective stalked by the spirit of a serial killer
that he once put away and who was only recently executed.  The catch?
Well, there are a couple:  Casper the Unfriendly Ghost can occupy almost
any ol' human host *and* he can pass himself from one person to the
next, simply by touch.  Now, although our hero doesn't catch on for at
least an hour, *we* are shown the whole possession process from the get-
go.  And that's a grave mistake, 'cause it leaves the story with nowhere
else to go.  A better script, I suppose, would kick right into over-
drive, aiming for the sort of over-the-top territory that THE DEVIL'S
ADVOCATE did so well.  Or, maybe, it would go in the other direction,
descending into, say, a clever character study or detailed police pro-
cedural.  Alas, what Nicholas Kazan's screenplay *does* do is just
schlepp along, with a little bit of mystery here, a little bit of sus-
pense there, and a whole lot of missed opportunities everywhere else.
Though well-acted and handsomely produced, FALLEN fails in the most fun-
damental of ways:  it doesn't compel you to keep watching.  (Mom and I
left after an hour.)  With Donald Sutherland, James Gandolfini, Embeth
Davidtz, Elias Koteas, and looking dangerously close to a coronary, John
Goodman.  Directed by Gregory Hoblit (PRIMAL FEAR).  

Title
Review for Waterworld (1995)
Directed by    Kevin Reynolds
Written by     Peter Rader and David Twohy
Cast           Kevin Costner, Dennis Hopper, Jeanne Tripplehorn, Tina
               Majorino
MPAA Rating    "PG-13"
Running Time   135 minutes
Reviewed at    General Cinemas at Pleasant Valley, Raleigh (26JUL95)
     DIE HARD, BRAVEHEART, Batman, Spaceman.  Welcome to the Summer of
Acceptance, where even the *best* of the big-gun blockbusters must be
accepted on their own, flawed, faulted terms.  Overlong, overdone, or
overhyped, the ticket sales are the testimony to one simple fact: we're
*willing* to accept the flawed (but still spectacular) visions of
filmmakers like John McTiernan, Joel Schumacher, and, now, Kevin
Reynolds.  (Of course, we also embraced CONGO.  Go figure.)
     WATERWORLD floats, though not very high above the surface.  The
joys of the Most Expensive Movie Ever Made ($175M) include a breezy
tone, good humor, and *dynamite* action.  Director Kevin Reynolds
(ROBIN HOOD: PRINCE OF THIEVES) has clearly beaten his playmates at
the punch bowl.  Sure, it's THE ROAD WARRIOR on water, but the
stunt-heavy set-pieces are more open and relaxed than anything we've
seen in DIE HARD or BATMAN.
     The first hour is the best, successfully suspending our disbelief
that a world covered with water would still support human life.  (And,
for that matter, would still support so many late-20th century relics!)
Into that picture drifts the Mariner (Kevin Costner), a wandering
mutant with slimy webbed-feet and gills that look like little vaginas.
He's at odds with everyone, including the Atollers (who live in harmony
on a man-made atoll) and the Smokers (who like to smoke and kill and
not necessarily in that order).  The Mariner just wants to be left
alone with his ecology lesson, but that proves difficult after he
befriends a little girl (Tina Majorino) with a strange tattoo.
     WATERWORLD starts to sink in the second hour, as the film begins
to feel less and less "finished."  The logic problems are the worse,
ranging from a casual deep-sea dive that offers no mention of
decompression--much less the dangers of tangled support cables!--to
the return of a patchwork airship that looks better suited to
GILLIGAN'S ISLAND than THE ROWED WARRIOR.  Skipper!!  The second hour
also marks the deterioration of the FX, particularly in the matte
department.
     Another albatross is the story, which is thin even by summer-movie
standards.  The plot is essentially an extended chase sequence with a
dash of characterization for Costner.  Numerous dead-end references
don't help, either, and suggest a number of cut scenes.  Hopper calls
for "the trackers," but we're only shown some shark fins in passing.
Tripplehorn talks about a "music box" as something "nobody else has
seen," but when did *she* see it?  And the list goes on.
     (The sexism doesn't make much sense, either.  Why not paint the
future as a place where the sexes are equal, and where the Mariner not
only thinks about selling his woman, but also himself??)
     Despite a production history more difficult than a James Cameron
shoot, the acting in WATERWORLD in surprisingly strong. Costner is
amazing as the brutish, brooding hero who is more prone to throwing
little girls overboard than to waxing wisecracks while killing. For
someone who has never been licensed as an action figure, he's also
*very* nimble on his feet.
     The villain, the Deacon, the bald-headed leader of the Smokers, is
played with customary gusto by Dennis Hopper.  (He's here because of a
new industry rule that requires the actor to play the villain in at
least *one* summer blockbuster a year.  His characterization for *this*
role: Southern accent.)  He gets upstaged, though, by young star Tina
Majorino (WHEN A MAN LOVES A WOMAN).  She's plays the little girl with
the map on her back, and she's a scene-stealer.
     (Only Jeanne Tripplehorn--as the love interest--doesn't fit.  With
her shaved armpits and shiny hair, she's too clean-looking.  The
actress has spunk, sure, but she acts like she walked (trippled?) in
from another movie, entirely.  She's awful.)
     The other technical credits are a mixed catch.  The production
design is a winner, with the Mariner's trimaran as the coolest
contraption next to the Batmobile.  The lighting is inconsistent,
imagine that!, but the photography makes great use of the water, water
that's everywhere.  There's also the slight problem of
overscoring--this is not a story that needs swelling strings.

Title
Review for Hideaway (1995)
     Dean Koontz reportedly asked to have his name taken off HIDEAWAY
and it's easy to see why.  The author's voice is nowhere to be found in
this absurd adaptation of his 1993 bestseller.  Koontz writes about men
with mysteries--mysteries that take half the novel to unravel.  His
stories work because the author never tips his hand too soon.  Here,
the secrets are revealed at the very beginning.
     The first scenes explain the psychic relationship between two
strangers:  the loving husband Hatch (Jeff Goldblum) and a teenage
serial killer (Jeremy Sisto).  With the big mystery solved so early,
the plot has nowhere to go.  The story can only devolve into simple
scare tactics.
     Sure, cheap thrills are fine for some.  HIDEAWAY can certainly
hold its own against any slasher pic.  The plot is only mildly awful,
and the actors actually can.  There is a slight problem with the bad
guy, though--he's about as threatening as a member of Spinal Tap.
Maybe if he wore a hockey mask..

Title
Review for Chasing Amy (1997)
     Kevin Smith's raunchy romantic comedy, of the boy-meets-lesbian
variety, has one of the smartest scripts that we'll likely see this
year.  Oh, sure, the writer/director of CLERKS and the underappreciated
MALLRATS covers his fair share of familiar ground.  That the main
characters are comic-book artists is no surprise.  Nor are the many
"R"-rated discussions of sexual practices.  (One, ah, cunning linguist
cites CNN and the Weather Channel and his need for "constant updates.")
What's new for the Smithster-- who also reprises his role as Silent Bob,
for one scene-- is a poignancy that creeps into the characters and their
situations.  (The subject of a young man trying to accept his partner's
sexual past is, indeed, heart-breaking.) Alas, the downside to this
wonderfully written (and side-splitting funny) work is that it's also
*directed* by Kevin Smith.  He's getting better with tone, I'll give him
that, but his choice of actors still leaves a lot to be desired.  The
worst offender, by far, is lead actress Joey Lauren Adams.  With her
Joker grin and Jennifer Tilly voice, she's instantly off-putting.  Bring
cotton for your ears.

Title
Review for Under Siege 2: Dark Territory (1995)
     This bastard son of DIE HARD--and there are so very *many* of
them!--has a playful awfulness that's missing from the other summer
blockbusters.  Master thespian and martial-arts expert Steven Seagal
returns to the role of Casey Ryback, the former Navy SEAL turned
civilian chef.  This time, he's taking a train ride through the
Rockies.  Why?  Because he doesn't want to fly, or something like
that.  (His parents just died in a plane crash.  Or was it his
brother?  Who can tell!?)
     Along for the trip is his pretty niece (Katherine Heigl), who gets
to spar with her uncle for all of fifteen minutes before she and the
rest of the passengers are taken into custody by a band of terrorists.
They chose this train because it's there, and because it's such a great
way to transport a satellite uplink that will let Eric Bogosian (as the
villain, if you can buy *that* one!) control a satellite with truly
devastating power.  Scary.
     Meanwhile, Ryback is hiding in one of the compartments.  He's a
master of guns, knives, and a mysterious form of yoga that can hold all
facial muscles immobile, even during dramatic close-ups.  Like UNDER
SIEGE, PASSENGER 57, DIE HARD 2, and all the rest of those movies, our
hero spends the duration of the film slowly staking the bad guys while
trying not to fall in/out/onto something.  Of course, Bruce Willis
never had to undergo the humiliation of falling off a train ala Gene
Wilder in THE SILVER STREAK.  Luckily, these bad guys are really
not-so-bad guys.  They actually back the train up to get him!
     Director Frank Oz (LITTLE SHOP OF HORRORS) and screenwriter
Melissa Mathison (E.T.) adapt the Lynne Reid Banks's children's classic
to pleasant effect.  The story of a young boy who gets to play dice
with the universe doesn't really go anywhere, but the actors are
appealing and the FX are great.  (Anyone else see the resemblance
between Litefoot and Keanu Reeves??) Certainly it's a better family
film than either POCAHONTAS or THE MIGHTY MARVEL MORPHIN' MUTANT
TEENAGE NINJA POWER RANGERS MOVIE.
     Director Chris Columbus continues to experiment with tone, trying
his hardest to juxtapose sentiment and slapstick the way he did so well
in HOME ALONE.  He partially succeeded with his last film, the stuffy
MRS.  DOUBTFIRE.  Here, he fails.  The characters in this remake of the
French farce NEUF MOIS need a more intimate approach than what's
attempted here. (In fact, the film's best joke is a throwaway--the
characters race past a marquee that reads HOME ALONE VII.)
     The cast is good, though, and they'll survive to film another
day.  And nobody does reticence quite like Hugh Grant, even if NINE
MONTHS is a really poor showcase for Scandal Boy.  Hugh could do
better.  With Julianne Moore, Jeff Goldblum, Tom Arnold, Joan Cusack,
and a scene-stealing Robin Williams.
     Another funny film about film, this one boasting another smooth
comic performance from Kevin Spacey.  (Remember THE REF?) He does an
Oscar-worthy turn as a tyrannical studio executive who gets *his*
after a year of abusing his fresh-from-film-school assistant (Frank
Whaley). Boasting torture sequences right out of DEATH AND THE MAIDEN,
this pitch-black comedy may be too much for some.  Hilarious.

Title
Review for Game, The (1997)
     Michael Douglas is back in the genre that best becomes him, as an
emotionally aloof investment banker whose meticulously controlled uni-
verse begins to unravel after he accepts a birthday gift from his
lower-living brother (Sean Penn).  Said gift is a game-- an elaborate,
anything-can-happen mindfuck that's custom fit to the recipient's
physical and psychological states.  What's the objective?  What exactly
is supposed to happen?  No one is willing to talk.  Not the former
players, not the game's administrators, and not even the CNN financial
reporter that begins talking to Douglas' character through the tele-
vision set in his living room!  Get the idea?  Frankly, I found THE GAME
to be a bit of a bore.  Somewhere between the intriguing opening and the
richly satisfying final act, my eyes began to glaze over.  Maybe it's
the pacing-- twists and turns that come a little too fast to be fully
savored.  Maybe it's the sterility of the events and how nothing *real-
ly* sinister happens for an awfully long time.  Or, maybe it's just my
overactive imagination, which was busy trying to fit what I already knew
about the movie-- admittedly too much to begin with-- into the right box
inside of the right box inside of the right box.  Douglas is great.
Director David Fincher (SEVEN, ALIEN 3) is great.  Tech credits are
superb.  All that's missing is the disclaimer:  "foreknowledge of this
movie may hamper its enjoyment."

Title
Review for Sling Blade (1996)
(Mirimax)
Directed by     Billy Bob Thornton
Written by      Billy Bob Thornton
Cast            Billy Bob Thornton, Lucas Black, Dwight Yoakam, Natalie
                Canderday, John Ritter, James Hampton, J.T. Walsh
MPAA Rating     "R" (presumably for violence and language)
Running Time    125 minutes
Reviewed at     The Studio, Raleigh, N.C. (14FEB97)
    Who is Billy Bob Thornton?  Well, he's an actor (DEAD MAN, INDECENT
PROPOSAL, CHOPPER CHICKS IN ZOMBIETOWN), a writer (ONE FALSE MOVE, A
FAMILY THING), and, now, a director.  SLING BLADE, the story of a gentle
giant who returns to his rural Arkansas hometown years after murdering
his mother and his mother's lover, is Thornton's first time behind the
camera.  His direction is good, very good, but his writing and acting--
both on display here-- are the stuff of Oscar nominations.  (And the
stuff of head-scratching.  I wonder how many people think that Joe Bob
*Briggs* is up for Best Actor and Best Adapted Screenplay?) Thornton's
performance as Karl, the slow-moving, slower-speaking small-engine whiz,
is mesmerizing.  He's Forrest Gump with fewer laughs and darker
thoughts.  Much darker thoughts.  Karl ends up staying with a young boy
(Lucas Black) and his single mom (Natalie Canerday) and, after we've met
her abusive boyfriend (Dwight Yoakam, excellent), the outcome of the
story is no longer in question.  SLING BLADE is many things, including a
catalog of unspeakable small-town (Southern?) horrors.  No, nothing is
shown on screen, but they add a grim-- and at times gruesome-- subtext
to an equally endearing and, even, hilarious tale.  Uh huh.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC, USA, Earth
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
I'm also on the Web!  http://www.pagesz.net/~legeros/

Title
Review for Gattaca (1997)
     GATTACA is a good-enough genetic-engineering thriller, set in the
not-too-distant future, where a daring young janitor (Ethan Hawke) is
determined to become an astronaut, despite his having a set of genes
that precludes any participation in the space program.  (In this far-
from-far-fetched future world, a job interview involves little more than
a blood test.) With an assist from his friendly neighborhood black-
marketeer (Tony Shalhoub), he adopts the identity of another young man
(Jude Law), a crippled-but-otherwise-okay lookalike whose record doesn't
reflect a broken back, and who can provide the requisite samples of
blood, skin, hair, and urine.  And everything works wonders until a
murder happens at Mission Control and the resulting cell-by-cell sweep
of the scene yields a certain person's eyelash.  Ouch.  As a cautionary
tale of science-we'll-soon-see, GATTACA is endlessly intriguing.  As a
sci-fi potboiler, however, it just ain't suspenseful enough.  The char-
acters are stronger than you might expect, but writer/director Andrew
Niccol doesn't put 'em through nearly enough paces.  (The climax is... a
swim chase!?) And then there are those nagging story details, like bus-
iness suits worn aboard rocket ships.  Or that urine sample at the be-
ginning.  (How *does* Hawke's character fake it, with the doctor right
there staring at his schlong?  You got me...) With Uma Thurman, Alan
Arkin, Loren Dean, Ernest Borgnine and, looking completely out of place,
Gore Vidal.  Splendidly stark production design, too, by Jan Roelfs.

Title
Review for Tomorrow Never Dies (1997)
     One of the more monotonous entries in the 35 year-old (!) series,
TOMORROW NEVER DIES is long on action but short on style.  (And suave.
And sex appeal.  And...)  Brosnan, Pierce Brosnan is back, looking good
and acting a world more relaxed than his first Bond at-bat, GOLDENEYE.
Though still far from the cool cucumber that Sean Connery was, Brosnan
appears well on his way to eventually outperforming Timothy Dalton, Rog-
er Moore, and ON HER MAJESTY'S SECRET SERVICE one-timer George Lazenby.
Too bad, then, that 1997 finds the role retooled, from secret agent to
super (action) hero.  (Gotta feed the international audience...)  Babes,
bon mots, and battling wits?  Fuggedaboudit.  This year's Bond spends
most of the movie in motion, fighting the bad guys on land, on sea, and
in the air.  (The plot involves a media mogul, played by Jonathan Pryce,
who wants to start a world war to improve ratings.)
     The opening, involving a stolen fighter jet at a "terrorist arms
bazaar," is engaging enough, but quickly displays that director Roger
Spottiswoode (AIR AMERICA, TURNER AND HOOCH) isn't exactly a master of
mayhem.  His sole inspired sequence is a parking-lot car chase, with
Bond driving from the *back* seat of his customized BMW.  (You know, the
one from the TV commercials.) Other problems range from the obvious (no
one behaves as if WWIII is imminent) to the insidious (the high-tech
sets look too much alike).  (Composer David Arnold's persistent quoting
of Monty Norman's original theme is annoying, as well.  And, jeez, did
the miniatures have to look so obviously like miniatures?  At least Judi
Dench is back, as "M.") For a holiday blur of explosions, automatic-
rifle fire, breaking glass, and twisted metal, this is the movie for
you.  Just don't expect to leave feeling either shaken or stirred.

Title
Review for Cold Comfort Farm (1995) (TV)
     John Schlesinger, of all people, directs this hilarious BBC and
Thames Television-produced comedy about a tidy society girl (Kate
Beckinsale) who moves to the country, to stay with relatives at a
ramshackle family farm.  Recently orphaned, Miss Flora Poste has chosen
Cold Comfort Farm as the place to begin collecting "life experiences"
for use in a novel that she hopes to write.  ("One as good as
'Persuasion'," she notes.) And, much like another Austen heroine, Ms.
Poste is soon imposing upon her backwoods brethren the standards of
style, manners, and hygiene.  (In a letter to London, she pleads "Send
fashion magazines!")
     Though, at times, it tries too hard to be funny-- Eileen Atkins'
Cousin Judith glares as if she were starring in a sequel to YOUNG
FRANKENSTEIN-- this haughtier episode of "The Beverly Hillbillies"
ultimately warms from within.  We're drawn into the characters and are
soon laughing with them, as well as *at* them.  And laugh you will.  A
scruffy Ian McKellan (RICHARD III) preaching fire-and- brimstone to a
quivering country congregation is alone worth the price of admission.
Also good is a GONE WITH THE WIND reference that happens later in the
film. 
--
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Starship Troopers (1997)
     Big bugs are the order of the day in STARSHIP TROOPERS, an honest-
to-God, old-fashioned combat movie set in a retro, fascist future where
impossibly square-jawed grunts still carry machine guns, endure the
abuses of drill sergeants, and get sent away to exotic, faraway places
to be slaughtered en masse.  Okay, there is *one* thing that's new:  men
and women fight together.  And bunk together.  And even shower together,
as in a gratuitous, humorous boobs-n-butts bath scene from SHOWGIRLS
director Paul Verhoven.  Relax, Mr. V. is no longer orbiting the hirsute
moon of Eszterhas-- he's back in ROBOCOP territory, fusing social satire
with gory violence and, perhaps, pissing in the face of the studio's
target audience-- teenage boys already clogging the Internet with their
grousing nit-picks.  Granted, the director *is* poking fun at everything
that he can lay his hands on, but he's also trying to channel his own
wartime experiences as a youth.  So, while you *will* get the gore-- am-
putations, decapitations, eviscerations, and immolations-- be prepared
for cheesy dialogue, glaring plot holes, and, at the end, and just when
you think you've grown used to the tone, movie monsters that look like
giant human sex organs.  Hilarious.  Now, for *my* nit-picks:  occasion-
ally the action runs a bit long; the dramatics don't deliver quite
enough emotional impact; and, at times, I was distracted by actors aim-
ing their rifles a little too high to realistically hit their computer-
generated foes.  With Casper Van Dien, Dina Meyer, Denise Richards, Jake
Busy, Neil Patrick Harris, Clancy Brown, and a meaty Michael Ironside.

Title
Review for Timecop (1994)
     You can count the number of decent time travel movies on two hands
and, unfortunately, TIMECOP isn't one of them.  But don't blame the Van
Damme man--director Peter Hyams deserves all the credit for this only
okay trip back to the future.
     Based on the Dark Horse comic series, the story introduces the
Time Enforcement Agency, created in 1994 to police existing (!) time
travel technology.  The agency's stance is simple:  no one goes back to
get rich or get even.  Cut to 2004 and top agent Max Walker (Van Damme)
has just returned from 1929, with his former partner in chains for
trying to make a deal in the Depression.  The verdict is guilt and the
sentence is death--but not before Max learns of a bigger conspiracy
involving a U.S. senator (Silver) who's traveling time to fund his run
for the presidency.
     What sounds confusing is really a gas, courtesy of a smart script
by comics writer Mark Verheiden.  Lay people may have a tough time
navigating the narrative, but the story makes perfect sense to anyone
raised on Marvel Comics and "The Fantastic Four." Verheiden also
includes a double does of humor, ranging from a slam on Van Damme's
accent to a virtual reality gag that's virtually worth the price of
admission.
     Peter Hyams is an old sci-fi hack who directed OUTLAND, 2010, and
O.J.  Simpson in CAPRICORN ONE.  But TIMECOP gets away from him and the
result is a goofy tone with zero realism (nobody can shoot to hit) and
too many (poorly filmed) fight scenes.  In fact, most of the action
sequences are pretty pathetic.  The high low-point is a absurd finale
that has three or four or fifteen characters climbing all over a
rain-swept roof.  At night.
     And what's with those silly looking "future cars?"  Is someone
remaking SLEEPER on a nearby lot?
     Acting abilities are all over the place.  Both Ron Silver and Bruce
McGill (as the TEA head) are in top form.  Van Damme needs work, no
duh, but he's three times better than co-star Mia Sara, who plays his
wife.  Badly.
     TIMECOP wraps with a happy ending you can see a year off.
Missing: a humorous coda explaining just how the happy ending is
supposed to work.

Title
Review for Original Gangstas (1996)
     "Blaxploitation" heroes Fred Williamson, Jim Brown, and Pam Grier
reunite in ORIGINAL GANGSTAS, a rousing urban western about a trio of
former gang members in Gary, Indiana (homicide capital of the country)
who return to "take back the streets" after one of their sons is killed
in a drive-by.  Played mostly straight, O.G. is a rousing festival of
tough talk and vindictive violence.  Expect plenty of big words,
punctuated by cracked limbs, broken jaws, and crushed testicles.  (Not
to mention a few thousand or so rounds of automatic weapons fire.  Hey,
this is the nineties.) 
     The film is engaging-- and, at times, inspirational-- for about an
hour, until the gun battles begin.  They go on forever.  Williamson,
Brown, and Grier look great these days and have a good chemistry
together.  Other familiar faces include Paul Winfield, Isabel Sanford,
Richard "Shaft" Roundtree, and Ron "Superfly" O'Neal.  (Lest we take
things *too* seriously, Wings Hauser is also on hand.  He plays an aide
to the mayor.) As much fun as this reunion is, the moral message behind
ORIGINAL GANGSTAS is rather dubious.  Too bad that director Larry Cohen
couldn't make a stronger statement on values.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for House of the Spirits, The (1993)
Written and directed by Bille August, based on the novel by Isabel Allende
Starring Jeremy Irons, Meryl Streep, Winona Ryder, Antonio Banderas,
         Armin Mueller-Stahl and Vanessa Redgrave
MPAA Rating     Presumably "R" for rape, torture, and nudity.
Running Time    138 minutes
     THE HOUSE OF THE SPIRITS is a huge, sprawling train-wreck of a
drama that requires some serious suspension of disbelief to take
seriously.  The problem here is casting and if you can accept Jeremy
Irons as a South American and Meryl Streep as a psychic and Winona
Ryder as a mother, then you're halfway on your way to "enjoying" Bille
August's adaption of Isabell Allende's acclaimed 1985 novel.
     THE HOUSE OF THE SPIRITS opens in a rather Chile South American
country in 1926 and introduces Esteban Trueba (Irons).  He's a young
miner who plans to prosper and, later, marry the daughter of a
prominent aristocrat (Mueller-Stahl).  But by the time he strikes gold,
the daughter is dead--an event foreseen by her psychic little sister
Clara.  Esteban rides off into the hills and Clara, shocked by her
ability to foresee fatality, turns mute.
     Twenty years pass and Esteban has become a powerful (and quite
cruel) rancher.  When he returns to town to mourn his mother, he spies
the now-grown and now-gorgeous Clara (Streep) at the funeral.  He
proposes, she speaks, the furniture levitates on their honeymoon and,
at the moment of her impregnation, Clara jumps up and declares "it will
be a girl."  Said girl grows up looking like Winona Ryder and takes a
lover (Banderas) who is a revolutionary and causes her father all sorts
of grief because, by that time, Dad is a senior member of the
conservative government.
     The initial problem is pacing and SPIRITS doesn't flow worth a
damn.  The director's eye is good--there's no shortage of arresting
images here--but his timing is awful.  Much of the first half of the
film is comprised of truncated scenes--powerful, inspiring incidents
that are compressed into moments so momentary that they barely stay on
the screen long enough to register.
     (The first eighty minutes could be highlights from *another* film,
for all we know!)
     SPIRITS slows in the second half, thank God, and spends *some*
quality time with the story.  But even a lively coup d'etat--complete
with Winona Ryder undergoing torture--is no help to the viewer, who
has been stuck in a twilight zone where the chracters age at different
rates.
     Watching THE HOUSE OF THE SPIRITS is like watching a high-school
production where all of your best friends are playing people of older
ages.  Except, instead of kids playing adults, it's adults playing
kids.  Come on, Jeremy Irons in his twenties?  You can't tell the age
of *any* major character without doing some serious in-your-head
arithmetic.  And that's no fun.
     Age, innocence, or otherwise, the "international" cast is a bust.
     The less-than-ethnic-looking Irons puts a wealth of effort into
his role of Esteban even though he's saddled with a goofy accent and,
what looks suspiciously like, Dustin Hoffman's fake teeth from HOOK.
Streep is graceful and serenely strong and has her hilarious moment
when filmed asleep in her bed with her hair, arms, and cheekbones
perfectly poised.
     Vanessa Redgrave and Armin Mueller-Stahl are all but wasted as
Clara's parents.  So are Winona Ryder and Antonio Banderas--though
listed in the credits, they do little more than stand around and look
sincere.  By default, the standout is Glenn Close as Esteban's spinster
sister.  She stares and glares and never wears anything but black.  But
she *does* walk away with most of the film's funny lines.
     In fact, THE HOUSE OF THE SPIRITS is filled with more
*un*intentional humor than otherwise.  Stop, look, and listen for such
laughable laurels as Ryder's drab narration, inexplicably awful
dubbing, and a vintage automobile that collides with a train and
explodes like something from a Mel Gibson movie.

Title
Review for Fan, The (1996)
(TriStar)
Directed by     Tony Scott
Written by      Phoef Sutton, based on the novel by Peter Abrahams
Cast            Robert De Niro, Wesley Snipes, John Leguizamo, Ellen
                Barkin, Benicio Del Toro
MPAA Rating     "R" (presumably for language and violence)
Running Time    115 minutes
Reviewed at     Mission Valley Cinemas, Raleigh, NC (13AUG96)
     The first hour is exciting.  Before his character ever draws blood,
Robert De Niro cuts a chilling figure as an edgy knife salesman (!)
whose life is increasingly in shambles.  He can't make the numbers at
work, his ex-wife is threatening him with a restraining order, and, now,
his favorite baseball team's expensive new addition (Wesley Snipes) is
hitting his first slump.  What's a psychotic fan to do?  In these
expertly shot early scenes, director Tony Scott (CRIMSON TIDE, TOP GUN)
generates tension in the most unlikely of places.  Who else would film a
car-phone conversation like a high- speed chase?  About the time that De
Niro's character gets down to business, though, the suspense starts
seeping away.  Major dramatic events happen, but they don't register.
Plausibility wanes, tension fades, and, finally, we're left holding the
umbrella during one howler of a rain-soaked night game.  The finale is
so bad-- so jaw-dropping awful-- that even Marge Schott might be at a
loss for words.  Other umpires might call it differently, but I say THE
FAN is *out*!
--
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Chase, The (1994)
     Ah, the Seventies.  The era of truck chases (CONVOY), car races
(THE GUMBALL RALLY), and even truck/car chases (SMOKEY AND THE
BANDIT).  Remember those fast, funny, throwaway movies?  They were
perfect popcorn entertainment in a way-too-serious time.  But after
John Landis filmed the definitive everything-but-the-kitchen-sink
car-chase in THE BLUES BROTHERS, the genre died a quiet death.
Stuntman cum director Hal Needham filmed THE CANNONBALL RUN II in 1984
and that was that.
     Now, ten years too late, comes THE CHASE.  This roadkill of a
picture is truly awful entertainment--especially in comparison of what
came before.  In their heyday, even the *worst* chase films had a few
things going for them.  Burt Reynolds and Dom DeLuise were usually
close.  And, sometimes, so were Dean Martin and Sammy Davis Jr.  There
were some buxom babes, some decent stunts, and a ton of bad jokes.
     THE CHASE *also* has a ton of bad jokes.  But instead of Burt
Reynolds and his hairpiece, there's Charlie Sheen and his
what-I-am-I-doing-here stare.  He's a man on the lam, wrongly convicted
for a robbery he didn't do.  He's kidnapped a daddy's rich daughter
(Swanson) and her red BMW.
     Hot on his heels are the cops as comic relief.  But don't look for
ol' Pink Eyes here.  Pop stars have given way to rock stars and Dean
Martin has been replaced by Henry Rollins.  Who sucks.  For added
"enjoyment," a couple Red Hot Chili Peppers wander through as a pair of
"Beavis and Butthead" types trying to capture Charlie.
     Writer/director Adam Rifkin doesn't have a clue on how to stage a
car chase.  His MTV-style quick-cuts make the action virtually
impossible to follow.  But does the director compensate with anything
even *resembling* snappy dialogue?
     With no decent dialogue *or* action to speak of, the film's saving
grace are a few good slams on media mentality.  Every so often, Rifkin
cuts to a tabloid-news program promoting something along the lines of
"Kidnapped at 100 MPH."  These are good bits that are boosted by a nifty
cameo that I won't reveal here.
     Most of this race is a drag.  Ray Wise and Claudia Christian are
scene-killers as the pompous parents.  Plot-holes are the size of
pot-holes, from exploding helicopters to disappearing vomit.  Or, my
favorite, a day that turns to night in under eight minutes.
     There's even a thrash-metal soundtrack to help accentuate the
negative.
     THE CHASE may be *someone's* idea of hip wit.  But it bears little
resemblance to those great chases of not-so-long-ago when a road film
was not highway robbery.

Title
Review for Georgia (1995)
(Miramax)
Directed by    Ulu Grosband
Written by     Barbara Turner
Cast           Jennifer Jason Leigh, Mare Winningham, Ted Levine
MPAA Rating    "R" (presumably for language, nudity, drug use, etc.)
Running Time   113 minutes
Reviewed at    The Colony Twin, Raleigh, NC (10FEB96)
     Mare Winningham and Jennifer Jason Leigh play two singing sisters,
one stable and quite successful, the other addicted to gross self-
destruction.  Guess which one Leigh plays.  Director Ulu Grosband's
uncomfortable drama has been winning praise ever since Cannes and the
Montreal World Film Festival, where, at the latter, it was inexplicably
awarded two top awards.  As written by Barbara Turner (Leigh's Mom),
GEORGIA fancies itself as a musical "tough love" tale; a story where the
"better" half truly loves and, thus, must tolerate the "less-fortunate"
one.  Bullshit.  Everyone in this movie-- including the *very* good
Winningham-- tolerates Leigh's behavior, never once forcing her to help
herself.  That's fine, I guess, for those legions of people who enjoy
watching this sort of spiraling self-abuse.  They are probably the same
ones who thought that Leigh was *fabulous* in MRS. PARKER AND THE
VICIOUS CIRCLE.  Me, I fell asleep.
--
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
MOVIE HELL is on the Web!  http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Natural Born Killers (1994)
Directed by Oliver Stone
Written by David Veloz, Richard Rutowski, and Oliver Stone from a story
           by Quentin Tarantino
Cast Woody Harrelson, Juliette Lewis, Robert Downey Jr., Tommy Lee Jones,
     Tom Sizemore, Rodney Dangerfield
MPAA Rating     "R" (Duh)
Running Time    130 Minutes
     NATURAL BORN KILLERS is an acquired taste, make no mistake.  Good,
bad, *and* ugly, Oliver Stone's hilarious satire on media
sensationalism is a kaleidoscope portrait of America as seen through
the eyes of someone on a bad acid trip.
     Expanding upon the narrative techniques employed in JFK, Stone
uses every trick in the book to tell the story of Mickey and Mallory
(Harrelson and Lewis), two Bonnie-and-Clyde serial killers who capture
the hearts of non-victims all across America.
     With his crack team of collaborators and a year's worth of
editing, Stone has mixed 35mm, Super 8, animation, rear projection,
slow-motion, fast-motion, and video with a dazzling array of stock
footage, film clips, and other assorted images.  The effect is all at
once impressive, overpowering, and, well, aimless.
     The multimedia tricks are a hallucinatory treat, for sure, but the
director uses them on *every* character in the film--not just Mickey
and Mallory.  The result is sledgehammer saturation, if you will, that
weighs the film down by the end.  Simply, it gets old.
     Acting credits are superb, though, even if the characters
(literally) resemble cartoons.
     Harrelson and Lewis are a match made in movie heaven, with Woody
exhibiting some scary signs of intelligence.  Tommy Lee Jones is a
riot, sporting slick hair and Carl Perkins sideburns to play a prison
warden.  Tom Sizemore has a field day overacting as the
bad-cop-gone-worse hired by Mr. Jones to arrange an "accident" for
Mickey and Mal.
     And give some respect to Rodney Dangerfield, perfectly cast as
Mallory's father.  He gets his in a hilarious flashback staged as a
sitcom.
     The story was written by Quentin Tarantino (RESERVOIR DOGS, PULP
FICTION) and that's obvious.  Bullets fly, body parts are eviscerated,
and everyone says f*** every other word.  Heck, the fact that this orgy
of violence came from a major studio, alone is reason enough to see
it!  Listen for a great exchange between Jones and Sizemore--including
a hilarious off-color Oswald joke!--late in the film.
     Rewrites came from three others, including Stone who, undoubtedly,
was responsible for a slightly strange midsection involving an Indian
mystic and his rattlesnakes.  Shades of THE DOORS?  Rewriting also
added the entire commentary that culminates in a short montage of Amy
Fisher, O. J. Simpson, and Tonya Harding landing square on her
Buttafuoco.

Title
Review for Airheads (1994)
Directed by     Michael Lehmann
Written by      Rich Wilkes
Cast Brendan Fraiser, Steve Buscemi, Adam Sandler, Joe Mantegna,
     Michael McKean, Michael Richards, Judd Nelson, Chris Farley
MPAA Rating     PG-13
Running Time    90 minutes
     Heavy-metal humor ain't easy as proven by the air-headed AIRHEADS,
a good-to-bad-to-almost-unwatchable comedy about an unsigned band
(Brendan Fraiser, Steve Buscemi, and Adam Sandler) that raids a radio
station to get their demo played.
     Hip helmer Michael Lehmann and writer Rich Wilkes target the MTV
metal crowd and, if nothing else, get the costumes and dialogue right.
Best exchange:
     What's missing, though, are any *real* references to the genre.
Oh, sure, there's a cameo from Mr. Kilmister and a couple cracks about
both Vince Neil and Ozzy.  As well as a call-in in from Beavis and
Butthead.  But the real *meat*--the tunes, man, the tunes--is
missing.  Come on, a cover of Van Halen's "I'm the One" by Four Non
Blondes?
     Three stooges Fraiser, Buscemi, and Sandler are all
extra-appealing.  And co-stars Joe Mantegna (jock) and Michael McKean
(PD) both emerge unscathed from the plot-from-hell.  But steer clear of
Michael Richards, Judd Nelson, and Chris Farley.  They're not worthy.

Title
Review for Roommates (1995)
     Lots to see this weekend.  Some of what's new includes ANCHORESS,
DOLORES CLAIBORNE, EXOTICA, FEDERAL HILL, MARTHA AND ETHEL, MURIEL'S
WEDDING, MAJOR PAYNE, SATAN'S BREW, and TALL TALE: THE UNBELIEVABLE
ADVENTURES OF PECOS BILL.  Check local listings and, then on Monday
night, sit back and enjoy the most exciting evening of the year, when
Mujibur & Sirajul host the 67th Annual Academy Awards.
     The latest twist on the PARENTHOOD formula stars Paul Reiser,
Matthew Modine, and Randy Quaid as a trio of divorced dads trying to
adjust to the demands of dating.  The cast is extra-appealing, but the
film fails in so many ways that it hardly seems worth the trip.  (Said
problems range from extraneous plotting to oppressive product plugs.) If
there's a single reason to see this film, it's to catch Randy Quaid's
hilarious Blind Date From Hell with Janeane Garofalo (CLERKS).
     Another one of the "good" Stephen King films, and a fine companion
piece to THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION.  Director Taylor Hackford (AN OFFICER
AND A GENTLEMAN) and writer Tony Gilroy expand the bestseller-- about a
feisty New England woman (Kathy Bates) facing her second accusation of
murder-- by introducing an adult daughter (Jennifer Jason Leigh) who
does not appear in the novel.
     Purists may scoff, but the added conflict works.  Sure, the film
gets heavy-handed in spots--as well as a bit too tidy toward the
end--but the warmth of the source material still shines through.  A
fine showcase for the talents of the cast, which includes Christopher
Plummer as the local investigator.  Great cinematography by Gabriel
Beristain, too.
     Homey the Clown as a soldier.  That's the idea behind this silly,
rude, and ultimately hilarious comedy about a strict military officer
(Damon Wayans) assigned to a platoon of junior ROTC cadets.  What sounds
dangerously uplifting is really nothing more than two hours of Damon
Wayans spouting insults and excrement jokes.  Set in the same universe
as the Three Stooges-- where anything can happen and usually does-- this
is critic-proof comedy at its best.  Don't even bother to bring a brain.
     Forget the ads that promise slapstick and silliness, Disney's MAN
OF THE HOUSE is really just a kiddie-drama about a single mom, her son,
and her fiance.  Farrah Fawcett is the mom, Jonathan Taylor Thomas is
the son, and they *both* sleepwalk through their parts.  Chevy Chase
plays the the fiance and he plays it straight.
    The story appears to have been written for an audience under twelve.
Parents may appreciate the refreshingly inoffensive story, but it's a
long sit for the rest of us.  Even us former Indian Guides.
     Go see it.  First-time writer/director David Frankel has made his
own Woody Allen movie, albeit one with a younger cast and brighter
locales.  Forget WHEN HARRY MET SALLY, this is the Allen homage to beat!
Sarah Jessica Parker stars a young, single woman who becomes
increasingly neurotic as she discovers that everyone in her family is
having an affair.
     The plot is predictable, sure, but the tone is light, and the jokes
are fresh.  The superb supporting cast includes Gil Bellows, Antonio
Banderas, Kevin Pollak, Paul Mazursky, and, yes, Mia Farrow.
     Yet another mild drama, this one starring Peter Falk in heavy latex
as a ninety-something Polish immigrant who moves in with his 25 y.o.
medical student grandson (D. B. Sweeney).  Though Falk is fun to watch,
there isn't much of an edge to the story.  Characters come and go,
situations happen, and each person gets fleshed out just enough to be
interesting, but not necessarily engrossing.  Tastefully directed by
Peter Yates (BREAKING AWAY).
     Three flat-mates, one body, and a suitcase full of money are the
motivations behind this tepid thriller from Scotland.  Director Danny
Boyle has visual style to spare, but his characters are too unappealing
to be interesting.  How can you care about people that you don't even
like to watch?  Grisly fun in spots; quite boring the rest of the time.

Title
Review for Deconstructing Harry (1997)
    Woody Allen's new comedy is funny, thank goodness, 'cause it ain't
moving, charming, or even particularly believable.  For starters, he's
miscast himself.  Allen lacks the... gravity to effectively portray
Harry Block, a pill-poppin', booze-swillin', whore-frequenting, thrice-
married bestselling author to whom the following is happening:  (a.)
he's suffering from writer's block, (b.) he's enduring the wraith of
friends and family members who take offense to his habit of basing his
work on his life, and (c.) he's now being visited by those semi-fiction-
al creations.  (Initially, Allen cuts between scenes from Block's life
and scenes from Block's stories.  Later, he begins blending both.)
Smaller roles are filled by a dozen other stars, the spotting of which
is as distracting as the fact that they rarely come alive in their
roles.  (Too often, the film feels like a stage play, with actors
hurling monologues-- or, Allen's case, one-liners-- at each other.)
    The anxious, almost frantic pace is also a challenge, as is trying
to keep track of which ex-wife, ex-girlfriend, or other love interest is
being referenced in a given scene.  (And really, Woody, isn't it about
time to start casting *older* actresses for these parts?) Admittedly,
the movie *is* side-splitting.  (My faves:  gags on Death, Hell, and
Darth Vader.)  And it's profane!  (How many blowjob jokes did you
count?) Too bad it's so empty.  Do you know what a black hole is?  One
question:  why is Billy Crystal the only actor who plays both his char-
acter and the fictional take on his character?  He gives a devilishly
good performance, though...

Title
Review for Courage Under Fire (1996)
     Substance has slammed into the summer season with the landfall of
COURAGE UNDER FIRE, an imposing and entirely affecting military drama
that reteams Oscar-winning actor Denzel Washington with his glorious
GLORY director Edward Zwick.  This time we're witness to a modern
conflict, as the movie opens on a friendly-fire incident during the Gulf
War.  Commanding a compliment of armored vehicles, Lieutenant Colonel
Nat Serling (Washington) gives the order to fire on what is thought to
be an enemy target.  His men die, instead.  Six months after the end of
the war, Serling is working on his own death-- a slow suicide via
Scotch-- when he is assigned to investigate the approval of a posthumous
Medal of Honor for a helicopter pilot (a gritty Meg Ryan) who died in
the war.  A discrepancy in the surviving accounts piques Serling's
interest and, soon, he begins uncovering the truth about many things,
including his own suffering state.
     COURAGE UNDER FIRE carries surprising emotional weight, even as it
all too often relies on familiar dramatic devices.  You may wince at
such seeming cliches as Serling grasping for the whispered words of a
dying man lying on a hospital bed.  Or his clandestine meeting with a
newspaper reporter (Scott Glenn) complete with a trench coat, sun-
glasses, and, amusingly, a Redskins cap.  The too-polished plot is as
potentially distracting as the tightrope casting (Ryan, with a slurred
Southern accent; Lou Diamond Phillips as a buffed and tough solider;
Bronson Pinchot as a White House spin doctor).  Credit a couple of
rock-solid performances (including Washington and Michael Moriarty as
the commanding officer) and a no-nonsense approach by Zwick and
screenwriter Patrick Sheane Duncan (MR. HOLLAND'S ANUS, NICK OF TIME).
Their frank presentation of the subject matter and a unflinching
attention to detail help drive home the point that the consequences of
war are hell.  Go and have a good cry.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Family Thing, A (1996)
     Though you can't believe a minute of this rousing, racial drama,
you can certainly *enjoy* yourself.  The plot-- about a good ol'
Arkansas boy (Robert Duvall) who discovers, meets, and eventually
befriends his black half-brother (James Earl Jones)-- is absurd, sure,
but the dialogue crackles and the actors sparkle.  Though Duvall is a
bit too tightlipped, his foil, James Earl Jones, is fantastic.  (I love
his range: cowering and commanding all at once.  After this and CRY, THE
BELOVED COUNTRY, it's *great* to see Jones emerge from behind all of
those voice-overs and assorted supporting roles.) As good as their
unexpected chemistry gets, both Jones and Duvall pale before
schoolteacher-turned-actress Irma P. Hall.  Her scene-stealing
performance as their blind-but-still-sees-everything aunt is one of the
first Oscar-worthy turns of the year.  Directed by Richard Pearce (LEAP
OF FAITH). 
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
MOVIE HELL is on the Web!  http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Long Kiss Goodnight, The (1996)
    THE LONG KISS GOODNIGHT is my favorite bad movie of the year, even
better than BARB WIRE, DIABOLIQUE, or, dare I say the name?, MARY
REILLY.  Sure, it's as fowl as any turkey of times past, but this
mega-million dollar Renny Harlin-Geena Davis-Shane Black bomb is never
off-putting.  That is to say, it's awful fun.  The major misstep is the
casting of Mrs. Renny Harlin as an amnesiac house- wife who awakens one
day to discover that she's really a former anti-assassin for the U.S.
Government.  Geena Davis has the pumped- up physique and, yes, the same
wide-eyed exuberance that passed for characterization in CUTTHROAT
ISLAND.  What's missing, though, is the *steel* behind the sheen.  You
just don't believe that she wants to kick your ass.  (Memo to Mr.
Harlin:  in the interest of preserving not one but two careers, please
stop attempting to cast your wife as an action hero.  She's about as
well-suited to that role as Demi Moore is at playing strippers.  Just.
don't. do it.)
     Compounding the confounding is a story structure that reveals her
secret at the very beginning of the movie, I mean RIGHT THERE IN THE
OPENING CREDITS.  (Arrive late?  No problem!  The filmmakers also
include a scene or two or three of the bad guys getting ready to get
Geena.) This "tipping of the hand" is a 100-proof mystery- killer-- the
audience ends up knowing too much too soon and that knowledge drains the
suspense right out of the story.  The rest of the movie is reduced to
red-stained catch-up, with Harlin trying his hardest to generate the
tension that should've been there from the beginning.  Instead of
intrigue we get pumped-up peril, very little of which excites the way it
should:  Mommy ambushed at home, Mommy sprayed with bullets in a bus
station, Mommy hitting a deer and wrecking the car on her way home from
a Christmas party.  (Has anyone figured out the purpose of that last
scene?  Other than the guilty pleasure of seeing someone snap Bambi's
neck?)
     Thank God for Samuel L. Jackson.  His low-rent private dick is the
perfect foil to Le Femme Nondescript.  In addition to adding some much-
needed humanity to the movie, he's the most colorful character in the
cast.  Tearing into writer Shane Black's delicious dialogue, Jackson
walks away with nearly every scene, except when upstaged by Brian Cox
(CHAIN REACTION, THE GLIMMER MAN).  The original Hannibal Lecter (look
it up) submits a priceless monologue about a dog and where it likes to
lick itself.  (BTW, has anyone transcribed that exchange?  Please
e-mail, if so.) The Brit is gone before long, but Jackson is on hand for
the duration and he's so fun to watch, even when reduced to little more
than a spectator to the various explosive set-pieces that get
progressively bigger, bolder, and brain-dead.  After all, this *is* a
movie by Renny Harlin, the guy who directed CLIFFHANGER and DIE HARD 2,
which means you can expect a basement explosion that's pretty cool and
one whammy of a tanker- truck wreck, with Davis hanging-ten a la Arnold
in TERMINATOR 2.  The final fireball is the best and almost beats the
pyrotechnics in INDEPEDENCE DAY.  Not bad for a bad movie.  
--
Mike Legeros
Corporate Training
SAS Institute Inc, Cary, NC, USA, Earth
mailto: legeros@unx.sas.com (w) legeros@pagesz.net (h)

Title
Review for To Die for (1995)
     As hard as I struggle against the demons of preconceived notion, I
must confess to having expected both the best and the worst this
weekend, with the local arrivals of ASSASSINS and TO DIE FOR.  The
pre-release buzz was polarized: previewers flunked the former, while
critics lavished the latter.  Imagine my surprise, when ASSASSINS
proved watchable and TO DIE FOR a bit of a bore.
     To paraphrase somebody else, ASSASSINS doesn't suck.  The cold,
often humorless story of two rival "contract artists" may not be very
exciting, but at least you can watch it.  Director Richard Donner
(LETHAL WEAPON) seems to be aiming for more than pointless pyrotechnics
and he might've hit his mark with a thinner, less-contrived story.
(These characters do the *dumbest* things.  Such as the absurd
one-door-and-one-door-only finale.) Time passes, though, thanks to the
playful chemistry between Stallone and Banderas.  They're a pair.  The
cat-loving, fur-hating, surveillance-expert love-interest is played by
Julianne Moore, who *must* have something on somebody to be
miraculously spared a love scene with the Italian Stallion.
     TO DIE FOR is also flat.  Curiously flat, given the praise its
raised in recent days.  There's satire to spare in director Gus Van
Sant's pitch-black comedy about tabloid fame, thanks to a wicked script
from GRADUATE scribe Buck Henry, from the novel by Joyce Maynard, from
the real-life incident.  Nicole Kidman does her second star turn of the
year and it's a sizzler.  (Think Alicia Silverstone meets Linda
Fiorentino.) She's backed by a superb supporting cast that includes
Matt Dillon, Joaquin Phoenix, and an unbilled George Segal, who, these
days, looks remarkably like Richard Crenna.  Have we seen these guys in
the same room together?  TO DIE FOR is played in faux-documentary
fashion, with most of the characters speaking into the camera.  And
that's the joke.

Title
Review for Lone Star (1996)
    There's a lot of machinery at work in this multigenerational and
multiethnic drama from writer/director/everything else John Sayles
(PASSION FISH, EIGHT MEN OUT).  Set on the Texas side of the Mexican
border, LONE STAR follows Rio County Sheriff Sam Deeds (Chris Cooper,
inexplicably wincing and frowning through the entire thing) as he
attempts to solve a 40-year old murder mystery with apparent ties to
every prominent person in the county, including himself.  Mr. Sayles has
cast, oh, at least a hundred speaking parts in his 135-minute saga and
the confusion over "who's who?" begins early.  (Due, in part, to a weak
sound recording that often renders the dialogue difficult to understand.
How about handing out a program, someone?) The cast is expectedly
diverse and includes Clifton James, Kris Kristofferson, and newcomer
Matthew McConaughey, as well as regular Sayles items Joe Morton and
Elizabeth Pena.  However, as everything about this movie feels so...
over-staged, hardly anyone is given the breathing room to make a
believable impression.  We're presented with volumes of information
about these people, their lives, and their lifestyles, and we couldn't
care less.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for French Kiss (1995)
     Lawrence Kasdan directing Meg Ryan and Kevin Kline in a romantic comedy?
Huh?  The director of WYATT EARP isn't exactly known for the breezy sort
of WHILE YOU WERE SLEEPING fare.  He does better with the bittersweet--
films like GRAND CANYON and THE ACCIDENTAL TOURIST.  So, despite what
the ads say, it's not much of a surprise to find that FRENCH KISS plays
more serious than silly.
     The setup is this:  Meg Ryan is the French-hating, lactose-intolerant
Kate, who's flying to Paris to "win back" her fiance (Timothy Hutton).
Seated next to her is Luc (Kevin Kline), a swarthy, snide Frenchman who
has her frothing within the first five minutes of conversation.  They
bicker and banter, and later reunite for a picture-postcard adventure
that includes every cliche from a stolen necklace to an unctuous
concierge.
     The resulting humor is surprisingly strong, even if Kasdan's direction
doesn't have enough comic rhythm.  (Too many of the bits feel klunky and
heavier than they should.)  The character detail is impressive, which
helps, but the plot disappoints.  Ryan plays yet another neurotic woman,
who spends most of her screen time looking cute and acting exasperated.
     Kevin Kline has the stronger role.  His character is explored at length,
and undergoes a gradual transformation from obnoxious to sensitive.
It's a great portrayal that carries the film.  What *doesn't* work is
his inevitable romance with Ryan.  It feels forced.

Title
Review for Independence Day (1996)
     Talk about fireworks!  Director Roland Emmerich (STARGATE) and his
co-writing and producing partner Dean Devlin (also from STARGATE) have
cannily combined three decades worth of popcorn pictures-- chiefly by
drawing upon the colliding worlds of George Pal, George Lucas, and Irwin
Allen-- to create this spectacular, super-cheesy, and surprisingly
good-natured depiction of the end of the world as we know it.  The
formula should be familiar to anyone under the age of seventy:  ominous
music precedes a coming threat which is followed by mass destruction
which is survived by an ensemble of stock characters who are played by
B-list actors who must react to special effects that we know they can't
see all while looking very serious as their characters work together to
save the rest of the human race.  Did I miss anything?  Oh yeah, and
they make a *lot* of jokes along the way.
     INDEPENDENCE DAY is conveniently divided into three acts.  On day
one, titled "July 2," an armada of 15-mile wide spaceships position
themselves over the world's major cities.  In the United States-- the
movie focuses almost entirely on what happens in America.  Touche
international interests-- panic ensues, people head for the hills, and
the President (Bill Pullman, probably miscast but who cares?) wonders if
we can't all just get along.  In Los Angeles, a rooftop group of "New
Agers" are the first to be vaporized-- an amusing touch-- in the most
frightening firestorm seen on-screen since TERMINATOR 2: JUDGEMENT DAY.
New York and D.C. are also leveled, but not before Air Force One
escapes.  Billions die and hundreds of theater seats are mangled as
audience members hold on for dear life.
     On day two, titled "July 3" and do you see a pattern here?, the
survivors begin formulating their strategies for fighting back.  The
brain trust, congregated at a secret military installation in the
Southwest, includes a brilliant broadcast engineer (Jeff Goldblum), a
wise-cracking fighter pilot (Will Smith, a scene- stealer), a suspicious
Secretary of Defense (James Rebhorn), and a geeky government scientist
played by none other than Brent Spiner, better known as Data from the
television series "Star Trek: the Next Generation." (Needless to say,
his appearance causes certain audience members to begin foaming at the
mouth.  Don't forget your Ritalin, boys.) There's even a kooky crop
duster on hand, played by Randy Quaid, who swears that he was once
abducted by aliens.  Thank goodness we're watching a movie that doesn't
take itself too seriously!
     Day three is the big finale, when the President makes a cornball
speech and everyone charges off to "kick E.T.'s ass." This last hour is
also the weakest section in the film.  In particular, the editing could
use a few nips and tucks toward the end.  (Here, a scene runs long;
there, a sequence seems slightly truncated.) Another suggestion for the
inevitable director's cut:  add more scientific mumbo jumbo.  Though
INDEPENDENCE DAY consistently adheres to its own scientific principals--
such as joysticks being the intergalactic standard for fighter craft
controls-- even a *little* more explanation would go a long way to
satisfying the nit-pickers who are currently clogging the Internet with
their discussions of same.
     INDEPENDENCE DAY is probably the most honest of the summer movies.
Roland Emmerich and Dean Devlin are, indeed, the Real Thing-- that
increasingly rare breed of genuine showmen, whose dedication to their
craft can seemingly survive any attempt at prepackaging by their
marketing department.  These guys want nothing more than to put on a
good show and, thus, their movie lacks even a whiff of pretension.
(Which, undoubtedly, is a source of frustration for many critics.) All
that is good, bad, and ugly about sci-fi and disaster films is
represented here.  Given the range of intentional references-- from the
likes of THE POSEIDON ADVENTURE to THE WAR OF THE WORLDS-- I suspect
that both Roland and Dean would even be proud to see their movie shown
on MYSTERY SCIENCE THEATER 3000.  It's *that* cool.  
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Fathers' Day (1997)
     FATHER'S DAY is an unfunny, unmoving sentimental comedy, about two
middle-aged men (Robin Williams and Billy Crystal) who team up to find a
17-year-old runaway who may or may not be one or the other's son.  For-
get the missing jokes, or the glaring lack of sympathetic characters, or
the wasted talents of two talented comedians, or the throwaway role for 
Julia Louis-Dreyfus.  Most stupefying is the premise itself:  we are to
believe that a happily married woman (Natassia Kinski) has no other re-
course than to contact her decades-since-seen lovers?  I mean, her
husband is already on the case.  Doesn't she have any friends or family
who can also assist?  Idiotic.  Directed by Ivan Reitman and written by
Lowell Ganz and Babaloo Mandel, all of whom can do (and have done)
better.

Title
Review for Boot, Das (1981)
     The director's cut of DAS BOOT is playing in Chapel Hill and I work
in Cary, which isn't even halfway between Graceland East and the
Chelsea.  So, I opt to forgo my ritual Friday afternoon matinee-- not a
difficult decision, given that the only choice is the poorly reviewed
SPRUNG-- and head in the general direction of that college town.  Over
three hours until an over three-hour movie and I don't even get to go
home.  It's going to be a long night.  With Megadeth in the tape deck
("Hidden Treasures," a compilation of compilation cuts and other B-
sides), the first stop is Durham, to a mall, to a department store, to
buy jeans, which I don't, because I don't care for the colors.  Instead,
what catches my wallet's attention is a row of weed whackers.  (Three
months into home ownership and I'm *still* buying stuff.) I choose a
low-end model:  17", 31 cc, one-year warranty, extra spool of cutting
cord, all for $99.99, plus a gallon gas can and a teeny-tiny bottle of
2-cycle engine oil.  (The enterprising salesperson attempts to sell me a
six pack of said substance *and* an extended warranty.  I roll up my
right sleeve and point to a tattooed right shoulder that reads "not.")
     In the parking deck, later, an off-duty police officer watches in
passing as I struggle to get the gargantuan box into the Elvismobile.
(Success on the second try, this time from the passenger side.  Duh.)
Departing the deck, I happen upon an outdoor display of city vehicles,
including the nearly departed (it's 5 p.m.) Durham Fire Department
Tactical Rescue Team.  I pause to talk and take a last-minute tour of
their equipment truck.  (The captain proudly notes that all cribbing and
shoring materials are handmade.) We leave together, with Engine 5 on my
ass all the way up to the I-85 exchange.  (I secretly hope that they'll
get a call, even though they have electronic sirens, which are never as
much fun as the mechanical ones.) The next stop is still up for grabs.
Do I have enough time to make a Best Buy/Barnes and Noble run?  No, I
decide, and set my sights on downtown Chapel Hill and Franklin Street,
my favorite few blocks in all of the Triangle.
    Changing tapes to a Judas Priest tribute-- the European version:
twenty-five artists on two volumes, dude-- I start my way south, down
15-501, so I can admire the recent road construction and see if they've
opened the new exit ramp to the Martin Luther King Jr.  Parkway, where
the Wynnsong lives.  (They haven't.) Rush hour hits on the other side of
I-40.  I pass the time by playing heavy beats on my car horn.  In
another ten, I'm scouting parking meters in the downtown proper.  (And
only one pass is required!  Wohoo!) I secure a spot near the planet-
arium and, after claiming some quarters from a corner coffee shop, I'm
hoofing it to a hole-in-the-wall pizza parlor, where I down a double
dose of pepperoni, read a weekly newspaper that I've already read, and
try to figure out just how in the Hell this place makes any money with
at least fifteen people working behind the counter.
    With an hour to go until show time, I take a hike, breezing over to
the main fire station (apparatus count:  two pumpers, one reserve), and
then to a used bookstore, where I acquire a collection of quotations
about the King ("just send me a million dollars, never mind the script,
and Elvis will do the picture," Colonel Tom Parker) and a 1982 biography
of Jerry Lee Lewis.  ("You've been married five times now.  Do you know
any more about women now then you did the first time you got married?"
"Yeah.  Pu**y is pu**y.") Back to the car and, regrettably, without the
time to stroll across campus and admire the young ladies in ponytails
and jogging shorts.  (This being Franklin Street, I have to settle for
orange hair and baggy pants.) I arrive at the Chelsea with twenty min-
utes to spare.  The tiny theater doesn't smell too fresh.  ("Like the
inside of a submarine," notes a fellow whiffer.) Through the walls,
Randy Travis is singing "King of the Road." I ain't got no cigarettes,
or even a decent seat.  As soon as the show starts, sure enough, some
big-headed fool sits directly in front of me.
     Expectedly, the director's cut of DAS BOOT is a long sit.  Yeah,
it's remarkable.  Yeah, it's powerful.  Yeah, it's probably the most
[choose one: realistic/unglamorous/warts-and-all] war movie ever made.
But with an hour of extra footage added to the original 150-minute
running time, this cut is just too damn long.  The expanded story of a
U-boat that waits and waits and waits for some action is more monotonous
than I suspect was ever intended.  Nor did I care for the episodic
nature of the narrative.  Granted, this was originally a six-hour German
mini-series, but one scene transition is so abrupt that I thought we'd
stumbled upon a dream sequence!  Finally, there are the inferior
exteriors.  While the camera work *inside* of the sub is breathtakingly
breathtaking, the exterior, above-water shots are largely yawn-inducing.
Perhaps writer/director Wolfgang Petersen (OUTBREAK, IN THE LINE OF
FIRE) could contact George Lucas, for a little help with those never-
quite-convincing blue-screen and miniature effects.

Title
Review for Nuits fauves, Les (1992)
     Art *is* life in SAVAGE NIGHTS, the compelling but overlong story of 
a dying man who learns to love. The final feature from French filmmaker 
Cyril Collard, who died of an AIDS-related illness a year ago March, 
swept the Cesars (winning Best Movie, Best Debut Film, Best Editing, and 
Best New Actress) three days after its maker met its maker.
     Adapted from Collard's autobiographical novel (and starring 
himself!), SAVAGE NIGHTS opens in 1986, the year the young filmmaker 
learned of his infection after returning to Paris from a shoot in 
Morocco. The news doesn't exactly deter his daring and Collard, who is 
bisexual, continues on an exceedingly reckless lifestyle that, 
eventually, transforms both himself and his lovers, Samy (Carlos Lopez) 
and Laura (Romane Bohringer).
     SAVAGE NIGHTS takes a bit too long to get where it's going, but the 
direction is great and, as an AIDS-related drama, the film runs rings 
around anything Hollywood has the courage to create.  Watch Romane 
Bohringer refuse a condomn from her HIV-positive lover and you'll never 
view screen-sex the same.

Title
Review for Frighteners, The (1996)
     Each week, the magazine "Entertainment Weekly" includes a blurb in
their movie section which compares the opinions of several national
critics.  Their ratings are averaged and compared to the weekly results
of an audience exit poll.  Not surprisingly, the public tends thinks
more of most movies than the critics do.  One of the explanations for
this might involve the concept of popular versus critical opinion.  I
won't go down *that* road.  Another likely reason is the simple fact
that most people want to enjoy what they pay for, even if they don't
really like it.  Think about that.  Add in the price of popcorn, plus
the investment of time required to wait in traffic, wait in the lobby,
and wait for the trailers to end, and you're stuck in a situation where
the only alternative to feeling good about a movie, is to feel shame for
the wasted effort.  For this reason, I presume that most folks will
*not* be walking out of THE FRIGHTENERS, a failed supernatural comedy
that is nearly unwatchable for the first thirty minutes.
    The beginning is the worst-- a sloppy, incoherent mess that shows
such silliness as a woman (Dee Wallace Stone) being chased through an
old mansion by special-effects induced apparitions, a short "psychic
investigator" (Michael J. Fox) attempting to crash a funeral, and that
same person later careening down a hill in an out-of-control jalopy.
Huh?  Is bad driving what New Zealand director Peter Jackson (HEAVENLY
CREATURES) thinks is funny to us Americans?  Next comes the appearance
of a floating Elvis statue-- "he lives," utters an unbeliever-- and the
discovery that Fox's character is a con man, thankyouverymuch.  Though
he really *can* see the spooks, he's actually on fairly friendly terms
with them.  They help him scare up business.  Of course, nobody in the
small coastal town is particularly fazed by these ghoulish goings-on.
Maybe they've seen GHOSTBUSTERS a few too many times, but the residents
sure take their psychic investigator in stride.  Just as they seem
unfazed by a recent rash of inexplicable deaths...
     Mercifully, the movie gets (a bit) better as it goes.  The human
element is execrable, but a clever cast of Caspers often amuses.  Chi
McBride is funny as a jive-talking spirit still wearing bell- bottoms.
That's John Astin under make-up as the (literally) jaw- dropping Judge;
he has some salacious fun with an Egyptian mummy.  Also look for a
memorable appearance by R. Lee Ermey, reprising his FULL METAL JACKET
role as a deceased drill instructor.  I rather enjoyed all the
oppressive imagery of death and decay.  You may want to leave the
younger ones at home, though, as the rotting corpses and dusty skeletons
may send them screaming into the lobby.  Heh, heh.  A macabre finale,
set inside of an abandoned hospital, is the high-point of this low
movie.  Jackson cross-cuts between the present (Fox and Trini Alvarado
in peril) and the past (Jake Busey as a mass-murdering orderly) and it's
a grisly gas.  With exploding heads and carved foreheads, the sequence
might even have been scary, if the rest of the movie hadn't so
completely dulled our senses. 
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Jackie Brown (1997)
     After an eclectic array of post-PULP FICTION distractions-- vampire
flicks, script doctorings, horrid Christmas Day anthologies, etc.-- Q.T.
is back, doin' what he does best, adapting Elmore Leonard's "Rum Punch"
as the year's best black comedy/caper flick/love story/'70's musical re-
vue.  (Forget BOOGIE NIGHTS, this is the soundtrack to shake your booty
to.)  An exceptionally striking Pam Grier plays the title character, a
44 y.o. stewardess on a cut-rate airline, caught smuggling gun money
(and a bit of blow) for Sam Jackson's small-time L.A. arms dealer.  Fac-
ing a change to an already underwhelming lifestyle, she cuts a deal with
the feds, enlists the aid of a increasingly friendly been-there-done-
that bail bondsman (Robert Forster), and begins concocting a scheme to
win her freedom, and, maybe, just maybe, walk away with a chunk of the
half mil that's also part of the plan.
     Double and triple crosses ensue, but they're fairly easy to follow.
Far more jarring-- initially, at least--  is the relaxed pace and
straightforward narrative.  (That is, unless you've never seen a Taran-
tino flick, in which case you'll probably be blushing at Jackson's ample
use of n***** and m*****f*****.)  Other Q.T. trademarks are present and
accounted for, including the expected conversational asides.  (My fave:
Jackson detailing the influence of Hong Kong action flicks on handgun
demand.)  There's less violence than you might expect and only one zany,
brainy instance of time-shifting, which happens toward the end, when an
event is told thrice, from three different viewpoints.  The real joy,
though, is in the depth of characterizations.  We're given a generous
amount of screen time to know and grow to love the three principals.  In
turn, Grier, Forster, and Jackson reward us with rich (and, in Jackson's
case, also electrifying) performances.  Really, the only shame is that
it has to end.  With supporting turns of varying success by Bridget
Fonda, Michael Keaton, and Robert DeNiro.

Title
Review for Angus (1995)
     The title character in this coming-of-age flick is a very large
(and very smart) high schooler with two primary problems:  a tremendous
crush on a cheerleader and a lifelong feud with her boyfriend, the
school's star quarterback.  In a plot twist reminiscent of CARRIE, fat
boy and blondie are unexpectedly named King and Queen of the prom and
you can guess what's planned to happen next.
     Though as lumpy as its hero, ANGUS has a soft heart and an even
sweeter message.  Newcomer Charlie Talbert, who plays the lad, is an
affable presence, even if he lisps a bit much.  Also on hand is Kathy
Bates, as Mom, and George C. Scott as the narcoleptic grandfather whose
sole advice to his `son is "screw `em."  Great soundtrack, too.
     "Hack the world!"  That's the credo of a gang of young cyberpunks
who find themselves doing damage control after one of them
steals-for-fun a sensitive corporate file with potentially ecologically
disastrous results.  As one character in the movie notes, "there is no
right and wrong, only fun and boring."  [The pocket-protected audience
nods in silent approval.]
     Director Ian Sofely (BACKBEAT) gives the film a grungy, lived-in
look that's very inviting.  As are the fresh faces in the cast,
including Jonny Lee Miller and Angelina Jolie.  (Look closely and you
can see the resemblance between Jolie and her father, Jon Voight.  What
a find!  And, yes, that's Alberta Watson of SPANKING THE MONKEY fame
playing the mother!)
     The "hacking" sequences are unusual.  Sofely opts for imagery
instead of explanation; dazzling VR instead of a line-by-line (or
window-by- window) demonstration of the craft.  Sure, there's not a
byte of believable technology here--the story is set some
not-too-far-future where laptops can do *anything*--but the characters
are strong.  What a concept, a character-driven "computer movie."
     Writer/director Todd Haynes' intriguing drama about a woman
suffering from "environmental illness" is maddening for two reasons.
First is the pace, which is s-l-o-w.  SAFE moves at about half-speed.
More time to reflect?  Perhaps.  More chances to become restless?
Yes.  The second method for my madness is Hayne's relentless ambiguity
towards his subject.  We're given the facts of the case--a housewife
(Julianne Moore) becomes increasingly "allergic" to her
surroundings--and nothing more.  Haynes invites us to draw our own
conclusion, but just a *little* bit of opposing viewpoint would be
nice.  At least *one* character who could stand up and say "what a
bunch of New Age bunk!"
     Three years after his underrated directorial debut on ALIEN 3,
music-video whiz David Fincher is back with an equally engaging
thriller about an ingenious serial killer stalking a nameless American
city.  The detectives on the case are played by Morgan Freeman (the
veteran) and Brad Pitt (the rookie).  Their quarry is a sermonizing
killer who's preaching through imaginative variations on the seven
deadly sins.
     Atmosphere is everything in Fincher's house of horrors.  Constant
rain, dismal lighting, and amplified sound effects all work to weary
effect.  As does the queasy subject matter.  (Though the gore is kept
to a minimum, you'll know very early if you have the stomach for
this.)  The methodical pace may also be off-putting to some.  SEVEN
requires patience.  Anxious viewers may find themselves straining their
chains much in the same manner that Pitt's gung-ho character does.
     Though it certainly doesn't aspire to any lofty ambitions,
SHOWGIRLS is still a failure.  The problems start in the opening scene,
where the liabilities of actress Elizabeth Berkley are exposed even
before her breasts are.  She has spunk and little else.  (Though some
might argue that she *needs* little else in a movie that wants to give
new meaning the term "titillate."  Forget the rating--the worst you'll
see here are a few female frontal shots.)
     Drawing from the Bad Actors Guild is only part of the problem.
The director, Paul Verhoeven (BASIC INSTINCT, ROBOCOP), can't decide if
he's presenting a strip show or a morality play.  So he tries for
both.  What he ends up with is $40M of Vegas glitz that's neither
erotic nor dramatic enough to be interesting.  A long sit.
     Los Angeles, circa 1960.  A young boy (Nathan Watt) is struggling
to cope with his dying mother (a graceful Andie MacDowell), his distant
inventor father (John Turturro), and two mentally ill uncles (Maury
Chaykin and Michael "Cosmo Kramer" Richards).  The first dramatic
feature directed by actress Diane Keaton didn't move me in the least,
so I can't advise on the story's emotional core.  *I* didn't find it.
Still, this is an admirably well-restrained weeper, with a polished
period look that's easy on the teary eye.  From the memoirs by Franz
Lidz.

Title
Review for Getaway, The (1994)
     Though flat as the proverbial pancake, Roger Donaldson's THE
GETAWAY is the best alternative, yet, to a season overloaded with
oppressive drama.  In the wake of everything from Vietnam to the
Holocaust, this throwaway Basinger/Baldwin vehicle is pleasingly
passable pulp.
     The original GETAWAY, directed in 1972 by Sam Peckinpah, starred
Steve McQueen and Ali MacGraw.  Now, cutest-couple Alec Baldwin and Kim
Basinger takeover the roles of a crime couple who double-cross both
their partner and their sponsor in a million-dollar heist.
     Even when sporting a temporary beard (which makes him look like
GI-Joe), the former Jack Ryan outclasses everyone else including his
wife.  Poses and all, he's a surprisingly steely presence.
     Kim Basinger tries to look tough, but she's no more intimidating
than costars Michael Madsen (the partner) and James Woods (the
sponsor).  Together, they provide three textbook examples of good bad
acting.
     Talent (or lack thereof) notwithstanding, the four do pretty well
for about an hour.  With Baldwin in the lead, they plan their crosses
and double-crosses and create a level of tension that never evaporates
from the film.
     The pace stinks and nothing's funny, but director has a flair for
action that keeps the first hour interesting.  The midday robbery at a
dog track is a keeper.  As is a chase on a train with Baldwin stalking
a petty thief.
     Mousey-voiced Jennifer Tilly shows up around the film's midpoint
and completely changes the tone of the film.  Playing a dim-but-buxom
hostage, she has the Meyer Touch: every scene she touches turns to
camp.  Which is frustrating as all get-out because the rest of the cast
is playing things straight!
     Of course, a little unintentional humor isn't bad.  Until the
writers beginning adding their *own* jokes into the last half-hour.  By
the inevitable Big Shoot-Out, everyone's going in three different
directions.  Some are doing deadpan.  Some are trying to be funny.
Others are funny *without* trying.
     If nothing else, THE GETAWAY rewards the patent with a few
deliriously dumb moments.  Madsen talking tough with a kitten on his
chest is something to see.  As is Basinger and Baldwin having a
heart-to-heart in a landfill.  But, for my money, nothing screams
"stop" louder than the sight of a Basinger haymaker striking Tilly's
joke jaw.

Title
Review for L.A. Confidential (1997)
     This one left me a bit cold.  Director Curtis Hanson's acclaimed
adaptation of James Ellroy's neo-noir novel is overripe with all sorts
of wonderfully sordid stuff:  dirty cops, corrupt politicians, drug
smuggling, sex scandals, sleazy journalists, racism, murder, and, last
but not least, high-priced hookers surgically altered to look like movie
stars.  Fabulous art direction, a handsome cast, and a level of violence
that actually shocks (for a change) are the stronger selling points.
The overly-complicated script, however, ultimately short changes the
characters.  Nearly every incident relates, in some way, to the bigger
mystery.  And, with precious few asides-- chances for the characters to
simply *be*-- individual scenes become difficult to appreciate as
anything other than pieces to the larger puzzle.  (As in THE GAME, your
brain is busy working ahead.  And even *then* some things don't add up.
Such as a sudden outburst of sexual aggression from one of the main 
characters.)  Admittedly, part of the problem is in front of the camera.
Two of the three leads are non-stars:  Guy Pearce (PRISCILLA, QUEEN OF
THE DESERT) and Russell Crowe (VIRTUOSITY, THE QUICK AND THE DEAD).
They're very good, but neither commands the screen to the extent that
you can't take your eyes off of them.  Same goes for Kevin Spacey, who
we *know* can muster more dramatic weight than he does here.

Title
Review for Client, The (1994)
Directed by     Joel Schumacher
Written by Akiva Goldsman, Robert Getchell,
        based on the novel by John Grisham
Cast Susan Sarandon, Tommy Lee-Jones, Mary Louise-Parker, Anthony LaPaglia,
     Anthony Edwards, Ossie Davis, Brad Renfro, and J.T. Walsh
MPAA Rating     "PG-13"
Running Time    120 minutes
     THE FIRM was soft, THE PELICAN BRIEF wasn't, and THE CLIENT is a
trial.  Why is John Grisham so hard to make into a movie?  Three, count
'em three different filmmakers have attempted to best the bestselling
author and, with the lastest loss THE CLIENT, three strikes have made
little more than one out.
     The story is straight-forward and easy-to-follow and doesn't have
one scene of anyone going crazy in a copy room.  The plot is about a
eleven-year old Tennessee boy (Renfro) who may be the key to a Memphis
mob murder.  He won't talk to the Feds and barely cooperates with his
lawyer (Sarandon).  That is, until the mob sends some men to "tie up
loose ends." Even though no one actually says that in the movie.
     Brad Renfro and Susan Sarandon are the stars and they have good
chemistry and are more believable than either Tom Cruise or Julia
Roberts.  Renfro, in particular, is politely unpolished and a
refreshing change for smoother child actors.
     With the exception of Ossie Davis--who chairs the film's sole
exciting scene--the rest of the cast is a waste.  Yes, even Tommy Lee
Jones. But they all do drawl within the lines; sometimes even sounding
like bad Elvis impersonators.
     Speaking of which, I counted a total of eight references to The
Big E.  There may be more.  Uuuh-huh.
     THE CLIENT has some good local color and the occasional flash of
humor, but, considering the competition, is hardly deserving of your
summer movie dollars.  There's nothing exciting here.
     Anyone up to again adapt Clive Cussler?  Surely no one remembers
RAISE THE TITANIC....
BOTTOM LINE:  This is the guy who's going to direct BATMAN FOREVER??

Title
Review for With Honors (1994)
Forget that the ads hint at something more silly, WITH HONORS is a calm 
college comedy cum drama about a homeless man (Joe Pesci) who enters the 
lives of four Harvard roommates (Brendan Fraiser, Moria Kelly, Patrick 
Dempsey, and Josh Hamilton).
The plot device is a 100-page thesis, lost by Monty (Fraiser) and rescued 
by Simon (Pesci), a "financially challenged" individual who lives under 
the college library. Simon offers a trade: one page for one favor.  Said 
favors range from a "pristine glazed donut" to a place to stay for the 
winter. In comes the bum, out comes astonishment (from Monty's roomies) 
and everyone ends up with a squishy life-lesson for their troubles.
William Mastrosimone's dialogue is rather ripe, but director Alek 
Keshishian (TRUTH OR DARE) keep a tight reign on both the tone and Pesci. 
The diminutive Oscar-winner doesn't have much room to expand, much less 
scene-steal, and that's probably the point. At least up until a cornball 
ending which reunites the bum with his son.  P-l-e-a-s-e.
Watch for Gore Vidal, a stitch as a Monty's mentor. A sample of his 
dialogue : "I don't agree with what your brain has produced."
If nothing else, WITH HONORS makes a pleasing alternative to the abandon-
hope-all-ye-under-30 outlook portrayed in REALITY BITES.

Title
Review for Rainmaker, The (1997)
     Frankly, the *last* thing that I wanted to see on a Saturday night
was yet another John Grisham flick, about yet another young law dude
(Matt Damon) tackling his first big case.  (This is, what, the *third*
such story in a row, after THE CHAMBER and A TIME TO KILL?)  Imagine my
surprise to find adaptation #6 possessing a strong, often broadly played
comedic streak.  Sure, the outcome is predictable, duh, but the road to
get there is refreshingly lighter-hearted.  Francis Ford Coppola, who
wrote and directed, serves up ample humor at every turn, from those de-
liriously tacky Memphis locales to the occasional bit of outright slap-
stick.  (The scene-stealer, here, is DeVito.  In a smaller role, Mickey
Rourke is oily fun.  And don't miss Dean Stockwell's delightful hacking-
cough cameo.)  The courtroom scenes have the requisite surprises, but
not nearly enough dramatic punch.  The tone is breezy, almost whimsical;
the pacing is methodical, though we could use a bit more urgency toward
the end.  Trickier is the subplot involving Claire Danes as an abused
young wife (and potential love interest), but the filmmakers pull it
off.  (That is, except for Elmer Bernstein's score, that too often in-
trudes upon the couple's quiet time.)  And, as the main character real-
izes by the end of the movie, there's no small irony in a story about an
ambulance-chasing, money-grubbing law firm going after a claims-denying,
money-grubbing insurance agency.

Title
Review for Wyatt Earp (1994)
Directed by     Lawrence Kasdan  
Written by      Dan Gordon & Kasdan
Cast Kevin Costner, Dennis Quaid, Gene Hackman, Jeff Fahey, Mark Harmon,
     Michael Madsen, Catherine O'Hara, Bill Pullman, Isabella Rosselini,
     Tom Sizemore, JoBeth Williams
MPAA Rating     "PG-13"
Running Time    189 minutes
     WYATT EARP has a lot to tell and little to say. This story of the
legendary lawman runs three hours and nine minutes and that's too long
for this epic-wannabe that plays more like a TV mini-series than a
movie.
     The story opens on the Earp family farm, with young Wyatt ready to
run away from home.  He wants to fight in the Civil War, but his dad
(Hackman) has different ideas and wants his son to study law. Time
passes and Wyatt heads west, returns home to marry, and, after a spell,
begins his career in law enforcement. By the time he (Costner) and his
brothers (Madsen, David Andrews, and Linden Ashby) arrive in Tombstone,
Wyatt has tried his hand at everything from hunting buffalo to dealing
cards.
     WYATT EARP is very appealing in places-- such as cast, costumes,
and cinematography-- but an overstated story and overpowered score
deaden most of the emotional impact.  Who can be moved by scene after
scene after scene of swelling strings and suffocating speeches?  Somber
is fine-- just ask Clint Eastwood-- but this film that boasts not one,
not two, but three, count 'em three, hammy death scenes!
     Still, a little bit of EARP goes a long way and the life and times
of the legendary lawman are from uninteresting stuff.  His, uh, unusual
relations with women, for example, are an intriguing contrast to his
character's credo of "nothing counts as much as blood."  Equally amusing
is a buffalo-hunting (and skinning!) sequence that is decidedly
non-PC.
     Director Lawrence Kasdan takes a refreshingly realistic approach
to the gunplay.  The infamous gunfight at the OK Corral is both brutal
and brief, devoid of almost any theatrics.  Don't look for much
glorified violence here.
     Despite some large exclamation points in the story, the characters
*do* come to life. The diverse cast includes everyone from Betty
Buckley (!) to Mackenzie Astin (!!).
     Kevin Costner is very good in the title role.  Dances With Whitney
nevers get as steely as the role requires, though, but his
transformation from lighthearted law student to stoic sheriff is fun to
watch.  He was tougher in A PERFECT WORLD.
     His foil is Dennis Quaid, who pulled a DeNiro by losing 40+ pounds
to play the tubercular terror Doc Holliday.  Gaunt *and* gamely, he's a
scene stealer who's seen too little. Other familiar faces include Tom
Sizemore (looking like Bruce McGill), Bill Pullman (looking like Jeff
Daniels), and Lea Thompson (looking like someone other than Lea
Thompson). Both Gene Hackman and Isabella Rosselini appear and
disappear like magic, while late entries Catherine O'Hara and JoBeth
Williams are surprisingly solid.
     Though the story and score should've tried "less is more," all
other credits are technical tops.  Production designer Ida Random, art
director Gary Wissner, and costume designer Colleen Atwood are some of
the VIPS who helped spend what must've been an enormous budget.
Clearly no expense was spared.

Title
Review for Postman, The (1997)
     THE POSTMAN is pretty bad.  Kevin Costner produces, directs, and
stars in this ponderous, preposterous post-apocalyptic epic about an
actor who dons a blue uniform as a trick to get food.  He spins a yarn
about a restored U.S. government, which inspires others to hit the sack,
which, in turn, unites several previously disconnected Pacific Northwest
communities.  The core story, here, is a good one, but the narrative too
often zigs when it should zag.  Costner indulges himself in such dopey
detours as an extended love scene, when the screen time could be better-
used elsewhere.  (Perhaps to explain the relationship between the bad
guys-- an organized army of bandits-- and the various barricaded towns
that they terrorize?) The grand vistas and hundreds of extras are some-
thing to see, I guess, even if the tone is too thick and the story makes
increasingly less sense as it goes.  (In particular, the time frame is a
tough sell.  Less than nine months for all this sweeping stuff to occur?
And did you catch the hero's pregnant girlfriend lamenting her late hus-
band as the "best man she'd ever known" and only an hour earlier
describing how he beat her?  Good grief.)  Maybe if Mr. Costner paid
more attention to the trees, he'd have a forest worth seeing.  Maybe.
Return to sender.

Title
Review for Hercules (1997)
     Disney's 35th animated feature-- a retooling of the Olympian legend
crossed with, well, the Superman story-- is surprisingly soft at the
center.  Great wit, great art, and a great villain (James Woods as
Hades, Lord of the Underworld and local lounge act) can't quite stifle
the yawns induced by a bland hero, his colorfully monotonous sidekick
(Danny DeVito as the satyrical trainer Phil), and a largely unremarkable
soundtrack.  (None of the Alan Menken/David Zippel tunes are particular-
ly noteworthy.  Some lack lyrical snap.  Others need more memorable
melodies.  Boring ballads we expect, but boring production numbers,
too?)
     So, HERCULES is a bit of a long sit, but you won't stay bored.  The
highlights include a nifty round of animated action (Herc battling a CGI
hydra), a steady stream of anachronisms ("somebody call IX-I-I") and pop
references ("let's get ready to rumble!") a la ALADDIN, and several
long-overdue jabs at the Mouse's marketing and merchandising depart-
ments.  While not as rock-solid as HUNCHBACK, it's a still a new world
of improvement over POCOHONTAS.  Directed by Ron Clements and John
Musker, with voice credits including Tate Donovan, Susan Egan, Bob
Goldthwait, Matt Frewer, Samantha Eggar, Paul Shaffer, and, as Lighting
Bolt Zeus, Rip Torn, who's having a very good summer, also appearing in
TRIAL AND ERROR and MEN IN BLACK.

Title
Review for Mrs. Winterbourne (1996)
     Pairing Shirley MacLaine and Ricki Lake is probably a violation of
the recent Telecommunications Decency Act-- coming soon: Former Lives of
Angst-Filled Psychic Teenagers!-- but since this isn't television, I
guess we don't have to worry.  The two star in MRS.  WINTERBOURNE, a
shallow fairy tale that's even *lighter* than such similar fluff as
PRETTY WOMAN and WHILE YOU WERE SLEEPING.  Based on Cornell Woolrich's
novel "I Married a Dead Man," the plot has a pregnant unwed mother
(Lake) mistaken as a rich man's widow after a train wreck kills both him
and his pregnant wife.  (She wakes up in the hospital, with everyone
calling her a different name.  Sound familiar?) What sounds like the
perfect (albeit grim) "Cinderella story" needs, well, a better actress
than Lake.  She's photogenic enough-- and, of a refreshingly "non-model"
type-- but she's too coarse.  Yeah, I know, her blunt approach fits the
character, but she's still taxing to an audience already contending with
logic leaps, telegraphed emotions, and a few too many happily-ever-
after's.  Directed by Richard Benjamin.  Need I say more?  
--
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC 
legeros@nando.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
Visit me in MOVIE HELL http://www.n-vision.com/hell/>

Title
Review for Crooklyn (1994)
Written by Joie Susannah Lee, Cinque Lee, and Spike Lee
Cast Alfre Woodard, Delory Lindo, Zelda Harris, and a large supporting 
cast including Spike & Joie Lee, Frances Foster, and Vondie Curtis-
Hall
"They talk funny down there."
     - Zelda Harris, who's ten-year-old character has returned from an 
       extended visit "down south."
     Spike Lee goes back to Brooklyn in CROOKLYN, an amusing, 
fictionalized look at the filmmaker's family life in the 1970's. No 
controversy here, just a sprawling comedy/drama that's filled with 
moldy oldies, freaky fashions, and, surprise!, clean city streets.
     Meet the Carmichaels. Carolyn (Alfre Woodard) is the high-strung 
mother who teaches school to pay the bills so her husband, Woody 
(Delory Lindo), can work at reviving his stalled career as a jazz 
musician. Mom's on the edge and can barely keep her (five) kids under 
wraps; they scream and shout about everything from watching SOUL TRAIN 
to eating ice-cream.
     For the Carmichaels, life on "the stoop" has both good days and 
bad. One day they're bickering with their bizarre next-door neighbor 
(David Patrick Kelly), the next they're all crying 'cause Daddy's left 
home. But CROOKLYN, like youth, is relatively upbeat and, with one 
exception, nothing terrible ever befalls the family. Even after an 
experiment in shoplifting by oldest child and only girl Troy (played 
by Zelda Harris, who is the *real* find in the film).
     In fact, the biggest threat on the block is a pair of airplane-
glue sniffers!  Wow, what a difference a double-decade makes.
     Well-intentioned it is, well-written it ain't. CROOKLYN is a 
narrative train-wreck that splits the focus in too many directions. 
Mom and dad and the kids and the neighbors and the merchants all 
compete for story time and, simply, there's too much going on to know 
on what's really going on.
     (My vote for Most Glaring Non-sequitur is David Patrick Kelly, 
who has a split-second *second* role as a TV preacher with a wife 
who's wearing just a tad too much makeup. Sound familiar? :)
     But Spike's skills as a director are always fresh and CROOKLYN is 
certainly a good watch.  That is, with the exception of his choice to 
change the film's aspect ratio during a family visit "down south." But 
the joke's on Lee-- his portrayal of The-South-as-a-another-planet is 
*already* disorienting.
     Oddly, CROOKLYN doesn't do extremes. Lee keeps a tight reign on 
both dour drama and high hilarity. The tears are few and the laughs 
are lazy. He doesn't skimp on the music, though, and CROOKLYN features 
over three *dozen* period pieces that are available, as the credits 
conveniently note, on a two-volume soundtrack set.
     Lest we forget the errs of our ways, credit the design 
departments for filling this 70's Offend-A-Thon with orange walls and 
platform shoes and more afros than you can shake a pick at. May we 
never paint furniture olive again.

Title
Review for Amistad (1997)
(Dreamworks)
Directed by     Steven Spielberg
Written by      David Franzoni
Cast            Djimon Hounsou, Matthew McConaughey, Morgan Freeman,
                Anthony Hopkins, Nigel Hawthorne, Stellan Skarsgard,
                David Paymer, Pete Postlethwaite, Anna Paquin
MPAA Rating     "R" (presumably for violence and nudity)
Running Time    157 minutes
Reviewed at     The Rialto Theatre, Raleigh, NC (25DEC97)
     AMISTAD is a bit of a sit.  Seemingly shooting for another SCHIN-
DLER'S, Steven Spielberg only halfway hits the mark with this fascinat-
ing but emotionally under-involving 19th Century history lesson.  He
nails the slave ship sequences, to be sure-- they're as riveting as
anything you'll see this season.  Too bad they occupy no more than 20 or
30 minutes of screen time, tops.  The rest is talky courtroom stuff,
with a bit of punchy humor, here and there, in each culture's reaction
to the other.  (Particularly choice is the African take on Christian-
ity.)  The period detail is excellent and the actors are quite good,
even if the cast is populated by a few too many familiar faces.  (Look,
there's Stellan Skarsgard from GOOD WILL HUNTING!  Look, there's Daniel
von Bargen from THE POSTMAN!)  Most jarring is John William's score,
which intrudes to the point of embarrassment.  (The "give us free" mo-
ment is particularly painful.)  Schmaltz has its place in many Spielberg
movies, but not this one.  With Djimon Hounsou, Matthew McConaughey,
Morgan Freeman, Nigel Hawthorne, David Paymer, Pete Postlethwaite, and
in a small but critical role, Anthony Hopkins as John Quincy Adams.

Title
Review for Six Degrees of Separation (1993)
     Sturdy filmmaker Fred Schepisi follows up his delightful
MR. BASEBALL with the equally enjoyable SIX DEGREES OF SEPARATION.
Though so-so as social commentary, this is cunning comedy when it
works.  Which is most of the time.
     SIX DEGREES OF SEPARATION is based on the award-winning stage
play, which, in turn, is based on the real-life story of a young man
who conned several members of New York City's "upper echelon" by posing
as the son of a famous actor.
     The film opens on Flan and Ouisa Kittredge (Sutherland and
Channing), a posh Fifth Avenue couple with an incredible story to tell
(via flashback).  The night before, a wounded young black man, Paul
(Smith), arrives at their door.  He claims to know their children at
Harvard. He also claims to be the son of Sidney Poiter (!).
     To the insulated couple, he certainly looks and sounds the part.
He says he's in town to make a film of "Cats."  He say he's in charge
of hiring extras.  And he says he was mugged and his thesis--on
CATCHER IN THE RYE as a hate doctrine (!)--was stolen.
     Soon, Paul's poise and charm has his hosts hanging on his every
word.  And, after serving them up a spectacular meal, the couple
insists that he stay the night.  Which leads to disaster on the
morning-after.  Paul is kicked out, the flashback ends, and the
Kittredges become the talk of the town....
     The first 45 minutes of SIX DEGREES OF SEPARATION is brash,
unpredictable fun.  The dialogue is a stitch, the pace is lively, and
the gullibility of Fran and Ouisa radiates like sunshine.  Watching
Paul worm his way into the controlled lives of the Kittredges is
classic comedy.  But it ends when the flashback does.
     Once the con is gone, the film deflates a bit.  The plot becomes
more conventionally paced as everyone struggles to understand the hows
and whys of what happened to them.  Comedy takes a breather as social
commentary rears its ugly head.  The whole things goes on
twenty minutes too long and wraps with an embarrassingly literal
finale.
     SIX DEGREES OF SEPARATION strives for the subtlety of Woody Allen.
But even with all the high-brow humor, this is really just pop comedy
with class.
     That said, there's a ton to enjoy in this film.  Great gags, great
lines, and a cast that's perfect.  Sutherland is droll fun, playing
comedy for the first time in who knows when.  Channing is wide-eyed and
wide-open and the real anchor of the film.  She's Oscar-nomination
good, even when saddled with an awful closing speech.
     Then there's Smith.  The young actor/rapper continues his upward
spiral as a rising talent.  He shows a nice range of emotions in the
film's most dimensional role.  And watch the supporting cast for a
surprise turn from former John Hughes habit Anthony Michael Hall.
     Though seemingly a "light" comedy, SIX DEGREES OF SEPARATION does
a boast a strong sexual content that may surprise some viewers.  But,
after all, it *is* New York.  -:)

Title
Review for Virtuosity (1995)
     More virtual-reality stuff from director Brett Leonard (HIDEAWAY,
THE LAWNMOWER MAN).  The year is 1999, Los Angeles, and convicts are
being used as test subjects against the VR criminal Sid 6.7 (Russell
Crowe).  Sid--a composite of 183 of the worst serial killers of all
time--was created for law enforcement purposes, but he plays too
rough.  Before the computerized killer can be shut down, he "escapes"
into reality via the body of a nano- machine android.  The only person
who can track him is an ex-cop convict (Denzel Washington) whose family
was killed by one of the aforementioned "psychos."
     There's lots to look at in VIRTOUSITY.  Leonard's hyperviolent
vision of a vaguely Fascist future is pretty cool.  (The LAPD drives
hummers.) The FX and production design are the best, and always
outshine the boring humans.  Without a single concern for
characterization, the old-fashioned story just chugs along merrily,
right up until the overwrought climax that features, yawn, two guys on
a roof with fists.  (Don't expect much suspense.)
     The cast is okay.  Russell Crowe breezes through his part with
minimal scenery-chewing, while Denzel Washington is a strong, bland
presence.  (He was *much* more fun in the underrated 1991
action-thriller RICOCHET, Joel Silver producer.) Other prominent
players include Kelly Lynch, Louise Fletcher (!), and William
Forsythe.  The latter sports a shaggy mustache and slicked hair that
makes him a dead ringer for Nick Nolte.  Or is it Pat Hingle??
CAMEO WATCH:  Yup, that's Traci Lords as a nightclub dancer.
     George Orwell meets E. B. White in this adorable Aussie import
about a pig who thinks he's a sheepdog.  Before you roll your eyes at
yet *another* animal comedy, check out director Chris Noonan's switched
perspective that puts the animals before the humans.  A combination of
live-action and animatronic tricks (from Jim Henson's Creature Shop)
make this barnyard gang appear to talk (via voice-overs).  The main
characters include a plucky pig, a neurotic duck, and a matriarchal
Border Collie. (We could all do without the Greek chorus of
squeaky-voiced rodents, though, who appear at odd intervals to announce
the title cards.)
     Co-produced and co-written by George Miller (MAD MAX), of all
people, from the children's book by Dick King-Smith.  Fine technical
credits throughout, including a delightful score that's based on one of
*my* favorite orchestral works, Camille Saint-Saens' "Symphony No.3 Op
78."
     Called a classic in its day, now, twenty years later, BELLE DU
JOUR comes across as chaste, stiff, and only mildly intriguing.  The
story centers on a young housewife (Catherine Deneuve) whose frigidity
toward her husband--coupled with her lavish, sadomasochistic
dreams--compels her to take a job at a local brothel.  (Apparently,
she's never heard of therapy.)  The silence is the most
disconcerting--director Luis Bunuel includes very little in the way of
incidental music or sound effects.
     We walked out after about an hour.  The slow, uninvolving
story--of an elephant's role in the Vietnam War--is based on a
real-life incident that was probably much more interesting than the
sanitized version presented here.  (This is ABC/Disney, where even
costar Denis Leary has to watch his mouth.)  The cast is agreeable,
though, and director Simon Wincer--how appropriate--finds the correct
tone to balance war and slapstick, which means that OPERATION DUMBO
DROP is probably okay for kids.  Pachydull.

Title
Review for Clear and Present Danger (1994)
Directed by     Philip Noyce        
Written by      Donald Stewart, Steven Zaillian, and John Milius
Cast Harrison Ford, Willem DaFoe, Anne Archer, Donald Moffat, Harris Yulin,
     Henry Czerny, Joaquim de Almeida, Raymond Cruz, Miguel Sandoval,
     Dean Jones (!), Hope Lange (!!), James Earl Jones
MPAA Rating     "PG-13"
Running Time    144 minutes
     Continuity buffs can rejoice at the return of Jack Ryan in CLEAR
AND PRESENT DANGER, the third Tom Clancy adaptation behind THE HUNT FOR
RED OCTOBER and PATRIOT GAMES.  Back is second-star Harrison Ford
(after Alec Baldwin).  Back is second-director Philip Noyce, who helmed
the horrendous PATRIOT GAMES.
     The story sees Jack stepping into the shoes of his boss (James
Earl Jones), the Acting Deputy Director of Intelligence.  Conflict
comes when Ryan's White House "buddies" won't let him in on a little
secret--the fact that President has given his round-about
authorization to a covert military operation against a Columbia drug
lord (Sandoval).  (Said czar murdered a friend of the President (Donald
Moffat) that is a very bad thing to do.)
     So, when the operation inevitably goes from worse to up doo-doo
creek, Ryan finds out too much, too late.  And he blows.  His.  Stack.
     CLEAR AND PRESENT DANGER is a big, loud, military movie, brimming
with bombs, and jets, and Coast Guard cutters, and aircraft carriers,
and, of course, stone-faced soldiers carrying flag-draped caskets.
Just the way that Tom Clancy writes 'em, and just the way co-writer
John Milius scripts 'em.
     Like THE HUNT FOR RED OCTOBER, the cast is filled almost entirely
by solemn, serious-looking men who spend all of the their time making
Important Decisions without every cracking their countenance.  Ford,
Moffat, Jones, Harris Yulin, Henry Czerny, Joaquim de Almeida, Raymond
Cruz, Miguel Sandoval, and Willem DaFoe make up *the* best boys club of
the summer.
     (Best of the bunch in Harris Yulin as the President's Chief of
Staff.  His silence speaks volumes.  But what's Dean Jones doing here?)
     The film has a good pace, despite the mildly confusing plot.
Those who haven't read the novel (or seen a good spy movie lately) may
need to take notes.  The politics are also very good and, even though
the bad guys *do* get theirs, the film is remarkably devoid of any
gratuitious violence.
     Too bad that everything is played way-too-straight.  CLEAR AND
PRESENT DANGER is about as rigid as they come and, under the
unexpectedly tight reigns of Noyce, allows almost *no* room for
levity.  James Earl Jones gets to show all of two smiles, and Harrison
Ford loosens up some, and that's about it, and that's a shame.
     CLEAR AND PRESENT DANGER is too long and too literate to be a
toss-away actioner, but, with a little added "breathing room" for the
characters, could've been on *heck* of an epic.

Title
Review for Return of the Jedi (1983)
    This is the dopiest of the three movies and, thus, the easiest to
pick on.  The tone is insufferably broad.  The cross-cutting is hideous.
Even wise old Yoda is a bore, hacking his way through an embarrassing
death scene.  (Eh heh, eh heh, eh heh, throat lozenge please pass.) And,
and, and, so what?  To quote someone else's .signature, "The ability to
criticize STAR WARS is insignificant next to the power of The Fans." For
all the stuff that sucks-- two words: Ewok babies-- there's something
else that sends even the casual fan soaring.  My favorite moment is
watching Vader watching his son getting creamed by the Emperor.  Those
hollow, plastic eyes chill me to the bone.  (That is, once I accept the
fact that no amount of purple electricity is going to make Mark Hamill's
hair stand on end.)  And don't miss the added footage, at the very end,
showing celebrations on a couple of other planets.  These are the first
glimpses into what we'll likely see in two years, when George Lucas
unveils the first of his STAR WARS prequels.
    RETURN OF THE JEDI was screened at Mann's Chinese Theater, in Los
Angeles.  Lines had formed for both the afternoon and evening shows.  I
had my picture taken with three costumed characters, an Imperial pilot,
a Stormtrooper, and an Imperial guard.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC, USA, Earth
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
I'm also on the Web!  http://www.pagesz.net/~legeros/

Title
Review for Nothing to Lose (1997)
(Touchstone)
Directed by     Steve Oedekerk
Written by      Steve Oedekerk
Cast            Tim Robbins, Martin Lawrence, John C. McGinley,
                Giancarlo Esposito, Kelly Preston, Michael McKean
MPAA Rating     "R" (presumably for language)
Running Time    98 minutes
Reviewed at     Mission Valley Cinemas, Raleigh, NC (18JUL97)
     Tim Robbins and Martin Lawrence are certainly the oddest couple to
come down the pike in a while.  Mr. Susan Sarandon plays Nick Beam, a
Southern California ad executive whose car is jacked by an unemployed
electronics expert (Lawrence).  The catch?  Nick has just discovered his
wife in bed with the boss.  "Boy, did you pick the wrong guy on the
wrong day." Click go the door locks, squeal go the tires, and you can
take it from there.  Yes, they become reluctant best buds.  Yes, they
become partners in crime.  Yes, these and other ridiculous plot points
are cheerfully telegraphed in advance by writer/director Steve Oedekerk
(THE NUTTY PROFESSOR, ACE VENTURA 2: WHEN NATURE CALLS).  Though the
shaggy dog story grows increasingly (and distressingly) warm and fuzzy,
Robbins and Lawrence have a remarkably playful chemistry.  In fact,
they're almost *too* playful.  During several exchanges, the actors
appear barely able to maintain straight faces.  With John C.  McGinley,
Giancarlo Esposito, Kelly Preston, Michael McKean, and, whap!, Irma P.
Hall.

Title
Review for Blown Away (1994)
Directed by     Stephen Hopkins 
Written by      Joe Batteer and John Rice
Cast Jeff Bridges, Tommy Lee Jones, Forrest Whitaker, Suzi Amis, Stephi
     Lineburg, Lloyd Bridges
MPAA Rating     "R" (for violence, profanity, and well-cooked corpses)
Running Time    Approx. 120 minutes
     BLOWN AWAY is more blarney than blast--a bum 'boiler about a
brilliant bomber baiting a Boston bomb squad bloke. Jones is the joker
and Bridges the bluecoat and, if you believe the script, they're both
IRA buddies from before.  At least they *were*, until a botched bombing
sent the set scurrying.  Jones went to jail and Bridges went to
Beantown, where he changed his identity and became a policeman.
     Forget the sustained suspension of SPEED, this "thriller" has
holes big enough to drive a city bus through.  Here is a film that,
among other things, asks its audience to believe that someone with IRA
ties (and an Interpol record, no less!) could be hired as a police
officer!  [Insert clip of author shaking his head.]
     Taken "as is," BLOWN AWAY isn't even good escapism.  Every
character talks too much, and, when the time comes to blow something up
(which isn't often enough), the film never shifts into high gear.  The
filmmakers even botch *the* best set-up in the biz:  a chance to cue a
scene to the finale of Tchaikovsky's "1812 Overture!" Somebody check
the cemetery--Hitchcock *must* be rolling in his grave.
     (And what about that stupid scene of a booby-trapped hard-drive?
Gimme a break!  Do big-city bomb squads *really* face situations as
seemingly absurd as these?  Rigged elevators I'll buy.  But not this.)
     The acting is all fine, with Forrest Whitaker a particularly
welcome addition as another bomb squadder.  His presence may be a nod
to THE CRYING GAME, but the less said about the Irish angle, the
better.  Especially in the wake of the just-out-on-video IN THE NAME OF
THE FATHER.  And don't forget to listen for those great bad accents,
including (Jeff) Bridges' back-and-forth Bostonian.
     The leads shouldn't fear the future. However badly BLOWN AWAY
bombs, Bridges will still be standing.  As will Tommy Lee Jones, signed
to square off with Val Kilmer in BATMAN FOREVER.  But what about
director Stephen Hopkins?  He's a smart talent who hasn't been given
anything *exciting* to film since the vastly underrated PREDATOR 2.
Hopefully we haven't seen the last of him.

Title
Review for Ace Ventura: Pet Detective (1994)
     What are we going to do with Jim Carrey?  Viewers of television's
"In Living Color" know this one-man cartoon from such characters as
Fire Marshall Bill.  Viewers also know that "In Living Color" is a
skit-show and that a little of Jim Carrey goes a long way.
     Unfortunately, this fact was forgotten by the makers of the Carrey
comedy ACE VENTURA: PET DETECTIVE.
     Three writers, including Carrey, worked on the slapstick story,
which sends a self-styled "Pet Detective" on the trail of a stolen
dolphin.  The missing mammal belongs to the Miami Dolphins, who need
their mascot for the upcoming Superbowl.
     For plot porpoises, this story works as well as any Three Stooges
short.  Carrey gets to do his "official" schtick as he snoops around
greater Miami.  He leers and sneers, craning his neck to funny effect.
He even does his Captain Kirk impersonation.  Again.
     All of this is pretty harmless stuff up until the point that you
realize that the writers have absolutely no intention of focusing on
anyone *other* than Carrey.
     (Suggested alternate title--JIM CARREY: WILL DO ANYTHING FOR A
LAUGH.)
     Export it to France and you may have a hit.  As it stands, ACE
VENTURA isn't even good kid's stuff.  The profanity count, alone, is
too high.  Which is ironic, since children are, probably, Carrey's best
audience.
     The film doesn't even have the goofball charm of Chris Elliott's
recent no-brainer CABIN BOY.  Sure, Carrey has his moments.  But what
can you say about a film whose high-points include watching Carrey
slink around to the theme from "Mission Impossible?"
     ACE VENTURA has one glaring incongruity.  Amid the butt-jokes and
double-takes, the script takes great pains to set-up an elaborate and
rather funny "Crying Game" gag.  And, for *this* intended audience, that
takes (ahem) cojones.

Title
Review for Whole Wide World, The (1996)
[Note that the follow-up is set to rec.arts.sf.written rather than
rec.art.sf.movies.  This was done on purpose.  -Moderator]
    THE WHOLE WIDE WORLD, a love story left over from last year, is
another go-around with JERRY MAGUIRE's Renee Zellweger and her funky-
looking lips.  The Girl That Makes You Wonder About Collagen plays
Novalyne Price, the small-town schoolteacher (and aspiring writer) who
pursued Conan the Barbarian creator Robert E. Howard (Vincent D'Onofrio,
who also co-produced) during the Depression.  The story is true, the
scenery is nice, and D'Onofrio's rough-and- tumble character is
endlessly interesting.  The second hour is sluggish, though, and for a
variety of reasons.  In particular, I was curious about the passage of
time.  Over how many years does the story take place?
     THE WHOLE WIDE WORLD was screened at the Colony Theatre in Raleigh
on 3/7.  'Twas the quintessential off night:  a late start, a popcorn
shortage, *and* a projector shutter that closed before the end titles
(with epilogue) finished rolling.  Talk about a grumpy audience!
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC, USA, Earth
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
I'm also on the Web!  http://www.pagesz.net/~legeros/

Title
Review for Kiss the Girls (1997)
     KISS THE GIRLS is a textbook example of how to ruin a good story.
Gary Fleder (THINGS TO DO IN DENVER WHEN YOU'RE DEAD) directs this
torturously sanitized adaptation of James Patterson's bestseller about a
D.C.  forensic psychologist (Morgan Freeman) who comes to Durham, North
Carolina, after his Duke-attending niece goes up missing.  Turns out
that the D.P.D. (and the F.B.I.) have been sitting on a series of
kidnappings and murders, of college girls from all around the area.
What Freeman's character surmises is that "Casanova," as he calls
himself, is actually a collector who's keeping these young women alive
for various sundry, sordid purposes.  (And of which the graphic details
are nearly entirely omitted.  With the exception of a wee bit of gore,
the creepiest images in this movie are safe enough to be shown on the
Disney channel.) Before long, Freeman's character has a partner-in-
crime-control, a medical student (Ashley Judd) who escapes from the
kidnapper-killer's underground lair with an assist from some convenient
kick-boxing skills.  An older black man as an action hero?  A slasher
victim who fights back??  And the barest whiff of a romance between the
two???  Admittedly, this is non-standard fare for Hollywood, which makes
the movie's many, many failures all the more regrettable.
     On the up side, Morgan Freeman is his expectedly excellent self.
He brings the necessary weight to the story and without enduring the
humiliation of having to spout one-liners, such as, say, "you've been
pasteurized." Ms. Judd, who should be but isn't the other anchor at the
story's core, fares far less better.  She's a good actress saddled with
an only-okay characterization.  (In the novel, as I recall, she suffers
much more abuse before her escape, which adds an edge to the character
that's missing from the filmed version.) And so, with two talented
actors at front and center, KISS THE GIRLS never becomes unwatchable--
no matter how hard Fleder tries to kill the non-mood, be it through bozo
casting (what the Hell is Cary Elwes doing here?), atrocious southern
accents on the part of the supporting cast (what dialect is Brian Cox,
one- time Hannibal Lecter in MANHUNTER, speaking in the minuscule role
of Durham's police chief?), giggle-inducing shots of the disguised
villain, way too many moonlight foot chases, and an underground dungeon
that, truth be told, looks more like an amusement park ride than a Civil
War-era leftover.  Sigh.  I suppose that the biggest disappointment is
the lack of local color.  Short of a shot or two of Duke, Durham, and
the RTP, you'd never know that KISS THE GIRLS was filmed around here.

Title
Review for Excess Baggage (1997)
     EXCESS BAGGAGE, about a spoiled rich kid (Alicia Silverstone) who
fakes her own kidnapping and ends up in the hands (and later arms) of a
quirky, hunky auto thief (Benicio Del Toro), is so uninteresting, so
underwhelming, and so *utterly* uninvolving, that the question becomes
not "do I walk out?" but "how quickly can I find the fire exit?" I
lasted for about thirty minutes, at which point I became concerned about
my personal safety.  Noticing an unusual energy drain upon my person, I
fastened a rope around my waist and proceeded to move forward to the
front of the auditorium.  Upon closer inspection, I discovered what I
had suspected-- the filmmakers had, indeed, made into reality the
central plot device of EVENT HORIZON.  Right there in Raleigh, North
Carolina, at the corner of Atlantic Springs and Spring Forest Road, a
black hole had been opened within the confined space of a movie theater.
I sure hope they learn to harness that power...

Title
Review for Mask, The (1994)
     This thin-but-amusing adaptation of the Dark Horse comic book is
closer in spirit to BEETLEJUICE than BATMAN, though it *really*
resembles the third segment of TWILIGHT ZONE: THE MOVIE.  By Joe
Dante.  Pet Detective Jim Carrey stars as a mild-mannered bank clerk
who dons a mystic mask to transform into something wilder and hipper
than Jerry Lewis *ever* imagined.
     The concept is canny enough: a green-faced, yellow zoot-suited
superhero be-bopping around and just generally causing mischief in the
dark, edgy city of Edge City.  Complete with nifty matte painting ala
BATMAN.  Said mask is discovered by a diver, floats to the surface, and
is finally found by repressed-but-still-a-nice-guy bank clerk Stanley
Ipkiss (Carrey).
     (Though, frankly, Jim Carrey is pretty soggy as a milquetoast.
But *we* know he's the hero-to-be and that's all that counts, anyway.)
     The fun comes when Stanley tries on the mask and is transformed
into a living cartoon character, just like the ones he like to watch
after work.  Stanley spins like the Tazmanian Devil and bounces like
Woody Woodpecker, to name a few.  The twist is that Stanley Ipkiss, aka
The Mask, is not a goody two-shoes and he ends up doing some of his
*own* dirty deeds that set both the cops *and* the crooks on his yellow
tail.
     Viewers still recovering from ACE VENTURA: PET DETECTIVE can
relax; THE MASK is not a Jim Carrey vehicle, per se.  The rubber-faced
actor actually exerts *some* self-control over the course of the film
and that's good news because Carrey can be a bit much to take.  (Even
Robin Williams and Jonathan Winters work within boundaries.  For
Carrey, there *are* no rules.)
     Though the comic is clearly captivating, the real star is/are the
(literally) eye-popping special effects that allows Carrey to stretch
and contort into shapes previously only permitted for cartoon
characters.  Too bad that too many of the gags-- such as Carrey turning
into a whistling wolf-- go on too long.  THE MASK needs twice as many
gags in half the time.
     There are two dance routines, though, that are pretty fun,
including Carrey as "Cuban Pete" in a sequence that recalls the "Banana
Boat Song" from BEETLEJUICE.  And don't miss a dog who's a better
scene-stealer than Eddie from TV's "Fraiser."
     Production values are all surprising strong-- notably in the sound
department-- but the story doesn't have either an edge or an
interesting subplot to speak of.  There's noir to run from a bad
"B"-movie menu of supporting characters including a siren (Cameron
Diaz), a gangster, a rasping Mr. Big, and a smart-mouthed cynic cop
(Peter Reigert).
     Most disappointing are too many obvious references to animator
extraordinaire Tex Avery.  Subtly, where is thy sting?
